I've found the Omron very easy and practical to use.  It gives very good estimates of body fat percentages and BMI (body mass index) which can easily be used to illustrate a personal rate of progress for any dietary or weight training program.  For the money, it would be difficult to find something better</review_text>
I've been using the Omron HBF-306 Body Fat Analyzer for a month or so now. So far I've been very impressed with its consistency. However, I would have to go to a doctor and get some sort of analysis and compare that with the Omron's measurements to see how accurate it is. It's well built and very easy to use. Once you set up your profile, it only takes a few seconds to get a read. I would give it 5 stars but again I dont yet have anything to compare its measurements with. Still a good product at a good price.</review_text>
I bought this gadget with the intent of monitoring my daily steps to get an idea of where I was currently to establish some sort of baseline so that I could get a reality check on my activity levels.  I opened the box, read the easy directions, set up my personal step measurement (just measure off the distance of your 10 steps), and clipped it on my pants and forgot about it for the day.  I was surprised to find out that a corpse could probably move around more during the day than me! Over the next 6 days, (this pedometer keeps track of 7 days of steps for you); I literally stepped up my game and went from 756 steps with NO aerobic exercise on day 1, to 7,880 steps with 30 minutes of nonstop aerobic exercise on day 3! Every day has been getting easier to achieve the 10,000 "normal" steps, and increasing the aerobic steps too (which are tracked separately). I can press the mode button, check out how many miles my steps translate to, kilocalories burned, aerobic steps, and compare it with the past 7 days as well. It has turned out to be even more fun than what I originally bought it for. I actually feel better, and the fun part is that I am trying to beat my own personal record from the previous day! This has been an eye-opening experience for me, and I keep this on or in my pocket all the time now, just to make sure I keep a mindful eye on my steps and aerobic activity for the day</review_text>
Great features!  Probably the best pedometer out there for the money.  The only reason I give 4 vice 5 stars, is that I think the one I bought for my mom (same brand and model) is slightly more accurate.  A great way to track your fitness overall</review_text>
pedometer is great!  Easy to use, accurate.  Highly recommend it</review_text>
This is the best tasting energy bar I have ever had. My kids love them too. Great high energy snack</review_text>
I really like these things.  They're certainly chewy, so they can be a bit of a jaw workout, but they taste pretty good while having a lot more nutritional value than a candy bar, and they keep you going for a couple of hours.  If only they were a little cheaper, say a dollar or less per bar, I'd probably go through them a lot more quickly than I do right now</review_text>
I was really enjoying my Oregon Scientific Pedometer, I found it easy to use and accurate; however, after 1 month it accidentally fell on the floor, and that was it, it no longer works...I will probably buy another one, but it needs to be treated with kid-gloves.</review_text>
I still have ther original blackmans shaver purchased in 1977 it still works!  this one works even better I have tried other remington shavers over the years  the 850 9300 and the 9500 none of them worked as well as the  first one untill now! I found that by shaving in small circular motion  as  you move along your face you won't need williams lectric shave as I had with the other razors and it's much easier to claen! now if the just keep making replacement baldes I will be very happy for a long time</review_text>
I bought this product because I had a borderline high reading at my doctor's office.  Rather than having the hassle of going to his office and paying a cop-pay just to have it monitored, we purchased this unit.  It works wonderful.  Very simple and gives more information than I expected</review_text>
This is very easy to use and quite convenient. I'm not sure, however, how accurate this monitor is. It seems to record a higher reading than a manual one at times. The value of this home monitor is if the readings change dramatically. THen it's a warning to go to the doctor's</review_text>
This has got to be one of the easiest blood pressure monitors to use.  It really doesn't start until your arm is in the correct position, letting you know by beeping when you've got it right.  The display is large and easy to read and understand.  I definitely would recommend this</review_text>
Very happy with this purchase. Received it in a reasonable time and at a great price including the rebate for signing up for an [...] credit card. It is easy to use and seems more accurate than the wrist type monitors. I like the History feature in order to determine the average blood pressure over a long period of time since pressures change daily!Good machine especially since it has an AC adapter so that there is no need to change batteries frequently!Also, the intellisense feature makes sure the cuff is always properly inflated before readings</review_text>
I just finished a 4 day golf tournament that was brutal. 6 hour rounds played in 90 degree heat with high humidity. During a practice round a couple of days before the tournament started I really got drained of energy after about 12 holes. I was unprepared and it made a sport that I normally enjoy into an unpleasant experience.For the tournament rounds I packed a small cooler with Gatorade, Nature Valley Fruit and Nut bars, and chocolate flavored Clif Builder's bars. I drank water and gatorade throughout each round and alternated the bars every 3-4 holes. It really made a difference. Each day I felt like I had the energy and endurance for a great round. If only my golf game was as good as these bars.They tasted great and keeping them in a cooler kept them from melting in the heat. I highly recommend Chocolate Clif Builder's bars.Kevin Decke</review_text>
These bars are absolutely fantastic. They are very nutritious and have a good amount of protein (20g). They taste pretty good, far better than most bars. I prefer the builder bar cookies and cream flavor to that of the clif bar flavor. Out of the flavors my current favorite is the cookies and cream, next being the peanut butter, and then chocolate. A chocolate mint flavor has just been released but I have yet to try it. I recommend these bars to anyone looking for a healthy snack or needing protein for working out</review_text>
Just wanted to note that my delicious bars arrived MELTED as noted by another reviewer. I ended up placing in the fridge, and then taking out before eating. Turns out, I didn't find them that great directly from the fridge. Also, they just didn't taste as fresh as the ones I buy individually from Wal-Mart. I couldn't tell if that was because they had melted, or just weren't as fresh to start with</review_text>
I originally ordered a Tanita scale and it stopped working within two weeks.  (Amazon, of course, took it back with no problems.)  I was so glad when the Omron scale arrived.  It costs less than the Tanita but the quality is much higher.  The numbers on it are very large and easy to read.  Also, it is much easier to place your feet properly than on the Tanita.  I can't wait to try all the features.  By the way, I weighed myself over and over and my weight only varied .2 lbs. as promised.  Great deal for the money!!!</review_text>
I recently started Weight Watchers and was looking to purchase a new and accurate scale.  I figured I would buy a WW product, but after reading the reviews, I decided to go with the Omron scale.  I am very pleased with this product.  It has been extremely accurate.  It keeps a history for both my husband and I.  I would highly recommend this scale to anyone!  It is also an attractive scale which is a bonus.  Go with the Omron scale</review_text>
After reading the review regarding palm kernel oil in all of the Luna Bar flavors, I decided to read all the ingredients for each flavor myself. I noticed that the Luna Bar Toasted Nuts 'n' Cranberry flavor is the only flavor that does not contain palm kernel oil. If you are concerned about palm kernel oil you should purchase this flavor. The toasted nuts 'n' cranberry flavor is delicious, doesn't taste like a candy bar, and has low total and saturated fat gram percentages. Luna Bar Toasted Nuts 'n' Cranberry flavor is one of the better nutrition bars available on the market.</review_text>
The Cherry Covered Choccolate Luna Bars are quite tasty. Chances are, if you're eating a chocolate cherry nutrition bar, you  need a little enticement to eat healthy. Like all these bars you do get sick of the same flavor day after day. I recommend alternating between these and another bar that's not so sweet (kashi trail mix bars are perfect). That helps me stick to the bars instead of hitting up the zillion calorie pastries at the corner coffee shop</review_text>
This monitor is so easy to use, and more convenient than going to the grocery store. It saves the readings in memory, so if I don't have a pen and paper handy, I can retrieve the info later. It even shows the time the reading was taken.</review_text>
My wife had high BP, so we got this model.  The reasons for choosing this model were that:1. the upper arm monitors are supposed to be more accurate2. it was cheaper than the fully automatic models3. Omron seems to be one of the better/best brands.4. Supposedly, the pumps on the fully automatic models are prone to breaking.The unit appears well built (including the hand pump).  It is easy to operate, and it seems very accurate.  We checked its readings with an fully manual unit that we have at home, and the automatic unit at the drug store.  We find it takes very accurate and consistent readings.People with physical limitations might find the hand pump inconvenient.  Also, people with a big arm might need to buy the larger cuff.  I'm overweight right now, so the cuff barely fits my arm, but fits my wife's nicely (it was bought for her)</review_text>
This blood pressure monitor is everything I was looking for and the price was certainly right.  Thank you.  It works perfectly</review_text>
i find the item in perfect shape and operates effectivelythank you so muchbimvik</review_text>
Unbeatable for the price!  Worked fine right out of the box.  Easy to use and easy to understand instructions.  I'm glad I bought it</review_text>
My physician introduced me to this item. He said very accurate when compaired to the water and pinching methods. Is affordable and easy to use. Oh, did I forget to mention, accurate compaired to a scale model I own. Amazon is great to order from, the online ordering was easy and the product arrived in 5 days!</review_text>
my baby is 12 moth now and she uses the Pampers Cruisers (size 3) from 4-month-old. it is soft and my baby never have "rush" with it.  my whole family love this diapers.</review_text>
I encountered these at last week's Carlsbad Triathlon.  They tasted really good and I figured if it's good enough for the military, I'll give it a try...sure enough, the military knows what it's doing--it seems to work as claimed.  Thumbs up, or, Hooah</review_text>
We use the ZBars for breakfast, and my kids love them! I love them too, as they're organic, contain no trans fat, no refinded sugar or flour. They're yummy AND healthy</review_text>
Out of the 3 flavors available, this one is the favorite of both my boys (4yrs and 7yrs). BUT no matter what flavor its a snack they both will eat and enjoy!</review_text>
I came across the Hooah drink because my boss--a retired military man running for office--always has a case lying around. With campaign season heating up and workdays getting crazy long, these are invaluable for getting me through the day, and keeping my thoughts coherent. Apparently military studies said these drinks improve alertness by fifty percent. I can't measure that in myself of course, but I do sense a dramatic improvement</review_text>
This is a great drink. I wanted to try something that was different, and this definately fit in. It isnt carbonated, and tastes really good.What I really wanted to know though, was how it worked. There is no caffeine or taurine, and the ingredients list didnt really show anything out of the ordinary.It worked well though, and I was able to stay focused for a long time after drinking it</review_text>
This shaver has met all my expectations. It cleans and recharges itself automatically. The shave is close and nick free. The only slight negative is the cleaning time per shave could run to 20 minutes</review_text>
My husband said it is a very good shaver. It took a few days to get used to the shaving head because he has always used the Norelco shavers with three rotating heads. The Braun is a closer shave. The cleaning system works very well and it is easy to handle</review_text>
I have owned this pulse meter for approximately 2 weeks and I find it to be accurate, but it takes a while for it to give a reading. The first few times I used it, it took over a minute to tell me my pulse. However, the manual does state that when you become used to the correct positioning of your finger on the sensor it will give a result faster. So far, this is true, as within the last 3 days, I have received readings within 10 seconds consistently. Considering the price, it was a good purchase</review_text>
If you are trying to learn relaxation through biofeedback, this is the product to buy. Packaging, support, presentation, and hardware/software quality are the best that I have seen.  No down side. It's not a game in the usual sense. More of a way to learn techniques in a quiet and amusing way.There is room for a little mischief. Instead of allowing the balloons to flow smoothly, I tried busting a few. Type A personality shows through occasionally. I will be purchasing the next item in the series. I am learning to relax, at will, which will be helpful in my high-stress occupation. Good luck</review_text>
I have had so much fun learning Bio feedback and learnig to breath.  The exercises and the story line are really helpful to achive control and develope skills for meditation.  I highly recommned this product.  I will be purchasing the add-on in the near future</review_text>
Philips sent me a reprogram plug-in that took me only 10 minutes to change the settings to meet the new standards.Most of the low price AED's use camaera batteries. My defibrillator has a long life lithium battary.I won't risk someone's life on store-bought battaries.Walt Blankenshi</review_text>
As an ER/Trauma nurse I have seen and been involved in many, many cardiac arrests. Here is some information that you need to know 1) You must still perform adequate CPR, if not brain death occurs within 4 minutes of oxygen deprivation to the brain! 2) Even with trained personnel, CPR, a defibrillator and Advanced Cardiac Life Support (medications) the survival rate is very, very low.I am not telling you this to discourage purchasing this AED it is a wonderful unit I have been trained on it and had to use it once. I am letting you know that if you are willing to spend over $1000 on a defibrillator (especially for a private home)then a good idea would be to spend another $50 and take a basic CPR class. I hope that no one that buys this ever has to use it!!</review_text>
Very compact with good instructions. Comes with a very durable case  and handle which makes it easily portable. I hope I never have to use it</review_text>
At church today I came upon a man who had partially collapsed.  Since I'm a physician, I stopped and offered aid.  It turns out that he had a history of heart disease and was having some pretty concerning symptoms.  To my dismay, we do not have an AED at our church (yet).  We notified 911, and he was taken for medical care without any problems, but I was a bit worried there for a few minutes.  While I'm trained in BLS, that is, at best, a temporizing measure.  AEDs have a proven ability to diagnose and treat fatal heart rhythms.  In my opinion, places of public gathering should consider purchasing one of these devices.  I'll be working with our church to see if we can get one.  I would have been a bit more relaxed waiting for EMS if I had had one of these today.However, buying an AED is not a cure-all.  I have been trained on these, and they are very simple to learn to use.  However, I think it would be quite difficult for someone who had never used one use it correctly during the stress of a cardiac arrest.  If you are considering buying an AED for home or public use, I strongly suggest reading the section on AEDs at the American Heart Association website.  It discusses some of the important preparations to consider before the purchase of such a device.So, while not for everyone, this is one of the few products available that can truly save lives.  In the right situation, it is indispensable.</review_text>
As an Emergency Nurse Practitioner and Paramedic, I cannot emphasize enough the importance of getting electricity to an adult who is suffering from cardiac arrest.  Technology is moving quickly to get electricity to the cardiac arrest victim earlier and earlier -- and the survival rates AND quality of life rates after such an arrest are sky rocketing accordingly.Is there too much direct-to-consumer marketing by medical-related companies?  Probably.  Is your personal risk for experiencing sudden cardiac arrest per calendar year low?  Definitely.  ...but do those smug reviewers refuse to buy vehicles with airbags in them just because their risk of being in an accident is low and the direct-to-consumer marketing is irritating to them?  No!  Those will be the same folks who want their cars with anti-lock breaks, airbags, the best side-impact reinforcements... and being a good driver (ie, "just improve your diet") won't cancel their risk for being in an accident.I hope you never have to use this machine, but as an emergency healthcare worker -- both pre-hospital and in the emergency room -- I cannot say enough positive about AED's in the community setting!Don't run out and purchase this out of paranoia, however if yuo are at risk for a sudden cardiac event consider if this would be appropriate for you, your family members, your apartment building, your church, etc.  ...and rest assured that it is absolutely safe -- it is impossible to hurt a loved one with this, you can only help....and to those who gave negative reviews on this AED?  Don't forget to pay your car insurance!..</review_text>
The toothbrush is great, feels like you just came from the dentist and had your teeth cleaned</review_text>
The toothbrush section an the local drug store has at least a hundred different tooth brushes on offer but in spite of all this variety almost all of these have large heads. If you mouth is more petite or you have a strong gag reflex, your teeth suffer. The Oral B head is small and although you have to work a little more on each tooth, you can. I have not had a cavity in years. My pearly whites look greate and my gums are firm an buffed. If only these woked on abs.</review_text>
These are a great, yuumy snack.  For someone who counts calories (or points), it's nice to have an option that is relatively healthy and still tastes great!  I have never met a Luna Bar I didn't like, though this is my favorite flavor</review_text>
These are very tasty.  They take care of a sweet tooth without all the unpronouncable ingredients or being terrible for you.  They also are great in a diaper bag, purse, center console of a car for when you get hungry and need something to tie you over until you are at home or whatever your destination</review_text>
They don't seem small at all.  I would agree that it's like a size 3, if you're talking about toddler CLOTHING, but the diaper size is different.  My daughter wears 3T clothes, size 5 Easy Ups</review_text>
This baby has helped me track my heart through all the highs and lows and ultimately allowed me to assist my doctor in verifying that something is seriously wrong with my blood pressure. We're yet to verify what the culprit is... but this little guy helps me know when to slow down or kick it up a notch.I would highly recommend this guy if you're looking for a wrist-inflatable blood pressure monitor. It's been consistant, reliable, and informative for both myself and my doctor</review_text>
This blood pressure monitor is easy to use and works great</review_text>
I'm cursed with sensitive skin and a tough beard.  I'll break out or rash up if my skin gets irritated, so I have to carefully prep for shaving.  After years of trial and error, I've finally settled on a good shaving cream system: Cetaphil Skin Cleanser for a base, then Kiss My Face Moisture Shave as a supplement.  For post-shave comfort and to prevent breakouts, I use a product like Clean&Clear Dual-Action Oil-Free moisturizing lotion.  However, the weak link up until now has been the actual shaver.  With the Gillette Fusion Power, I've finally found the right one.I've used Gillette since they gave my unit free razors during the first Gulf War (I was in the Marines at the time).  They've gotten the job done, but a 3-blade system is ultimately inadequate for my beard and skin type.  It doesn't take long for the blades to start cutting my face and neck, especially since I take forever to change blades.  I dreaded looking in a bathroom mirror at work and seeing dried blood spots (not to mention getting blood stains on my collar).  Electric shavers don't work for me either - too hard on my skin, and I'd have a five-o'clock shadow around 2PM.So, when I saw Gillette touting their new 5-blade system, I gave it a shot.  I was initially skeptical about the powered aspect due to my issues with electric shavers.  But the Fusion Power is the happy exception.  At first I struggled a bit getting the battery cap off of the end.  But once I mastered that maneuver and got the battery in, I was set.  It takes one AAA-battery that seems to last a decent interval (the low-battery indicator is a nice touch).  And even if the Fusion Power runs out of juice, you can still shave with it.  The shaver glides over my face, and the vibration feels good - kind of like a pick-me-up in the morning.  The five blades really nail my beard, and even tough spots like my chin and jaw line remain cut-free.  I also like the one-blade trimmer on top - very handy for evening out my sideburns and zapping those stray whiskers right under my nostrils.My only issue is the expense of the blades.  But I can make them last a lot longer than the old 3-blade razors while still getting a great shave.  And most importantly, I rarely get those annoying cuts anymore (if I do, it's more because of rushing or clumsiness than anything else).  Ultimately, the result is worth the higher price.  The Gillette Fusion Power is the best shaver I've ever tried.  Highly recommended</review_text>
I mean come ON, who needs 5 blades right?Well, after thoughtful consideration of the major improvement that the Mach III was over a twin head razor, I decided that $10 was worth the price of a cheap thrill so I took the plunge, and to my surprise this thing works beyond my expectations.The first thing I noticed was that this new Fusion has a more powerful engine than the Mach III. The second thing I found was that this razor gives me a much closer shave than the Mach III, and with very little effort, and those tight spots that my old razor would always miss are not a problem anymore. And I find this razor to be very comfortable without a single nick that others have complained about. But I do use this razor strictly for my face if you know what I mean. haw haw 5 Blade</review_text>
If your looking for a bar that hits the spot without leaving you wanting more this is the bar for you provides great flavor and satisfies I highly recommend this bar for in between snacks not to high in fat has more carbs than other protein bars but is a great overall ba</review_text>
We LOVE this item!!!  We get older TV show DVDs from Netflix and they generally are not in the best condition when they come.  If the cleaner doesn't work, and it generally does, our back up is the repair stuff, which almost always does.  I think out of 30 disks, only two were not fixed.</review_text>
I was surprised to open this pedometer page after sometime and see all the negative reviews it receives. I have been using this specific model for more than 3 months now and I am really satisfied with it. It is really accurate (&lt;1% declination, I have performed more than four tests of more than 400 steps during different times of its life and I have seen a couple of cheap pedometers performing much worse), clips firmly to belt or pants, displays the time conveniently and has nice backlight, even has a radio which works, although as most people said, not really its best feature. The truth is that I am not using the radio at all, mostly because I believe the batteries will last longer and it will save me from extra trips to Walmart. But I have tested it and it works, although nothing impressive there. Of course, for the money, I think you cannot go wrong with this pedometer.One funny comment is that, although most people complain it cannot open very easily, after sometime it will open more easily that you think. Actually it has been a couple of times where putting a bag on my shoulders or a waist pouch and applying some pressure on it by mistake, will open it wide, so it does not count any steps. But it does not open by itself anyway, needs external force for this to happen, so it does not happen often.All in all, I am sure that the plastic construction and the less than rigorous production testing will result in many pieces that do not function properly and will result in bad reviews. Maybe I have been lucky, maybe not, but this has been one of the best and most reliable devices that I carry and use every day. And a great incentive for walking and exercising more</review_text>
This book is beautiful outside, I love the lace up binding and place for picture on the front. What I do not like is how there is no specific places to write in, you just have to use your imagination as to how to word and to position things on each page..too much like scrapbooking for me, I wanted a book with blank lines and spots to write in..For example one blank page will say, "All About Mom" then another that says "Baby Shower" etc..but the pages are blank. I need more structure</review_text>
This is the 3rd or 4th time I have bought this type of batteries and I am always satisfied with their performance.  They are a great value</review_text>
This is the best tasting energy bar I have ever had. My kids love them too. Great high energy snack</review_text>
I have tried nearly all brands of energy bars.  Hooah! are the best tasting and they give me the most energ</review_text>
Easy to open package,tastes good,stays fresh after opening and not using all at once, does what it's advertised to do</review_text>
This is the only energy bar that I have sampled more than once! The Hooah! energy bar works faster, lasts longer, and tastes better!... Both flavors!... Go Army!</review_text>
Compared to the energy bars on the market these days (Cliff, powerbar, etc.) that taste terrible, Hooah bars are awesome.  They really work too, energy wise.  Great for long bike rides, triatholons, etc. or even something to eat before practice for athletes.  They are awesome; I am a huge fan</review_text>
We use the ZBars for breakfast, and my kids love them! I love them too, as they're organic, contain no trans fat, no refinded sugar or flour. They're yummy AND healthy</review_text>
This is one of the best-tasting energy/snack bars I've tried.  It has true flavors (think a chewy chocolate brownie with small chocolate chips), little or no "off" flavors or aftertastes, and it's relatively filling, especially if accompanied by water or an additional quick snack, such as fruit.  It's a small bar, but it's packed with 3 grams of fiber (12% of daily needs based on a 2,000 calorie diet), and it's certified 95% organic.  These organic ingredients include organic rolled oats, organic oat Flour, organic oat fiber, organic and milled flaxseed, and actual natural flavors.  Even the sweet stuff is organic:, including organic chocolate (made with--you guessed it--organic evaporated cane juice), soy butter, cocoa powder, cocoa butter, tapioca syrup, and fig paste. CLIF's website proclaims that  "CLIF ZBar is the first kids' snack created to comply with SB-19, California's Senate Bill limiting fat and sugar in foods offered within the state's school system...We source ingredients which do not contain wheat and are not genetically engineered."  Although aimed at kids, adults and teens will enjoy this as well.Ingredients: Organic Rolled Oats, Organic Chocolate Chips (Organic Evaporated Cane Juice, Organic Unsweetened Chocolate, Organic Cocoa Butter, Soy Lecithin, Natural Flavors), Organic Evaporated Cane Juice Syrup, Organic Brown Rice Syrup, Organic Tapioca Syrup, Organic Fig Paste, Organic Oat Flour, Organic Cocoa Powder, Organic Soy Butter, Natural Flavors, Organic Oat Fiber, Organic Milled Flaxseed, Organic Chocolate (Organic Evaporated Cane Juice, Organic Unsweetened Chocolate, Organic Cocoa Butter, Soy Lecithin), Salt, Baking Soda. For those with allegies, CLIF includes the following caution "Contains soy. May contain traces of milk, peanuts and other nuts."Vitamins & Minerals: Calcium Carbonate, Ascorbic Acid (Vit. C), Niacinamide (Vit. B3), Ferric Orthophosphate (Iron), Zinc Oxide, Cyanocobalamin (Vit. B12), Thiamine Mononitrate (Vit. B1), Pyridoxine Hydrochloride (Vit. B6), Riboflavin (Vit. B2), Folic Acid (Vit. B9), Beta Carotene (Vit A).Nutritional Information: In one bar (36 grams) there are 120 calories, 3 grams of fat (5% of percent daily values based on a 2,000 calorie diet), of which one gram s saturated fat(but no trans fat), 0 cholesterol, 12 grams sugar, A total of 22 grams carbohydrates (7%), which includes 12 grams of sugar and 10 grams of other carbohydrates, 125 mg of sodium (4%), 110 mg. potassium(3%), 3 grams of dietary fiber (12%) and a gram of insoluble fiber, and the following vitamins and minerals:  Vitamin A (6%), B1(30%), B2 (15%), B3 (20%), B6 (20%), B12 (10%), %). C (35%), Iron (10%), zinc (15%), Phosphorus (20%), and Folate (20%).I don't think there's a similar product around that can compete with the taste, purity, and nutritional value of this popular new treat</review_text>
I still have ther original blackmans shaver purchased in 1977 it still works!  this one works even better I have tried other remington shavers over the years  the 850 9300 and the 9500 none of them worked as well as the  first one untill now! I found that by shaving in small circular motion  as  you move along your face you won't need williams lectric shave as I had with the other razors and it's much easier to claen! now if the just keep making replacement baldes I will be very happy for a long time</review_text>
This Omron Blood Pressure Monitor is OK, but not as good, in my opinion as my old one from the same company.  This one doesn't print out results, although it does store them.  Also, the cuff is very stiff and cumbersome.</review_text>
I came across the Hooah drink because my boss--a retired military man running for office--always has a case lying around. With campaign season heating up and workdays getting crazy long, these are invaluable for getting me through the day, and keeping my thoughts coherent. Apparently military studies said these drinks improve alertness by fifty percent. I can't measure that in myself of course, but I do sense a dramatic improvement</review_text>
I'm writing to correct a few factual errors in other reviews.  One reviewer claimed that Soldier Fuel contains no energy ingredients.  This is untrue.  Soldier Fuel was formulated by military labs specifically to provide steady energy to troops.  Carbohydrates are the body's primary source of energy.  Soldier Fuel contains 29 g of complex carbs (the carbs that give long-lasting energy) and 12 g of sugar.  The U.S. Military labs deemed this the perfect ratio to give you both a quick burst of energy and no crash.  Most other energy drinks on the market have lots of sugar and caffeine.  Since caffeine is a stimulant and not a source of energy, the result is a quick spike in energy followed by a crash.Another error is that Soldier Fuel has more sugar.  It has less.  One 12 oz. can of Soldier Fuel has 12 g of sugar.  The same amount of Gatorade contains 21 g of sugar.  The same amount of Red Bull has 39g sugar.Finally, the support for the troops is not marketing hype.  Our company is partnered with the U.S. Military's Natick Soldier Center.  A portion of the gross proceeds from each can of HOOAH! Soldier Fuel and each HOOAH! bar directly funds research that improves the safety, diet, and quality of life of our troops</review_text>
Very happy with this purchase. Received it in a reasonable time and at a great price including the rebate for signing up for an [...] credit card. It is easy to use and seems more accurate than the wrist type monitors. I like the History feature in order to determine the average blood pressure over a long period of time since pressures change daily!Good machine especially since it has an AC adapter so that there is no need to change batteries frequently!Also, the intellisense feature makes sure the cuff is always properly inflated before readings</review_text>
Item received in perfect condition. Checked with Doctor.  Very good blood pressure monitor.  Thank you</review_text>
These are very tasty.  They take care of a sweet tooth without all the unpronouncable ingredients or being terrible for you.  They also are great in a diaper bag, purse, center console of a car for when you get hungry and need something to tie you over until you are at home or whatever your destination</review_text>
Happy with price and product.   Very very easy to use; fast and accurate</review_text>
easy to use.it seems quite accurate.the only bad thing is it needs batteries,which cost a lot</review_text>
Great features!  Probably the best pedometer out there for the money.  The only reason I give 4 vice 5 stars, is that I think the one I bought for my mom (same brand and model) is slightly more accurate.  A great way to track your fitness overall</review_text>
For many years I Couldn't use a electric shaver because it was always a incomplete shave, so after each Christmas when I received a new one I would try it and would go back to a manual razor, THEN came along the freeglider and yippy it did a reasonable job that I would call satisfactory, the over the years That razor went obsolete so I started to look for a new replacement. I read some of the reviews. I read "the refills are costly  ... hello... 4$ a month?, then I read doesn't do a good job, Well let me report to you all this is the best darn razor, Its like magic each time I use it(cleans itself each time" its quick, comfortable , quiet, the cleaning process is so cool and I for one love the concept of a clean razor each time I use it, this razor is 10 times better then the freeglider which I loved, what a joy shaving now is , I can even shave twice (I go to work sometimes at 3am then later that night if I'm going out I can shave again and it doesn't irritate.. what a magical razor they have designed ..PS. The cleaning solution is not expensive (under 12$ for 3ea, that's 4$ apiece and lasts a month).thank you to the designerI highly recommend this  2 thumbs upconsnone I can see as yet .. John</review_text>
Nowhere else in this country can you get this quality, accuracy and convenience at this price.  FDA Approved and NCEP Certified, and the entire cholesterol panel... no other at-home test can make those claims.  As for my results, they agreed perfectly with the lab test at my doctor's office.  Why would anyone want to waste time at their doctor's office when Amazon.com makes this superb BIOSAFE test available to any customer.  I'm recommending it to all my friends.  Buy one today!  Or better yet 2; get one for a friend</review_text>
My wife and I have used this a few times now and really like it.  From a novice's point of view, this is a great meditation aid.  I like being able to get the visual feedback as I calm and center myself.  I guess the hardest part is not letting myself get too anxious as I try to accomplish the task in front of me.It's also a very pretty game with very lush and detailed visuals as well as a nice soundtrack</review_text>
This is a fantastic tool for self improvement and relaxation and a flawed but acceptable game by gaming standards alone.  The biofeedback hardware/software is excellent and you WILL make progress whether your goals are stress reduction, better meditation, building higher self-esteem, maybe even reaching higher states of consciousness etc...The "biofeedback events" are diverse and well designed and generally just great to use!  Most of the in-game advice is also fantastic and there are a few "easter eggs" which offer very practical tools to help build your self esteem, realize your goals etc...Much of the *substance* of this project is masterfully achieved (though there are a few cheesy moments).That said the interface etc. needs help, it can be downright frustrating, and the relatively low-res graphics can be a strain on some screens.  Thankfully these issues have been addressed in the expansion pack Wisdom Quest, which I also highly recommend.  Overall, this is a really innovative and great product.  Also a good investment as far as biofeedback devices go since there will likely be more expansion packs and third-party software to come</review_text>
I finally received this product in the mail after knowing about it for a year. I can't say I'm a huge fan of Deepak Chopra. He presents some good ideas, but from what I can tell he seems to consider meditation to be more of a mechanism for mind and body control, leading to bliss and relaxation, rather than a tool for unbiased self knowledge, to come to terms with all the things that one rather might ignore. I find this bias is reflected in the game.As a game in itself, it is pretty good -  its graphics and its originality - and learning to relax and chill out may be useful for some people. I didn't find the process as compelling as I expected, though. I found I was able to learn some of the skills pretty fast, and other places I seemed to get stuck. One potential drawback is that if you get frustrated, and try to start forcing things to happen, it can defeat the purpose of meditation.The science of biofeedback is fairly new, and I can see its potential in the field of preventative health. I just wouldn't put the same New Age spin on things as Chopra does.</review_text>
You can shave anything without putting future fatherhood at risk, though  it takes some patience to get things really smooth. I've used it repeatedly over the past three months without any major problems. My skin was a little sensitive after the first time, but no terrible pain or anything, and there's none at all now that I'm accustomed to using it. It is possible to nick yourself if you press too hard while shaving, but if you read the instructions first you should be fine. A couple of very minor drawbacks: It's rather noisy, more so than a regular electric razor, and if you use the comb attachments, it's tough to remove them without also removing the foil screen at the same time. But that pops right back in, so not a big dea</review_text>
This is a very good shaver for the private area.  However, the key to getting the best results is to trim the longer hairs with scissors or the largest guard first.  This will keep the shaver from pulling on the longer hairs and will enable the foil part of the shaver to work.  The foil will not be able to do its job if the hairs are too long.The only problem I had with the shaver was that it did not enable me to shave my back like it claimed.  However, I use the 'mangroomer' back shaver for this and it is perfect for you to shave off all your back hair easily with its elongated handle.  it is a great product as well.Therefore, I would have to say these two products coupled together seem to cover all the bases for men's grooming on the body.  I would highly recommend both of them for perfect manscaping results</review_text>
Necessary replacement brush heads to maintain correct oral hygeine with rotary Braun electric toothbrush.  I foung Amazon.com's price for this item CHEAPER than Costco or Sam's Club!!!</review_text>
The toothbrush is great, feels like you just came from the dentist and had your teeth cleaned</review_text>
The Biosafe Thyroid Test is accurate and simple to use. The results came back in less than a week and matched my doctor's results! Thanks Biosafe</review_text>
Yes, the kit is easy to use, but if you don't bleed freely, get a few extra lancets before you start. Most pharmacists will give you one or two lancets for free. The kit only comes with two (which can be used only one time). It took me 6 jabs to get enough blood for the test; I had to run out to the corner pharmacy to get more lancets (because I'm too much of a whimp to find a household bloodletting tool). Other than that - no complaints. The lab got the results back to me faster than expected</review_text>
These bars are supposed to be for Women because they are lower cal and have more calcium.  I think there are other factors as well.  Men are usually affraid of products like vitamins for women stangely enough, but they say that they need calcium and protein too.  I really like the key lime flavor it is great.  I like lemon also and the chi tea.  I like those flavors because they are light tasting and I do not always have to have chocolate the way some people do.  The lime reminds me of the florida keys.  These are really better than the original cliff bars and when they came out I did not eat another man ciff bar.  I used to eat one of these for breakfast everyday with a soy milk when I had a busy life.  Thankfully my life has slowed down now.  It is good grab and go food</review_text>
After reading the review regarding palm kernel oil in all of the Luna Bar flavors, I decided to read all the ingredients for each flavor myself. I noticed that the Luna Bar Toasted Nuts 'n' Cranberry flavor is the only flavor that does not contain palm kernel oil. If you are concerned about palm kernel oil you should purchase this flavor. The toasted nuts 'n' cranberry flavor is delicious, doesn't taste like a candy bar, and has low total and saturated fat gram percentages. Luna Bar Toasted Nuts 'n' Cranberry flavor is one of the better nutrition bars available on the market.</review_text>
My daughter Morgane, who is now 8 years old, has been suffering from delibitating migraines since infancy (yes, there is such a thing, unfortunately).The symptoms are very impressive, she usually drops to the floor and starts vomiting within a few minutes. She cannot move or open her eyes. It makes her very anxious and we noticed that she hyperventilates when she thinks she is going to "get dizzy". We tried to make her breathe slowly and calm down, to no avail. Morgane's doctor told us that breathing slowly and practicing biofeedback were the best non-drug practices against migraines, and we try to avoid giving Morgane medication as she is so young. So I thought of using RESPeRATE as my Dad has high-blood pressure and I knew it worked on the breathing pattern.Morgane immediately understood how to use the device, it was so easy and even fun for her. It relaxes her and gives her the strength to know she can do something about her migraines. Her breathing pattern has reduced considerably and so far, she has not had another migraine attack for about 6 months. She used to have them every two months.I have purchased another device for my best friend, a long time migraine sufferer. The way I see it, it is such a painful condition that anything that helps without harm is a blessing</review_text>
Easy to use; and a wicked incentive to lose weight. Have lost 20 kilos in just a few months from walking.</review_text>
They don't seem small at all.  I would agree that it's like a size 3, if you're talking about toddler CLOTHING, but the diaper size is different.  My daughter wears 3T clothes, size 5 Easy Ups</review_text>
This baby has helped me track my heart through all the highs and lows and ultimately allowed me to assist my doctor in verifying that something is seriously wrong with my blood pressure. We're yet to verify what the culprit is... but this little guy helps me know when to slow down or kick it up a notch.I would highly recommend this guy if you're looking for a wrist-inflatable blood pressure monitor. It's been consistant, reliable, and informative for both myself and my doctor</review_text>
I was really enjoying my Oregon Scientific Pedometer, I found it easy to use and accurate; however, after 1 month it accidentally fell on the floor, and that was it, it no longer works...I will probably buy another one, but it needs to be treated with kid-gloves.</review_text>
great product, easy to use and simple to follow instruction, keeps me in the zone to burn calories while on my walks.  i recommend it to anyone.    it doesnt interface with gym exercise equipment but i dont use them anyway and it doesnt cost 3 to 4 times what one of those do.  buy it, wear it, be happy</review_text>
I have had Omord HR-100C for a few months now. I use it wile on my treadmill. It seems to take a wile before it starts to register the hart rate; I think it is because the sending unit needs some moisture to make good contact with your skin. I did have some trouble with the unit when I first started using it; I replaced the battery in the sending unit which solved the problem. The fact that the battery is user replaceable is one of the main reasons I picked the Omord brand. The HR-100C is a bare bones unit and does a good job if you are looking for an inexpensive basic hart rate monitor</review_text>
Great product for the $ I spent.  I picked it b/c I can replace the batteries myself and the cost was in my budget.  It does jump around more than I'd like, but I can tell from the range that I am over or under my target heart rate.  It does beep to let you know that, but I find it annoying so I turn it off.  If you find you have trouble getting it to register your rate, then move it around a bit.  Mine works best when I put it higher on my chest, in the area of my heart, just below my shoulder blade.</review_text>
This review is about the Oral-B Flexisoft replacement heads. Coupled with the Braun electric toothbrushes, this is one of the most effective aids to oral hygiene ever developed. My introduction to Oral-B goes back over 27 years to a USAF basic training briefing; a dental technician held up an Oral-B toothbrush with medium bristles and said "this is the toothbrush you need if you want to keep your teeth" or some such statement like that. Well, I haven't lost one yet.The motorized mechanicals of the toothbrush do most of the work while you guide the oscillating round head around and over your pearly whites. While the heads are undeniably pricey when looked at just in dollars and cents, there is value in the fact that the total package actually makes a rather mundane chore a little more fun while actually living up to the claim that it does a better job on your teeth than manual brushing.Since I've always believed the entire surface area of the toothbrush head was meant to be covered with toothpaste and the size of the head on these is smaller than the average brush, I know I'm using less toothpaste to do the same job. While this is no big deal, the long term economic benefit is plaque under control, healthy gums and a bright smile full of natural teeth. It's kind of hard to deny it works since my dentist has confirmed the positive results upon direct examination.Just be careful what model of these brush heads you are selecting and watch the pricing. Oral-B uses a kind of color code for the bristles, and the ones that have the colored indicator bristles in a line with the shaft are the Flexisoft model that seems to equate to medium hardness.Enjoy life</review_text>
Now that I'm writing this review, it seems silly that I'm so happy over such a small thing as a toothbrush.  But I am.  I bought this item not long after I had my first (and hopefully only) root canal and crown four years ago, something which I never again want to experience in my life (as someone else described, it was painful and expensive).  Growing up, I didn't take care of my teeth like I should've, so I'm accustomed to always being told there's either a cavity, or the start of one, and having to have more work done.After the root canal, my mom recommended a brush that had at least a certain number of pulsations/oscillations, because that's what she'd been recommended by her dentist to combat her receding gums.  This specific item met those requirements, and it was affordable.  When I first started using it, my gums were very sensitive to it, but that quickly wore off, so it seems to me that it strengthens the gums.  It is also MUCH easier to get behind the front teeth.  Subsequent dentist vists by my mom have shown that her gums have improved dramatically after using a high-quality electric toothbrush such as this one (I honestly don't remember if she has this exact model, but ours are similar), and I've not needed any work done at the dentist beyond regular cleanings since I purchased it.As far as cleaning the unit to keep it from "gunking" up, I'm the only person who uses this item, so any extra toothbrush heads are still in the package they came in, not dripping into the storage container; so I don't know how to combat that.  But I just take the toothbrush head off the thing and rinse it, then rinse the hand-held part, and set them back on the unplugged charger/base (I only plug it in when the battery runs low) and things stay clean with no problem</review_text>
This is a great product, easy to program and use.. easy to read digital display and very accurate</review_text>
I recently started Weight Watchers and was looking to purchase a new and accurate scale.  I figured I would buy a WW product, but after reading the reviews, I decided to go with the Omron scale.  I am very pleased with this product.  It has been extremely accurate.  It keeps a history for both my husband and I.  I would highly recommend this scale to anyone!  It is also an attractive scale which is a bonus.  Go with the Omron scale</review_text>
My wife had high BP, so we got this model.  The reasons for choosing this model were that:1. the upper arm monitors are supposed to be more accurate2. it was cheaper than the fully automatic models3. Omron seems to be one of the better/best brands.4. Supposedly, the pumps on the fully automatic models are prone to breaking.The unit appears well built (including the hand pump).  It is easy to operate, and it seems very accurate.  We checked its readings with an fully manual unit that we have at home, and the automatic unit at the drug store.  We find it takes very accurate and consistent readings.People with physical limitations might find the hand pump inconvenient.  Also, people with a big arm might need to buy the larger cuff.  I'm overweight right now, so the cuff barely fits my arm, but fits my wife's nicely (it was bought for her)</review_text>
It is really good enough for my need.I have no problems so far</review_text>
I eat one of these twice a week before I play ice hockey.  I specifically buy this flavor because it contains caffeine, though I don't perceive any "boost".  It could be there and I'm just not noticing it.  I feel they do the job of keeping me fueled for the workout.  It would be nice if the package made a specific recommendation about how long before a workout to eat the Clif Bar.I find the size of a Clif bar a bit disappointing, especially considering the "store" price of $1.50.  At $11 a case and with free shipping when spending $25 or more, I've not found a better price than Amazon's on Clif bars</review_text>
I have very sensitive skin and tried wet shaving with several different electrics and this shave stick beats foam and loation hands down.  As other reviewers point out the stick is made of talc in a parafin base.  It makes dry shaving extremely smooth, as smooth as shaving with foam or lotion but without any of the mess.  You can use this with any type of electric, not just Remingtons, and it's very easy to clean out, just tap it out and/or blow and/or brush.  Highly recommende</review_text>
I bought this one for my wife and she was really happy about the product.She personally like the product and really good</review_text>
This was a perfect fit for my healthy lifestyle!  What I found also very helpful was getyoursexyon.myarbonne.com it was the only thing that I never thought would be missing from trying to be healthy everyday.  Guess there's enough people vouching for my all time fav cliff bars so I wanted to spread the word, I know I wish I would have found out sooner!</review_text>
If you burn lots of calories in your activities, this high energy food could give you a lift.  There are 250 calories packed into this little 2.4 ounce bar, which is advertised to be at least 70% organic.  This bar is advertised to be for athletes first, and as a casual snack second.  If you are overweight and trying to drop pounds, you can skip this snack and move back to unbuttered popcorn.When I opened this bar I noticed that it looks like compressed goop.  However, the compressed goop tastes pretty good.  The texture is much like a granola bar, though more moist than a granola bar.  The black cherry part of the black cherry almond is understated.  There are dried cherries in this mix rather than artificial cherry flavor, which is a big plus.  I was unable to find anything in this bar that implied it was artificial, which is an even bigger plus.One thing that confused me a little is that the bar is advertised to have no wheat and no dairy, but the label on the bar states that there may be trace amounts of dairy.  I guess they either knew there might be a very small amount of dairy or they were hedging themselves because of possible cross-contamination from some other process.  In either case, vegens consider whether trace amounts of dairy makes this an acceptable product.  The label also states that there may be traces of peanuts.This bar also contains 20% of the daily recommended dietary fiber, which means drinking lots of water is a good idea when eating this bar.  There are also lots of vitamins and trace elements, which may be a good thing unless you take vitamin supplements, in which case you may need to consider whether you are getting too much of a good thing.Clif Bars could be a casual snack, but the ingredients and their marketing really suggest that they are geared toward individuals that are looking for a healthy energy boost in high energy activities.  If you fall into that category, which could include hiking, climbing, bicycling, running, jogging, and other similarly strenuous activities, then this bar could be a good way of packing a big punch in a small package.Enjoy!</review_text>
I really liked the outside design of the book. A lot of books were "cartoonish" and really was drawn to the look of the book. I wish the book did not have so much random fill-in pages. I had hoped that it would have blanks to fill in for different events/ages of the child. But all in all I am pleased with it. I would most likely buy again</review_text>
My physician introduced me to this item. He said very accurate when compaired to the water and pinching methods. Is affordable and easy to use. Oh, did I forget to mention, accurate compaired to a scale model I own. Amazon is great to order from, the online ordering was easy and the product arrived in 5 days!</review_text>
UsefulEasy to useGood priceI would recommend this product</review_text>
It does what it advertises. The bodyfat readings do fluctuate, but that's normal, it gives you a good general idea of how much bodyfat you have, and it gives a simple reading of whether your bmi with your body fat is low, normal, high, too high. I got it for about 25 bucks so good buy.</review_text>
Very handy that you can put it in your handbag wherever you go. You can use it to read those tiny words in the label when you are grocery shopping. Better than magnifier glass because the width of this bookmark covers the whole line of a page</review_text>
I own an older dispensor, from around 1999, and I was afraid that these filters wouldn't fit.  They do and seem to work fine.  I can't find a "replace" indicator on these new ones, the older filters had a sliding arrow to show when to replace them.  I guess that I just have to replace it on a calendar basis, they say the filters are good for 2 months</review_text>
I was very suprised at how small the units were (I ordered 2).  But they work great and run very quietly.  The filter is very easy to change.  I have one downstairs in the living room and one upstairs that I switch from bedroom to bedroom and the units work well in that amount of space.  I would recommend this product to anyone looking for value for their money</review_text>
I called Nature Made and inquired about their procedures to test their product for mercury. Their Fish oil is USP tested for purity and potency. There isn't any "mercury-free" fish oil, however, NM contains only .01 mcg / g of mercury. Very low level and certainly not toxic. I'm keeping my bottle of it and will take it confidently. FYI: they have a great website that contains all this information</review_text>
Doug Ritter and his foundation, Equipped to Survive, has come up with a very economic method to equip yourself and your family with an emergency kit. It is small enough to carry unnoticed in a pocket, yet fully functional.Although you can control the amount of certain items if you put together your own kit (something of a rite of passage among the survivalists/emergency preparedness folk), I spent twice as much putting together a comparable kit. The military issue sparklite and tinder-quick, Fox-40 whistle, and Rescue Flash signal mirror alone could cover the cost of the kit and they are all top notch gear. This pack is extremely high quality through and through, from choice of equipment to packing and instructions. I recommend looking at the ETS website at the slideshow of how such a kit is put together and what Doug Ritter himself recommends that you add to the kit (the pouch can hold a few more small items such as water purification tabs).The Pocket Survival Pack is an amazing value. I've purchased all of the items separately, and just the shipping or driving to pick up 3 or 4 of the items probably covers half the cost! If you are lucky enough to get everything at one store, you'd be hard pressed to get the entire kit as cheap as this. I know people who have purchased this kit to take the parts for their own self-built survival kits! That's how economical it is. Plus, if you buy this PSP, a portion of the proceeds goes to the ETS non-profit group which gives free survival consulting to deployed troops and is actively involved in improving survival equipment and standards. In fact, Doug Ritter is the only consumer advocate working with the governing body on personal locator beacons used in marine, aviation, and remote travel.The kit itself comes in a waterproof container. I found it to be a bit tight when closing back up, but there is actually some room for more items. All components are of the highest quality. It's lightweight and I never notice it in a pocket. With the recommended ETS or similar keychain LED flashlight and a good pocket folding knife, you have a complete survival kit that rivals ones costing $100+. These are cheap enough to get one for each car and any camping/hiking/marine/aviation gear you might have. I highly recommend this PSP. I'm not affiliated with ETS, but I've come to appreciate their no-nonsense advice and forums. And if this was a bad kit, I'd still say so. I give it 5 stars, great value for the price and it really could save your life</review_text>
Bought this to help make muddy paw print clean up a little quicker.  This works well, my better half thinks I have an obsession with Mr. Swiffer... :) It does leave a haze on the floor though.  I use the recommended 3 sec. cleaner dispense...maybe it's because I don't change the pads ofter enough.  Overall, I would purchase the Swiffer again if I had too</review_text>
Clean, fresh, subtle scent; not at all flowery, musky, or heavy; just a clean, fresh, beautiful scent; haven't found anything better, and the price is nice, too</review_text>
I received this parfum as a birthday gift and I fell in love with it as soon as I smelled it.  The scent lasts all day without being too overbearing. I swear every single time I wear this, someone stops me and asks what am I wearing.  The fragrance is crisp and sensual.  It kind of reminds me of Bath & Body Works' Moonlight Path. Buy it, you won't regret it, especially for the price that Amazon is offering it for</review_text>
I bought Calvin Klein For Women parfum as a Christmas gift to my sister. To see the smile on her face at Christmas when she opened her gift, was priceless. As for the cost, it was much less than the department stores at the local mall's. Thank you Amazon for a great deal!</review_text>
I love these LUVS! They are remarkably thin. Easy to pull out of the wipe warmer, yet still very durable and pliable. However, they are also remarkably difficult to find locally. So buy in bulk when you can find them.</review_text>
These wipes are just as soft and durable as Pampers, but much less expensive! They are not alcohol-free, unfortunately - though I have noticed that those wipes which are alcohol-free contain citric acid (fyi). Quick, free delivery</review_text>
I suffer from upper back and shoulder tension.  I've been using neck warmers for years but recently lost the only one I had.  After looking at many warmers, I chose the Happy Wrap.  The wrap stays warm for more than an hour and has the moist heat which is perfect for tense muscles.  My Yorkshire Terrier can't wait until I'm done using it and fights with the cat to get it when I'm finished.</review_text>
I purchased the Revlon Facial Steamer, this was my first purchase on line and I am very satisfied with the steamer and the service I received from amazon. The steamer is great I use it when I give myself a facial, I have not use the nail kit yet.</review_text>
I really like this product because it's compact and easy to use. Now that wouldn't be important if it didn't work properly, but it does, so I have everything in one small, easy-to-carry package.  That's a valuable feature for one who's on the go as much as I am.The greatest thing about this product is that it's ACCURATE; I always take it to the Dr's office with me and compare his results with the results of this dynamite little monitor.I liked it so well, after I tried it, I went back and bought one for a friend who was recently diagnosed with high blood pressure.Highly recommended, but I also recommend that you compare your results with your doctor's.  After all, it's only a machine ... and like cars, you can always get a "lemon.</review_text>
I received this chair very quickly, even though it was close to Christmas. The chair was wonderful! Such a great price for such a great chair</review_text>
I have been using Source of Life Energy Shake for many years.  I recommend one scoop in 8 oz. of orange juice or milk twice a day.   Basically, I pour the milk in a shaker cup and put the scoop on top, close the shaker and shake for a few seconds.   This stuff tastes great and has loads of healthy vitamins, herbs, minerals, and more!     A few months ago, I actually used this drink to cut down on my Starbuck's daily double shot of expresso!   Guess a Source of Life Starbucks Latte would be great, maybe I'll try that someday!  This product deserves more than 5 stars and it is absolutely a great product in every way.   If you are looking for a healthy energy drink that tastes good, you have found it</review_text>
My grandfather found a vial of Old Spice in his Navy kit when he joined in 1943. He continued using it after the war and my father picked it up when he himself came of age. I began shaving about ten years ago and choice was obvious: Old Spice is conservative and masculine, distinct and time-honored. It's not a trend; it's a statement of manhood. If Proctor &amp; Gamble obliges, my own grandkids will be using it</review_text>
I am so happy with this product. I have chronic stomach trouble and this enzyme product has saved me from many days and nights of upset stomach. If I eat too late at night or eat the "wrong" thing, I just pop a couple capsules and no problems for the night</review_text>
This is a great barber-style setup... it comes with a lot of guides and has a little case.  They even give you a garbage bag.  Good dea</review_text>
I love this product. In combination with diet and exercise I have lost about 5 pounds, and I wasn't heavy to begin with (all I wanted to do was tone up). Instead of taking the recommended dosage of 2 capsules twice a day, I am taking 1 twice a day. I figured I'd take it slow before I get too jittery. But it definitely curbs my appetite. I literally eat half of my usual intake. It gives me energy without making me feel like I'm wired and I haven't had any shaking hands. I only had headaches for the first 2 days I took this, but now they are completely gone. I will continue to take this even after I reach my goal weight. It's a great product.</review_text>
I rate (Green tea Fat Burner) 5 star. becauseI bot another called Lipoxinol 70.00) and I bot another one called   (Green tea fat furner) and it was better in quality wise and its only 14.99 at Costco.Lipoxinol is very good as well but more expesive . bot off amazon.it sais its ( made canada) derctions say to take 4 pills in AM & 4pills  PM. and man there great.the (green tea fat burners)  in comparison dictions say take 2 pillsAM & 2pills PM. I over rall I think  (green tea fat burner) makes me a little bit more hyper. the more hyper the more stuff I do ,that means the more excerise I get,,,,,You will see Lipoxinal on amazon. its 4 star, this one has less rating for some reason ,not many people said much about it, wierd ,Americans like to pay more money when ,this one can work just as great, not all work tho, but like I said this one was great for me in wise, I bot both,dont go off telling every one u are taking weight loss pills because people will get worryed, like theres no problem ,people drink Coffee every day of there life, I told my mom and she thot I was crazy, but what dose my mom know, she never tryed weight loss pills, I tryed ntoher one from the natral food store call Mini skiny fat burner and I felt like I just shot my self with cocane, so be carfull ,earbs have been used for thousand of years and can make u drug crazy,</review_text>
This product does make the appetite disappear!! However it made me very irritable while I took it. I took it for four days so I did not give it enough time to see how the fat burning part worked. The pills were also very long and caused me throat irritation. Everyone is affected differently when taking things so I would say give it a try you will notice the effects right away.</review_text>
IT'S AMAZING HOW A LITTLE COMMON SENSE CAN TURN INTO A MILLION YOU KNOW WHAT'S. AS SOON AS I TRIED THESE I REALIZED HOW MUCH BETTER THEY ARE THAN THE USUAL THROAT LOZENGES. WHY? BECAUSE OTHERS CAUSE YOU TO SUCK ON THEM, AND THIS STRAINS YOUR THROAT MUSCLES, WHICH IS BAD. GUMMI LOZENGES, IT'S GENIUS. WHY DIDN'T I THINK OF IT. THEN AGAIN, I DID, BUT I DIDN'T CREATE AIRBORNE WHICH IS WONDERFUL IN ITSELF. REALLY, THESE LOZENGERS ARE GREAT. AT NIGHT IF YOU USE ONE THEY JUST STAY PRETTY MUCH STUCK TO THE SIDE OF YOUR THROAT AND YOU CAN FALL ASLEEP WITHOUT EVEN THE THOUGHT THAT YOU COULD SHALLOW IT AND CHOKE. JUST REMEMBER HOW LONG IT TAKES FOR A NORMAL LOZENGE TO DISOLVE WITHOUT BITTING IT ( EVEN THEN ). THESE GO PRETTY QUICK, AND WITHOUT CREWING ( WHICH IS THE BEST WAY TO USE THEM ). I MYSELF TRY TO ALWAYS HAVE THEM IN THE HOUSE. YOU SHOULD, AND WILL DO THE SAME AFTER YOU TRY THEM. ALSO THE PRICE ON AMAZON IS THE BEST. I'M ABOUT TO ORDER 10 BOXES ( WOULD ORDER MORE BUT FOR THE SHIPPING CHARGE, WHICH EVEN WITH IS STILL CHEAPER THEN TARGET ). MAYBE THE OWNER SHOULD PUT ME ON THE PAYROLL.</review_text>
27 ounces is a nice size, the bottle is light (can be dented), and water stored in it tastes very good....and that will be even more welcome in the summer when a hot plastic water bottle in the car will taste lousy!Another reviewer mentioned a squeal......that would be while twisting the cap on or off. I've gotten used to that. Wish it was just a hair thinner to fit in my Toyota cupholder...that may not be an issue with Toyotas that are newer than mine are (10 & 15years).In the car, on the nightstand ,in the canoe or kayak.....it's working for me</review_text>
We love this new power toothbrush because it does a great job cleaning the teeth and it has so much more power than our old brush</review_text>
I purchased this toothbrush for my 2 young daughters.  It's a great brush head for pediatric (and adult) mouths. They swap out the heads, it's rechargeable and I can stop purchasing junky kids battery-operated toothbrushes every 1-2 months after the batteries wear down.  I have used this toothbrush for myself for the past 3 years and no longer have a problem with receding gums or plaque build-up</review_text>
I used to own a brush from another manufacturer.  It never brushed well: the heads wore out waaaaaaaay too quickly.  I just never felt I was getting a good brush.After using this brush for about a couple of months, I went in for a regular checkup.  My dentist told me my teeth had never looked better.  That's all the testimony I need</review_text>
I like the 4 brush holder and the power and brushing action of this model.  The kids find the 30 second interval timer especially helpful to keep moving around the mouth.  It's a bit louder than the older model, probably because it's got an additional motion, and the blue charging light is bright enough for a night light.Overall, just what we wanted</review_text>
Daughter was very pleased when she received it unexpectedly, after her good news! She's very picky also...just loved the quality and organizational value of the set! Very nicely packaged. Would highly recommend</review_text>
I was skeptical about buying this at first, but after seeing it in Allure, and reading the various reviews on amazon, I decided to try it.I have to say, I was pleasantly surprised; it does what it says. It won't work on cyctic acne or if the pimple has already come to a head. It does work on pimples that are just beginning.. those hard, tender knots deep under your skin you just know are going to be huge in a day or two. I've used it on two pimples that were red bumps, and both were mostly gone within 24 hours. Completely gone in less than 3 days. Usually it would have taken 7-10 days for them to go away, and it would have been UGLY</review_text>
i love this product...it is so well worth the money if you're experiencing a skin problem.  easy to use, portable, no lotions or creams needed...just my little leather case</review_text>
Heats up fast, rolls up easily (doesn't slip like old-school hot rollers used to), and stays on with the right hot roller clips. Depending on the look I'm looking for, I use 4 or up to 8 rollers for my chin-length fine hair, keep them on for 10 minutes while I put on my makeup, and voila! Soft, strokeable voluminous hair</review_text>
I use these almost every morning. They're hot and ready to go in seconds. I like the nonslip surface of the curlers. Makes it so easy to set my hair, remove, and go in a matter of minutes and still have a really nice style. I like having 12 *large* rollers to handle my thick, long hair. These rollers rock</review_text>
The lisse crepe microfiber hair turbans from aquis are very soft, absorbant, and they dry quickly. The "diva darling" hair towels are not quite as nice.Hair turbans stay neatly on your head and are more convenient than a big fluffy towel. If the turban gets sopping wet, that means it's doing its job!My parents taught me it's impolite to come to breakfast without a towel covering my wet hair. This turban is not only great at home, but also in college dorms.</review_text>
This product works well, it takes a while to warm up but it can keep my feet nice and warm once it gets going.</review_text>
Always saw them at the mall and wanted one, it was nice to be able to get it on here and not have to search, works great! feels wonderful!!! especially when you get that headache!!!, also doubles as a contemporary hat!! haha, love it</review_text>
I love The Tingler! Each metal tip feels great.  I personally like the COPPER version a little better than the SILVER version.  It's a little gentler and softer but I know some people find it too soft and like the SILVER version instead.  Before the tingler, sometimes I would use one end of my glasses (the end that fits over the ear) but of course my glasses are fragil and I would risk damaging them.  It also feels really good on the back and actually all over, not just on the head</review_text>
I am totally satisfied with thids product so far. Of course if the batteries run out of charge after a few charges I will be dissatisfied. I expect them to last tens of reusses if experience can be of any guideline</review_text>
Great aerobic exerciser for the money and very lightweight.  Let cool down after using as metal does get a bit hot.  The plastic leg stoppers do stink a bit, yet the plastic will off-gas.  Works best on couch while watching TV/Movies.  For anyone who is disabled or uninspired to work out, I highly recommend this to help get you back into shape</review_text>
I have fought with my naturally curly crazy hair for all of my life..I have tried more products that I care to mention..but I do love this product! It truly delivers what it promises...frizz free,loose, non-stiff curls!  I just get out of the shower, towel dry very lightly, put it on and voila! Makes my curls looks sexy!</review_text>
I love this product.  Its the first one I've found where I can practically have wash and go curly hair.  Just put work it through damp hair and let it air dry or twist around fingers for defined curls</review_text>
I'm sixty years old and I have been using this product for years. When I had my yearly physical the Doc ask me if I used anything because my skin looks so good. RoC delivers!!!</review_text>
clothes are soft and smell great works just as good as any fabric softener out there and better for you, your family, and the enviroment</review_text>
I just got my first case of this fabric softener last week and yesterday, I was walking downstairs when the smell of lavender hit me - I was surprised because I hadn't sprayed any lavender freshener in the air, when I realized that my boyfriend was doing a load of laundry.  Like Seventh Generation's lavender laundry detergent, I love this product - if you use them in tandem, not only do your clothes smell like *real* lavender (not the chemically-based smells of mainstream products), but they come out clean and soft.  I especially like the lavender smell for my sheets and blankets and it's gentle enough to use on my baby's clothes, too!  I love that it's made with natural products and real lavender essential oil.  It's also safe for my septic system, so I'm sold on this product.  If you're sensitive to the chemical-based scents of the mainstream fabric softeners or can't find one that smells good to you, try this one!</review_text>
This replaced a similar wrist cuff meter which I was not happy with.  The old meter would give very different readings on measurements made minutes apart.  This meter yields essentially the same numbers for second measurements.  Out of curiosity, I took it with me to my doctors office, used his large cuff (I have very large arms) and compared the readings to his equipment.  Total difference was about 3%, a quite acceptable tolerance for my home measurement.  Another reviewer was unhappy with the screen size and position on the bottom of the wrist.  If the unit is operated as shown in the instructions, the screen size and position are perfect, the unit is at heart level, and is quite easy to read.Overall, for home use and serious data collection and blood pressure monitoring, I like this device</review_text>
I love the this set ,expecially the nail cutter, I,m still using mine after six years</review_text>
I saw these here and ordered two pair to get the free shipping deal.  I should get a deal where I get a cut of the customers I send them because EVERY day I have my customers (several each day) ask me what's going on with my glasses and where did I get them.I used to go through several pair of reading glasses a month.  Now I have had these two pair for ...gosh, It's got to be close to a year now!  They don't scratch, break, get lost, they're always right there.  I don't know how I did with out them for so long.Get a couple of pairs you'll love them.  Oh, one thing when the ladies try them on thier hair doesn't always set right with the wrap around thingy.  But I don't know that this can't be overcome....so...something to consider</review_text>
I have been using this attachment to my waterpik for gum disease for five years----it directs the medicine into the gum pockets easily and helps save me from really big bills at the periodontist.  It works for me, but needs to be used in conjunction with regular flossing, brushing, and generally good tooth care.</review_text>
I love this.  Everyone can have their own data and we can track our own progress.  It is very simple to use and the explanations are clear</review_text>
Great enginering, design and craftmanship; works great every day; but I had to throw away a travel size "Waterpick" after 18 months, because it is impossible to obtain a replacement hose assembly from the manufacturer or anywhere else. It doesn't make any sense to supply an irreplaceable disposable part, on an equipment designed to outlast it three times</review_text>
I use it for the water pic function in addition to the sinus rinse tool I purchased.  Works great!</review_text>
This simple scale is light, easy to carry and store.I tested it thoroughly when it arrived against my older dial scale. It read the same weight, but actually with less flucuation when I shifted on it. I was careful to keep it on a flat surface... I had good luck on old hardwood floors, less luck on our old bumpy tile floors in the bathroom.It was very consistent on a level surface... I tested it several times in a row with the same reading, and various times throughout the day... nothing read unusually.I really like the form factor of this scale. It's so small... Not small spacewise, but just thin, light, with a nice solid place to plant your feet</review_text>
I'am very satisfied with the Vidal Sassoon hairdryer. There are 3 heat settings and tips in the enclosed booklet on how to use these settings. It is a little bulky but it doesn't take long to get used to a larger dryer. I would recommend this hair dyer</review_text>
good shaver lots of battery life quick charge lots of trim setting and gives a good uniform cu</review_text>
I bought this for my boyfriend and he uses it for his facial hair and to shave his head.  Its very easy to clean and does a great job</review_text>
Very nice trimmer. My hat off to Remington. I have been using this trimmer on both my hair and beard. It words perfectly and is much better than changing spacers</review_text>
This is the best and easiest to use back brush!  I have trouble reaching my back and washclothes just didn't do it but with this brush no more missed spots.  Just hang it up and it dries and is ready for the next time.  Never felt so clean</review_text>
I rate this piece of equipment as 4 stars because I have not used it enough to know if it does everything it claims....however I have been amazed at how this little contraption does wonders on my back.When I first got this lumbar extender I set up up in about 2 seconds and then stretched backwards to lay on it. OMG, as I laid down it was like I couldn't even breath for a brief second. To actually feel my back being forced into shape nearly took my breath away as all the muscles were pushed around. I had to relax and it was amazing how sore the muscles in my back were from leaning over my computer at work.Having used it for about a month now, my back has started to feel much better and I am sleeping better too</review_text>
For two years I suffered with four herniated discs.   Physical therapy, a spinal injection , chiropractic adjustments, and many sessions on a spinal decompression machine provided short term relief.  I started using the McKenzie Method extension exercises, and this offered the most relief.  Fortunately, I finally discovered the Lumbar Extender in an internet ad.  I noticed that it placed the spine in a similar position as the McKenzie exercises.  So, I decided to order the Lumbar Extender to determine if it would provide better relief than all the other methods I was using.The first two weeks that I used the Lumbar Extender, I had some minor discomfort.  Now after five weeks using the Lumbar Extender, I can honestly say that my back has not felt better in two years.  This device does all that it says it will do.  I actually enjoy lying on it for two seven-minute sessions each day-one session in the morning and one session at night.When I first used the device, I heard snapping noises in my lower back, probably the spinal facets being repositioned, and then I would experience immediate relief.  Now I feel as if I have better posture and better curvature to my lumbar region.  The cost of the Lumbar Extender is low compared to a visit to a doctor, and it is worth trying.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
Since having back problems, especially waking up in the morning, this Lumbar Extender works wonders for my back. I can easily have a good start for the day from now on!!  Many thanks. B</review_text>
THE BAD NEWS FIRST: DOESN'T SEEM TO WORK WELL WITHOUT ADDING EXTRA DETERGENTIt seems like this is NOT 3x concentration, and like others we found we had to compensate by adding more detergent than the directions said to get the same results as we did with the standard formula. Otherwise, the two products, 'concentrated' and 'standard srength' are the same.MAKE NO MISTAKE ABOUT IT - THIS IS CONCENTRATED & COMES OUT LIKE HEINZ KETCHUP:It does seem to be concentrated, and we did notice a certain amount of difficulty getting the detergent out of the bottle, kind of reminded us of Heinz ketchup.4-STAR or 5-STAR PRODUCT?The standard strength product is clearly a 5-STAR product, however owing to the fact that this product does not work as well without adding more detergent than the direction claim, it rates 4-STARs with our family.TRYING TO LEARN OBJECTIVE INFO ON LAUNDRY DETERGENT IS WELL . . . .THE FOLLOWING IS TRUE OF THIS PRODUCT IN STANDARD STRENGTH or 3X WITH EXTRA DETERGENT ADDED:I am allergic to most laundry detergents, but this product has prevented severe discomfort for me for about 10 years. It is consistently among the lowest-priced detergents available. In addition to being very easy on clothes and skin, it does work quite well in the stain-removal department and can be used as its own presoak. This is good to know if you are like me and are trying to avoid allergens. It is important to remember that if you buy a hypoallergenic powder detergent instead of a liquid like this, you may have to pre-soak stains and you won't have a hypoallergenic liquid with which to do it. While "Tide" and "Cheer" are also available in hypoallergenic formulas,["Tide Free" is actually just unscented] they are considerably more expensive and work no better in my experience. That's why I like this "All Liquid Detergent - Free Clear, Laundry Detergent".OBJECTIVE INFORMATION IS TOUGH TO FIND!I actually did conduct a hard target search for true, objective information on laundry detergents. There is very little beyond which brand causes pollution which, while important, is not what I was trying to find. "Consumer Reports" does have test comparisons of the most popular brands in its monthly magazine every couple of years and they do include some detail.ABOUT "ALL'S WEBSITE"If you are looking for this product's website it is under "Unilever" and you will have to specify "USA" under products, as the word "ALL" will show up in almost every search result. You will find "WISK" and "BREYER'S ICE CREAM" and almost as many neat name brand products as you would at Procter and Gamble's site.[I AM NOT AFFILIATED WITH ANY PRODUCT OR COMPANY]</review_text>
It is not one of the stain removers , which instantly gets rid of the stain.So when you spill over something over your t-shirt, you got to spill this TIDE STAIN REMOVER on it as well so it does make sure that your cloth wouldnt be clogged with STAIN but its not an immedieate relief solution</review_text>
I was 5 minutes early getting out of the house to go to work one morning so I decided I could stop by a coffee shop and get a mocha. On my way back to my car the mocha "splooshed" out of the sipping hole in the to-go lid and got all over my sweater...naturally, that day it was a white silk knit sweater. So I had these large dark brown coffee/chocolate stains, and a decision to make about whether to make myself extremely late to work by going home to change.The cafe was next to a supermarket so I decided to go buy a Tide to Go pen and give it a try. I applied it as directed to the stain and immediately the stain lightened noticeably. I was a bit worried because after treatment there were still light tan stains visible, but after blotting the excess liquid and letting the sweater dry while wearing for about half an hour, there was no hint that any mocha had ever touched my sweater.The cleansing agent also gets points for not damaging my silk sweater, despite the fact I was rubbing the product in fairly vigorously (out of desperation...I was going to be late for work!)I'm not sure how it would work on other stains but I will keep one in my purse from now on. On the packaging it does identify which sorts of stains it works best on, and which it will be less effective on. From other reviews this will not work so well on some common food stains, so that's why I'm giving 4 stars and not 5.Another minor concern is the warning about blotting the fluid if fabric will come into contact with direct sunlight. It doesn't say what will happen if you allow saturated fabric to see sunlight. Perhaps there is the potential for color/fabric damage</review_text>
I can say before I started to use this product I was always afraid of wearing white clothings but Tide to Go has totally changed everything.  Initially I thought this was just a gimmick but I thought it was worth a try,...soo...I bought it with me during our two-week trip with my parents in August..and it came handy...My dad bought a brand new white jacket and had it put on immediately and then decided to drink a cup of coffee..unfortunately, he spilled the coffee on the white jacket when he tried to open the lid to put sugar in it...my mother immediately wiped the coffee off with napkins..the coffee stain, however, was still there...Then..I remember I had put a Tide-to-Go in my purse...I immediately used it on all coffee stains on the white jacket...and to my surpise, all the brown spots resulted from the coffee spill were GONE...amazing..I have used this on different kind of food stains.  I've used it on Coffee stain, spaghetti sauce stain, juice stain and they all worked.  My mother, my mother-in-law, and my sister-in law they were all so amazed at the result that they all asked me for one to carry with them.  Nowadays I don't leave home without one in my purse..I used to be afraid of wearing white clothings, I am no longer afraid of wearing whites because of Tide-to-Go..this is definitely a useful product to carry with you everywhere you go..oh..as far as the smell goes..The smell is bearable to me...and in order to use it you have to push it down to get the actual fluid to flow out through the tip of the Tide-to-Go marker.</review_text>
This product is so good for you.  I sprinkle it on my cereal, salads, in yogurt, etx.  A nice nutty flavor.  And the health benefits are outstanding.   I highly recommend this product</review_text>
The Satinelle Ice Epilator does exactly what it is supposed to do: remove hair quickly and efficiently by the root. What an advantage! Hair does not reappear as quickly as it does shaving, and when it does, it is not the sharp stubble that happens with shaving.I don't think it hurts much, though some spots may be a bit more sensitive than others. The trick then is to simply lift it up off of the skin and stop momentarily.I am very happy with this product</review_text>
I boutght this razor for my husband.  He likes it, but notes that it is hard to clean and does not get the longer whiskers, which he seems to miss a lot.  I think that if he shaved more carefully, he would get these whiskers before they get too long!  I think that for the price (lower end of price range), it does a pretty good job.  Next time, I'll buy him a more expensive one and hope that it performs better.</review_text>
This stuff is AWESOME for hangovers. It was like my high school staple! I mean, I went through like a box a week. At least give it a try</review_text>
My husband tried this after I bought it and he loves it.  It is a great remedy for a hangover or even just a bad morning.  It is very hard to find in most drugstores.  Now I just buy it on the internet.  I've even recommended it to friends who now swear buy it</review_text>
I love this product! I deal with a lot of stress (dont' we all) and was feeling edgy and nervous all the time. I couldnt' even enjoy my grandkids. Since I started taking Calm Advantage those feelings are gone and I can relax and enjoy life again. I would definately recommend it to anyone</review_text>
Bought this for my husband who has a 2 hour (one way) commute by bus to work.  He loves it.  Now he can nap without waking up with a cramp in his neck.  It is very portable, with a small carrying case and is easy to blow-up.  A bargain for the price</review_text>
This is a great iron for a starter, but will not do it like a stylist. I have had it for at least 2 years so it will last also. The price is a little bit to high I only paid $ 19.99 for it at Walmart.I know everyone has gotten used to shopping online because it is eay and always open, but I have to tell you that most of the things I have found on amazon are priced way to high. They used to be a great spot to get good stuff cheap but that is no longer true. I think it just kind of creeped up on us without us noticing what was going on. Please folks go back out in to the world and start looking you will see that I am not wrong</review_text>
I have not try Proactive. The thought of buying something from an infomercial just doesn't sit well with me.  I, however, have tried many many products since my 20s till now (I'm 35). I spent thousands of dollars on expense department store's brands like Clarins, Seshiedo, Dior, Clinics, Chanel, and Prescriptives. I've also religiously go to my derma every three weeks for the past ten years to have facials, extractions, and chemical peels.  I tried perscription cream, oitments, pads, you name it (even thought of laser).  I have mild acne problem year round, and it only gets worst during that time of the month (that's when I'd run out and try new products).Three days ago I bought the Zeno.  I'm going to return it.  It did nothing to me accept thought it would burn me.  I also bought AcneFree and today I went back and bought another package to put in my gym bag.  Three days now, I've noticed my skin cleared up! I'm amazed.  I'm not giving it a 5 star because my skin is not completely cleared.  I'll give it a try two more weeks and will update my rating if it improve.  So far AcneFree works for me</review_text>
Great product, the girls had a blast with it.  Real easy to use and real easy to put the gems back in the jeweler once you take them out of your hair.  Great fun for girls who enjoy dressing up and getting bedazzled!  Although it kinds of pulls a piece of hair or two out when you try and slide them out of your hair.  Not all the time though.  Still a fabulous product.  Would highly recommend it.  My niece wishes it came with more gems</review_text>
This is great-my daughter looks for reasons to use and wear the quick gems</review_text>
These items are neat little towelettes that come in their own attractive and useful plastic container. They are very handy, and work wonders for insuring cleanliness. Personally, I sure wish I had had these when my first two children were small.On the down side, flushing these things *can* result in plumbing problems, as I experienced. Apparently, if your sewer line is relatively new and clear, they should give you no problems. But, if your system has any place in it where things can collect, you will face problems. According to my plumber, toilet paper begins to break down quite quickly, but these towelettes can take over a month to do so. (My house was built in 1916!)So, overall, I do like this product, and I recommend it. I just recommend that if you live in an older house, that you do not flush them</review_text>
My hair gets weighed down very easily by finishing/smoothing products -- they will leave my hair looking flat and greasy instead of smooth. My hair is very fine, but also thick (which is very annoying). This finishing solution leaves my hair very smooth without weighing it down. It seems very expensive for such a small bottle, but a little goes a long way (I've had the same bottle for nearly a year and it's still not finished). Definitely spritz it into your hands and not directly into your hair because it does not disperse at all. The scent is very light and refreshing and not at all overwhelming.</review_text>
Shaving cream in a tube is just about impossible to buy at retail outlets. This is a great product and I will continue to buy it through Amazon</review_text>
There is no better shaving cream. I am disappointed you are out of stock</review_text>
It doesnt quit dark circles, but helps against wrinkles while it is on your face</review_text>
i tried all the possible creams on the market, cheap and expensive, for my dark circles but this is the only one that worked imediately. i cannot live without it, this is a keeper. it stings a little bit, not all the time but it does. it says that it should only be used twice a day but if i've had a really tiring week and i'm in a rush to look good i use it up to five six times a day, just a tiny film and with 2 hours between them. i guarantee that in three days you'll not recognize yourself(in a good way). very important: it tends to dry the skin under the eyes very much so be sure to aplly after a very good cream( i use pure chamomile cream)and leave it over night. well, follow my recipe and you'll shine fast, you'll see</review_text>
For any one who loses their reading glasses or doesn't know where to put them these glasses work great.  The magnet is strong and the glasses comfortable.  This is especially true on the beach.  They are what they claimed to be</review_text>
These seem to be an excellent product.  There is little or not leakage.The wipes were a nice treat</review_text>
I ordered these disposable pampers for my son.  They are great.  I ordered them and recieved free 2 day shipping</review_text>
These are by far the BEST newborn size diapers especially for small babies, but if you order them through Amazon, your baby may outgrow them before they even arrive!  I waited 5 weeks then cancelled the order and ordered size 1, which Actually arrived in a few days!Update: I have ordered Pampers again through Amazon (different size) and they shipped right away</review_text>
I lost six pounds in eleven days.  I started out taking one-half pill in the morning and one-half in the afternoon.  I was wary of any reaction.  I now take one pill in the morning and one in the afternoon.  That's enough for me.  I have a lot more energy and am motivated to exercise.  No side effects whatsoever.  My problem was the munchies at night watching TV -- and that craving is gone.  I highly recommend this product</review_text>
Read the reviews and picked the elephant for my 17m old child's nusery. I absolutely love it. Before this, my son could not sleep well with our "family's" humiifier because it was too noisy. Within an hour of bringing this home, it was set up (very easily) and he took one of many 2 1/2 hour naps that week! No filters, No noise, NO PROBLEMS thus far! I did have it on high for the first 20 mins and found a puddle of water underneath, but the humidifier was near a window, and i am asumming there was a draft that may have directed the steam toward the dresser top. (The problem was resolved once moved unto a different surfacetop) Filling it is a snap and the very fine mist (looked like small stream of fog) was a pleasure to see out of the trunk of the animal! The tank seems to last longer than the box states. It is on it's third day on a low/med setting and it still only has a 3 inch difference at the top. I love the safety features and I don't have to worry about the tank still on if it's empty since it has an automatic shut off! The light is not a problem since he likes to have a tiny bit of light in his room. It is a design that will last thoughout his childhood! Thank you Crane!</review_text>
That's the only way I can rate this product. If it taste great, then it gets a high rating from me</review_text>
It seems to be doing the job....my next dental check will tell. It's a little awkward at first getting used to the brush (quite a bit different from the conventional brush); and I think though they tell you to hold the handle with two fingers only (thumb and forefinger) that you do have to tilt the brush a little to get the gumline. And I still do find a little tartar on my teeth. So, you decide</review_text>
great tooth brush.my dentist said my gums and teeth have never looked bette</review_text>
It takes some getting used to, but once you do you will love it.  It leaves my teeth cleaner than any toothbrush, electric or other, that I have ever used.  You feel at first like it is totally strange (it is!).  Doesn't take more than a few times using it to realize that it's a great concept and so much faster than anything else.I have no buyers remorse.  I Just wish that changing the brushes on it were simpler so one brush could be shared with another person.  You really are best to have one per person with this one since changing the brush a lot is a hassle</review_text>
I bought one of these to squeege the water out of my past-shoulder-length hair.  It works great!  I gotta admit, it's just big enough for my head and I have a teeny little cranium so normal adults would probably prefer to buy the "extra large" size towel (which isn't really all that large.</review_text>
THese are marvelous!!  I had gotten a different style last February for mothers,,these adventure towels are great for the dorm and college kids...I love the snap strap and the pouch.  Now all of my children want them, too!!  Also love the up to date colors!</review_text>
This water jet is excellent.  It allows you to have a separate chamber for water and mouthwash.  It also comes with different attachments for your gums, teeth and tongue.  Excellent product at an excellent price</review_text>
i have used this supplement for more than five years at the suggestion of a herbalist.  i have never felt better.  not only does it seem to help keep those colds away, it seems to keep me more health feeling and less tired</review_text>
I AM VERY SATISFIED WITH MY PURCHASE OF THE WOODEN FOOT ROLLER MASSAGER. IT GIVES YOU A RELAXED FEELING FOR SORE AND TIRED FEET.I DISCOVERD THAT IF YOU TURN IT ON THE OTHER SIDE, YOU CAN ALSO USE IT ON YOUR ARMS AND LEGS BY HOLDING IT</review_text>
I got this for my daughter for Christmas.  She loves it. She is able to do her nail easily.  The nail attachments work really well and strong, the only thing the attachments for callous do not really work that well they have to be at a certain angle and work so so, but the rest of the attachments are excellent certainly worth the price for those alone.Compact size, easy to store and quick charge time</review_text>
These are great for those days you just want to sit in the sun and read without sun glare. Great product</review_text>
Upon recommendation from other consumers, I purchased these rollers. I travel a great deal for my job and get-aways with my husband . The rollers heat up well and are compact. I just keep them in my suitcase all the time so I'm ready to go</review_text>
My husband is very pleased with his "self-cleaning" razor, although he didn't like the idea of having to keep purchasing the cleaning solution packs. It's an excellant appliance</review_text>
I purchased this for my husband. He hates to shave everyday and now he can without the razor burn. It is even as close a shave as if he used a razor! I saw it on the Consumers Number One pick for foil shavers and I am glad I went with their reccomendation</review_text>
I bought this razor over a year ago, and I wouldn't trade it in for any other razor out there. It really does leave your skin super smooth. I love the triple blades on it so I know I can get a close, comfortable shave, even in hard to reach places. Thanks to the pivoting head, it moves with the curves of your legs without the worries of getting cut. It's also excellent for shaving the underarm area. I find that one stroke is all it takes, and you have a smooth appearance you have to feel and see to believe. This is truly a remarkable product for the women out there who are tired of shaving every other day, or more than three times a week. With this razor, it shaves so close to the hair follicle, you will be shaving in less time, less often. I will never part with my Venus razor. The best part is - it's a bargain for what you get!</review_text>
When I found out that Contradiction was no longer going to be sold in the US I thought I would never find this again. It's my boyfriend's favorite cologne and I was determined to find it. Thanks to Amazon, he has his sexy scent back. lo</review_text>
Best hair dryer ever. I have long, thick, curly, frizzy hair and after just drying my hair for less then 10 minutes with the Conair 213X, my hair is shiny and soft. The diffuser is also amazing; I can wear my hair naturally without any frizz.By far the best dryer out there in this price range. Granted, it's heavy, but it cuts my drying time in half and I don't have to style after drying which is another plus! It has a warm heat setting which is awesome and what could make it prettier than the Rhinestones?</review_text>
I purchased this hairdryer after my professional Conair Yellowbird from the late 70's broke.  I definitely wanted another Conair and I wanted to move into the 21st Century!  I did the research and this hairdryer had the most features for the best price.  I wasn't disappointed.  As the other reviewers have stated, this hairdryer dries your hair in half the time!  It's also nice to reduce the static in your hair when you want to freshen up and are "dry brushing" your hair.  It does draw a lot of power when on high heat and the highest blowing setting and the lights in my dressing room will dim.  Otherwise, it is very solidly built and I hope to have this hairdryer for another 30 years.</review_text>
Oral B has always been top notch for me and this 8900 DLX is just fantastic.My teeth are so bad the Dentist always called me the plaque king  lolbut after 6 months on this I went to the next cleaning and they saw a huge improvement.He calls me by my name now thanks to this product hahaI have been putting this thing to the test for about a year now and I love it...I keep it on the spinning setting which really works well.do remember that if you turn it on without it in your mouth, you spray water everywhere and the spin setting really makes a fine mist with some power but its still a top notch product.thanks Oral B!!</review_text>
This is a great product. a friend told me about it. i finally decided to get one. i had bleeding gums. in two weeks of regular use, bleeding has stopped and i can see that my teeth is getting whiter and and my gums are great. just be careful when using the water jet side. you must turn it on with the flossing part in your mouth, or it will spray all over the place :</review_text>
Great and accurate.  It is a pleasure to use.Best monitor available</review_text>
I have dry, course hair that certainly gets even drier in the Colorado climate. I have used this product on and off for 10 years and just love the way it defines and adds shine to my hair. I can see if you had fine hair that this product would not be a good thing! I always have to remember that it's the anti-humectant that I like, not the humectant. The humectant version does nothing for my hair and I have purchased it on occasion by mistake.This stuff smells great too! Makes styling a snap</review_text>
I am very happy with the Emjoi Compact Epilator that I purchased.  It does exactly what it claims to do and works wonderfully. Until I asked a salon for advice on the best way to remove unwanted facial hair, I didn't even know something like this exhisted.  I just wish I would have known about this product years ago.A. Davis</review_text>
Very classy scent. Very strong. Spray sparingly, a little goes a long way. Lasts all day. Will receive many compliments</review_text>
I purchased this for my wife for Christmas and she loves it...as do I.  It isn't too 'perfume-y' and smells terrific</review_text>
Exactly what I wanted... works perfectly... The flosser at the bottom the head of the toothbrush is great at getting between the teeth.  Charges quickly and is convien</review_text>
I use this with my m3 turbo and some Kiehl's Closeshavers Squadron Ultimate Brushless Shave Cream White Eagle for my daily morning shave. It's the best combination for thick tough stubble.</review_text>
I got this for my husband for Christmas. I had seen it in magazines but it was expensive for this product, I thought. I was so excited to find it on Amazon and he just LOVES it. He shaves in the shower and the mirror never fogs. It's a great product</review_text>
I looked long and hard for a heating pad that did not need plugging in or hot water poured into it. This is perfect - just zap it for two minutes in the microwave and set it where the you need it...ahhhh! Pure happiness!A definite must have</review_text>
I like this cutter. I can use it by itself or with its accessaries. Even when the batteries are low I can still nip those little overnight hairs. Works for me!</review_text>
Easy to use. Short time to recharge the baterie. Long life batery and it is appropriate o sensitive skin</review_text>
This booster cushion that you fill with water works very well in the spa.  It is comfortable to sit on and saves wear on bathing suits.  You need to put in in the spa while it is heating otherwise it is cold to sit on.  It is a good product.</review_text>
I've been using Nicads for long, long time and while in some applications the alkaline might last somewhat longer... the money saved after just a couple of recharges is worth the extra expense of buying twice as many as one needs and just keep on recycling the batteries from flash units, GPS, walkie-talkie's, flashlights, etc.    HOWEVER, these newer NiMH are just great. no memory shelf and longer current life.  NiCADS and ALkaline 4 stars these do get a</review_text>
These batteries work well.  They don't last as long as normal batteries, but the ability to recharge them makes them more than worth the additional costs.  If you have kids with toys, these are a must</review_text>
what a sinfully awsome tasting way to get rid of chapped lips</review_text>
I was looking for a towel that would dry me quickly and this towel did just that.  It also dried completly by the next time I needed to use it.  I would recommend it to anyone looking to get out of the bathroom faster.  It is not soft and cozy but it does the job</review_text>
I bought this for my aged Mom after she confessed that the big plush expensive terry towel I'd bought her was just too heavy for her to handle.  She *adores* the microfiber towels I got her!  They are light for her weak arms, they are so very absorbent that one or two passes gets her dry and that's particularly important with the delicate skin of the elderly.  Not to mention that I, a hearty creature in my prime, love these towels too! I shall be buying more of various styles and colors</review_text>
Just as it advertised, it is soft and dries up hair and body quickly.  I bought it because it was on sale and thought why not try it out, well, I am sold on this product.Only drawback now is the high price tag..</review_text>
I love this item. I received it as a gift and now use it every single day. My hair dries so much faster after having been wrapped up in this. That's great b/c now I do not have to blow dry as much, so my hair seems to be getting a lot healthier. Only complaint would be that it does not stay wrapped very well. Not sure if it's the material or the size, but nonetheless, it still works great.</review_text>
I got this unit as a gift from my boyfriend.  High blood pressure runs in my family so I wanted to get a monitor to keep track.  I was figuring on getting an arm unit, but when I got this wrist unit I wanted to see how it would work.  The whole system is very easy to use and fast.  You need to be sitting and resting to take the reading, but is happens quickly and then it stores all the results for you.  I didn't think I would really use the memory function but it has come in pretty handy.  I can say this was a great gift, something I use a lot, and something that will help me stay healthy</review_text>
I purchased this for use in my bathtub.  It is more comfortable than the blow-up ones and stays cleaner.</review_text>
I used to have some Remington shaver that a friend bought me for the last 5 yrs.  It wasn't bad, but sometimes it irritated the skin.  my first shaver was my dad's old school norelco shaver so i thought i'd give them a try again.  the first one i got from amazon was $40 (i forgot the model #) and ended up sending it back to norelco for their 60 day guarantee.  it was just alright.  this one i feel about the same way.  i mean it shaves decently, but as an asian male with not much facial hair, i still see that i have to shave every couple days which i prefer not to.  the cleaning system is cool, and the fact that this shaver is so easy to clean (it says you can open it up and run it under water which i've been doing to clean it) make it worthwhile to me though.  the battery life is also good.  if there was a half star system, i'd give this shaver a 4.5/5</review_text>
I have been using this shaver for 2 weeks now and have not had any problems with it. It is easy to use and clean I have only had to charge it once so far. Even though this is my first electric shaver, it is a good deal for the money. It doesn't shave as close as a razor but it's close. I would recommend it or give it as a gift.</review_text>
My husband is in love with this razor!  He thought he was a Norelco-only fan, until I bought him this model for Christmas.  I purchased it due to the great reviews it received, both from consumers and independent reviewers, and also b/c it cost less than $40.  It leaves his face so smooth, whether he shaves daily or skips a couple of days.  In fact, he can finally shave the hairs on his upper neck without getting razor burn.  Highly recommended</review_text>
My wife and I both love this. In our opinion the thicker plastic tines offer a more comfortable and pleasurable "head trip" than the trippers one might find in the mall. The vibrations make it better than the non-vibrating head trippers but are not overwhelming.Another benefit of this particular device is that it is able to be completely disassembled and packed to be taken with you on travelsor on vacations.It's a pretty simple device, sold at a reasonable cost, and in my opinion is a better implementation than the metal ones</review_text>
ALso bought as a gift but I tried it! Very relaxing and much more affordable than the ones you see in the mall</review_text>
A very gentle undereye cream.  I have used other name brands which extensively irritated my eyes and made them tear all the time.  This one is definitely a keeper</review_text>
It is a great product and makes my husband's face as smooth as a baby's you know............................</review_text>
Tastes better than most candy bars and has no refined sugar or artificial ingredients</review_text>
Very good; very satisfying.  Interesting blend of flavors--dried fruit, cocoa, chili.  Nothing dominates - all the flavors are well balanced to make it interesting to eat.  I couldn't eat one every day, but for an occasional meal replacement, it is very good.  Too high calorie to be a snack item, but it's tempting</review_text>
I AM VERY PLEASED WITH THE LIGHT OUTPUT.  I PURCHASED THEM TO LIGHT THE INSIDE OF MY CHILDS PLAYHOUSE.  THEY REALLY ILUMINATE THE INSIDE AS BRIGHT AS A STANDARD LIGHT BULB.  I PURCHASED A COUPLE OF YEARS AGO AN EARLIER TYPE LANTURN BY RAYOVAC AND WAS REALLY PLEASED WITH IT ALSO.</review_text>
I've tried all kinds of bibs, but nothing works better than Pampers Bibsters.  Right size, great pocket to catch crumbs, covers my 18 mth old, soaks up spills. I use them full time, not just on the road.</review_text>
I have been using Kiss My Face olive oil soap for years, and I won't let any other soap touch my face! I found it when I was searching for a soap that wouldn't make my skin itch all over after a shower. I can tell you that after years and years, my sensitive skin has never once itched after I used KMF!The soap is mild, with a neutral scent, which is a big plus. It cleans great, but doesn't leave my skin dried out. The 8 ounce bars are a bit large, but worth the wait until they shrink down to a size that's easier for us smaller-hands people</review_text>
I recieved my product in a reasonable amount of time and I am happy with the product.</review_text>
I got what I expected. It's functional and not too poorly made. The only problem I had was that the scratcher part was a little too sharp. I filed the sharp edges off and now it's great. The rolling wheels still have no function for me, but they don't get in the way</review_text>
I ordered this as a gift and it arrived in less than a week... with their standard shipping! The produict was exactly as described. Shalimar is a classic</review_text>
As expected, the new 7180XL razor delivers a close and comfortable electric shave, even though it runs much slower than earlier models.  The slow speed does make it very quiet and the new cleaning method is very handy.  Just 2 noticable disappointments:1.  The external power supply is a rather combersome change from former Norelco products.2.  The exclusion of a storage case is certainly an unwelcome "feature" of an otherwise good product at a premium price</review_text>
Very light electric razor.  Cuts shaving time from 10 minutes down to 3 minutes.  So a charge for 30 minutes of shaving time easily lasts a week.  When running it is as quiet as an old fashioned blade.  Does a great job very quickly and smoothly.  You don't need anything more</review_text>
I've owned several Norelco Shavers in the past but the 7180XL is definitely the best.  This shaver is extremely light weight, quiet and gives an extremely close/smooth shave. I find that I get 5 days of shaves on one full charge and a full charge takes about 50 minutes to complete. The shaver is also easy to clean using either wet or dry methods.The only complaint I have about the shaver is that no traveling case/pouch holder comes with it to hold the cord,shaver and cleaning brush. Just make sure you keep your old case holder from your previously owned shaver(s). Only time will tell on how this model will hold up. My 4 previous Norelcos have averaged around 5-6 years each</review_text>
I bought this rechargeable shaving system for my husband for Christmas.  It was a replacement of a corded shaver he had been using.  He has been enjoying the features offered by this device.  He especially likes the ability to rinse it out after each use.  It gives a close shave and has a quick charge feature that allows you to charge it for a few minutes and gives at least two shaves.  He has used the razor for about two weeks now with no complaints.  It was a great price for a quality product</review_text>
I Luv this Burberry. Pple always comment anytime I wear it. My girlfriend almost made me stop wearing it cos she said anytime I wear it she feels like doing things I can't mention here 2 me, and since she feels tht way, other women will certainly feel like tht.I'm getting another one!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Also fast and proper services by amazon</review_text>
I purchased this for my husband as a gift without ever having smelled it.  I based my purchase on other reviews, and the fact that I have the Burberry classic for women and love it.  I crossed my fingers and hoped that the reviews were right.  Well, they were!  When this came in I could not resist; I had to open the box.  I pulled the outer wrapping back, carefully pulled the box out (I was able to replace all this without hubby knowing), sprayed some into the air, and "ahhhh", wonderful!  I loved it!It smells wonderful on my husband, too.  It's kind of woodsy, but not overpowering at all.  It's a classic, warm fragrance, and it lasts a long time. I will definitely buy this again</review_text>
Clean and Crisp. Defined and Smooth.I use Burberry by Burberry for all occassions but it is great for the evening. IT has woodsy notes that remind me of autumn.I am very picky about my fragrances and I only use two regularly -- Eau d'Issey by Issey Miyake is my main scent, but I do use Burberry sometimes on occassion and I love it. Thats it</review_text>
This toilet paper will never feel like the cozy stuff that blocks the toilet on a regular basis, but it is a product that feels somewhat better than varieties you find in many public toilets. I am willing to compromise a tiny bit of plush, and save all the hours spent attached to toilet plungers. I do concern myself with any chemicals that are placed into a product that makes it "rapid-dissolve", and will in time, try an environmentaly friendly brand. A great option for family with kids who know no limits for toilet paper usage, and ignore the presence of a plunger</review_text>
If you live in an old building where the toilet is always getting clogged by your abundant use of regular toilet paper, then this is the brand and variant you should switch to.If I were to objectively judge it by what it promises (rapidly dissolves...), I'd have to give it five stars. It practically melts as soon as it touches water. Don't expect to be able to use it for mopping water off the sink; you'll just end up with a mess of dissolved tissue.I'm giving it only four stars, because it's not my favorite toilet paper (that would be Charmin Ultra), but the necessary choice.</review_text>
I use this product all the time.  It was becoming hard to find in department stores, but I found it available and cheaper online.  I'm very happy.</review_text>
I love this product and the lasting results. It is so gentle on my hair. I bought two, one being a Christmas present for my neighbor who had recently had a very bad perm, and she agreed, makes the set last while not futher damaging your hair.If you are sleeping in curlers, sleep no more. This product is for you</review_text>
I ALWAYS HAVE PURCHASED CARUSO STEAM ROLLERS BUT WHEN I PURCHASED THEIR NEW IONIC ROLLER SET IT LASTED I WEEK AND IT WAS ALMOST 3 TIMES THE MONEY OF THE VIDAL SASSOON. THIS IS THE BEST!</review_text>
First off, IGNORE Renee's rating, this woman has ISSUES!!!!!!This toothbrush works great! Would Highly recommend.</review_text>
I love this toothbrush, its easy and it really imporoves your gum health</review_text>
Yes, I did feel a difference.  Benadryl is not effective for me so I was sceptical. I am glad I found this . I use for when I need to sleep in an unfamiliar place</review_text>
This is a really good supplement to help you regulate your sleep pattern.People please grow up and stop using this Amazon review site to post useless nonsense...go BLOG somewhere else</review_text>
This was a gift . It came on time and was half the price of one we had looked at . So we were happy</review_text>
I really do love this item. I've been using it without fail since the day it arrived. I haven't had any significant problems with it and highly recommend it for anyone. I hated wearing the chest strap on my other monitor.The only problem I have found is that I can't grip things and have the monitor continue working. So when I am lifting weights I have to leave that finger extended, when I'm using the eliptical trainer I have to leave that finger extended. Now that I'm used it, it isn't a big deal.It is accurate. So far it has agreed with all other monitors that I've checked it against. So with the one minor exception I highly recommend it</review_text>
i like guru because it has a more natural feeling towards your body. after drinking monster all day, my body felt like a mess(from the many unnatural chemicals it does to your body).  There are so many energy drinks out there that have loads of chemicals, its harder to find stuff like guru and bawls.</review_text>
Having tried most all Energy drinks, I can honestly say this one is different. Guru picks me up gradually yet does not drop me down as though my wings have been clipped. One at noon and I'm good to go for the rest of the day. Plus, I don't go home and kick the dog!The taste is not Sugary and at about $1.40 a can (Free Shipping) the price speaks for itself</review_text>
I was reluctant to buy this after reading that it wasn't so great on fine hair, but my son's hair was really getting shaggy and I was *NOT* going to wrestle with him at the barber shop again. So I bought this and was so happy when it worked perfectly on his hair. I used the 1 inch guide for his whole head and he looks great! The vacuum got all the hair which is a good thing, because I cut his hair wherever he happen to be in the house. He didn't have to stop what he was doing and sit still or wear a cape, which he hates.Having his hair cut at home also allowed him to get familiar with the trimmer--what it sounds like, and feel like-- in his own time and environment. He cut his stuffed bear's hair first, then daddy's, then his own by himself and then let me cut his. What a relief to have a nice haircut and no kicking or screaming.At $25, it has already paid for itself. I'm so glad I bought it. I didn't give it 5 stars, because it is pretty loud and  had a really crappy users manual.</review_text>
Bought this for use by my husband while he was in a nursing home and I used it to shave and cut his hair with while he was there, no hair on him or pillows or sheets.  This is wonderful for anyone that does not want a mess while trimming or cutting hair, I also used it on the tougher part of his beard.  Wonderful item</review_text>
it does a great job, i just tought it woundn't let any hair go, but i gess that's impossible</review_text>
This unit has the power transformer at the wall socket end instead of in the handheld part. The handheld part is mostly made of plastic. So, it's pleasantly light to hold, much lighter than my Wahl homecare thing.The supplied guard things (that you swap to change length, etc.; IIRC they range from 1/8" to 1") have a curve on the bottom so it's easier to have them glide over concave surfaces instead of digging the pointed end into them. This also makes things more pleasant.Don't believe the no-mess story, though. It really does catch most of the hair, so it's certainly worthwhile, and it's easy to empty the hair trap, but I still have to vacuum the remainder afterwards. It doesn't catch it all</review_text>
The product does what it says it cuts your hair and contains it all in a vacuum container</review_text>
I have gotten numerous compliments on this eau de toilette.  It has a light, almost woodsy smell.  Reminds me of a laid back saturday at the country club or something.  Classy yet sporting</review_text>
I bought this product because I had one from years ago that I use when I go to the gym but lost.  It's great at drying me off while i'm working out and yet the towel isn't wet.  I am conflicted though.  I bought this one when I lost the one I already had.  It's a bit thinner and not the same deminsion as the original, but I still like it for what it does.  I also like the little bag that it comes in, which I didn't have with the original one</review_text>
After looking into several reviews on blow dryers, I learned about the Revlon Tourmaline.  All of the reviews were so positive.  I've been suprised at how light the dryer is and how easy the controls are.  The placement couldn't be better on the controls. The price was right as well!  Blow dryers in this class are generally much more expensive.  A very good value</review_text>
Fast, gentle, light, hair dryer.  No frizz, quick drying results.  The diffuser attachment is rather large and hard to pack into a small travel bag but gives good gentle air. The dryer is very light to hold and has a cold setting to finish the job.  The motor can be rattling and rather loud but over all performance is excellent for daily use.  Don't waste your money on the expensive ones</review_text>
Very convenient reading glasses. You could hang them on your neck when not using them, and not even notice they are there. They are very sturdy, and are flexible making them almost imposible to break.Cons: Both sets I purchased I notice them to be on the narrow side. They sometimes can feel too tight to the side of your face.The glasses are also not practicable to wear for a person with long hair, as the glasses would trap your hair against your face</review_text>
I use these glasses all the time at work.  They sure are handy.  Glad I bought them</review_text>
I bought this item last month from Amazon.com for $149. I thought it is using some kind of hand-like massage motors, and not those vibration motors. When the item arrived and I setup, I found out they are using the vibration motors! A little disappointed I am. But I use it, it is not bad if you don't mind the vibration motors. The heat feature is great. However, the knod that is supposed to hold the sitting position isn't holding well. The leather-like material really feels like a lether. The vibration really vibrates the whole floor, so I suggest to put on carpetted areas only. I personally like the hand-like massage chair better. But this $149 chair is worth the price. Others would sell for over $300</review_text>
I have owned many beard trimmers, but this is by far the best.</review_text>
This model was given to me as a gift almost two years ago.  I bought another off of Amazon because the recharge cord had a short in it, and I figured I could use a second one to keep in my travel bag.  I'd have to say I'm pretty pleased with the trimmer.  I like the fact that the guard slides up and down to the appropriate setting instead of me having to keep up with 4 or 5 individual plastic guards that have to be changed out when I want to change the trimming depth.  I use it a few times a week, and it seems that it can go for months without needing a charge.  The little vacuum that sucks the trimmings into the little holding area is not the strongest....It's catches probably 70% of what I trim.  You'll want to be sure you're standing over a sink or towel when using it.  Well worth the $30 I spent for this grooming tool</review_text>
I've had several trimmers over the years and this one is by far the best.  Strong motor, easy adjust, strong vacuum.  Other reviewers commenting on the flimsy guard is kinda suprising to me.  One wouldn't want to push down hard against the face when trimming a beard.... the idea is to glide the unit over your beard... you're not raking, you're trimming!Also the unit is easy to clean out after use.  The waste receptacle snaps out easily, as does the cutter head in order to shake out or brush out debris</review_text>
These are the best nursing pads out there. I tried several others that would not stick and would leak. I've never had any problems with these</review_text>
This was the first brand of nursing pads I tried.  My first few weeks of nursing were very painful and these pads were a bit scratchy.  Yet after trying several brands of nursing pads, I came back to Lansinoh.  They are the most absorbent and discreet disposable pad out there and after I had been nursing for a while they ended up being the most comfortable. The best deal I have found has been amazon's price for 3 boxes.</review_text>
This is such a great product for nursing moms. It is not bulky and is reliable to keep leaks from happening. For a mom, this was a lifesaver for me to allow me to go outside without being embarassed by having a wet shirt</review_text>
I have tried the gerber nursing pads, and one other brand.  These nursing pads are the best. I have a large supply of milk but I have not leaked through these pads, they are also very soft and they are not visible through your clothing</review_text>
It is nice if you are looking for a simple hair dryer. It does its job pretty nicely. The dual voltage option is a plus as you can use it anywhere in the world. A little big for travelling, but compromises with its folding handle and light weight. The disadvantage is that you cant use it on the high in 240 voltage. It is hard because you might tend to put it on high and then that would kill the equipment</review_text>
It's small, folds down and is great to pack for a trip instead of your big hair dryer.  I just wish you could set it on cool and blow as fast cuz it does get pretty hot.  Very convenient item if you travel</review_text>
great help in dental hygene, gets in hard to reach spots,also a lot easier than flossin</review_text>
These little flosser tips put an end to my problem with bleeding gums.  Flossing with traditional floss hurt because I always cut myself and deeply.  It probably saved me from serious gum disease, and that I understand is expensive to treat, so I'd rather put out a few dollars rather than a few thousand dollars in keeping teeth and gums healthy</review_text>
I'm more than satisfied with this scale.  I was concerned that I would have to buy a more expensive scale to get good accuracy (see reviews of other digital scales in this price range,) but I've tested it several times over several days, and my weight varies by 2 pounds or less over the course of the day.  My first weigh-in of the day is pretty much the same as previous mornings, sadly.The neutral color (grey) and glass would blend in well with just about any decor, and the LCD screen is easy to read, with 1.5 inch high numbers.The only thing I don't like about it is that it creaks quite a lot when I step on it, even though I'm nowhere near its 330 pound maximum load.  That problem is in my head more than in the scale: I don't think it's going to break, but it sounds like I've got two people standing on it at once--I'm not THAT fat, am I?An added feature is that when I'm craving, I go into the bathroom and look at it, and know that it isn't going to fall for any of my excuses tomorrow morning.  So the last piece of cake still sits in the fridge.  The scale has intimidated me into not eating it.Accurate, easy to read, easy on the eyes, and intimidating--I think it's a good deal</review_text>
It is really great!!!  Sure, it does hurt, but not any more than waxing.  I do not shave because I get cut very easily.  This is a great alternative to expensive waxing.  Even when I have more hair it works.  I would buy this product again, and again</review_text>
I recently purchased this lumbar support cushion as a gift for my father this past Christmas.  I am a physical therapist, and have over 5 years of experience dealing primarily with the mechanics and mechanisms of low back pain and disc dysfunction.  I have tried out many cushions over the years, and from my experience, this product is as good as any higher-priced product of the same intent.  The composite board insert allows for a consistent shape to be maintained, so the cushion does not yield as easily to body weight over years of consistent use, and the burgundy cover is removable and washable.  It is also an excellent size for the average-sized person (my dad is approximately 5'9", ~170 lbs.).  It provides good side-bolster support as well for an added feeling of comfort around the outiside of the lower back.  I highly recommend this cushion when placed in comparison of other similar products.  Most of the other products out there that are in contention with this one are composed of unnecessary additives, like a massager, ribbing on the contours of the cushion, etc.  I've found that simply maintaining good posture (not only in sitting, but all activity) allows for so much more freedom from pain and simple ease back into daily life.  Again, I highly recommend this product to anyone out there searching for an answer to help alleviate low back pain; however, I must caution that commercial products are NOT a cure-all to one's problems.  It's always possible to alleviate the pain and symptoms, but other steps are necessary in terms of FIXING the problem.  I highly recommend seeking out professional care from a physical therapist, as it is more than likely necessary that one would need (at least) proper education and intevention to help one to get better.</review_text>
I've tried several lumbar cushions from Amazon and this one is the most comfortable, despite being so inexpensive.I only wish it didn't have the "wings" on the side</review_text>
I have been looking for a overbed table so that I could use my laptop and watch tv in the bed room. And this is the one I have been looking for.It takes about 15 mins for me to put it all together. Did not have any problem at all</review_text>
Safari by Ralph Lauren for Women is the only Eau De parfum my niece uses. After she discovered Safari she gave away her collection of purfumes. I usually try to find Safari for her birthday every year.</review_text>
This is a good little product. Did not expect much, but in fact it helped me relax and fall asleep and stay asleep. - thank</review_text>
I bought this after using the inexpensive Wahls for years.  I love it for several reasons:1) It cuts without pulling on your whiskers2) It is very precise3) It picks up 90% or more of your whiskers4) Not only do you not have the hair in the sink, but you no longer feel like it will take a shower to get all of the excess hair out of your beard, if there is any to speak of5) Unlike others, I did not feel the need to have a more precision tool to trim my mustache.  It worked just fin</review_text>
I had bought a Tingler elsewhere for $20, plus shipping, so when I saw this one advertised for $9, I was a bit hesitant that it wasn't the real Tingler, but a cheap knock-off (especially since they show no picture). BUT, I decided to risk it and was pleasantly surprised to find out that it is not only the real Tingler, it is also shipped in a pretty velvet pouch for wonderful gift-giving. Amazon, of course, also offers free shipping for $25 or more, so I bought 3 and got them all shipped free! Great deal! And, by the way, it IS incredible! It really did send little shivers down my spine the first few times I used it. While you sort of get used to the feeling after a while and the little shivers may disappear, it still feels fabulous on your head</review_text>
Bought this razor and happy with it so far.  It shaves close and is not as loud as I expected.  Glad I bought this one</review_text>
Like the razor - I have problems with ingrown hairs on my neck and this shaver has helped to alleviate the problem - the Nivea lotion is very soothing.  I have had to live with the fact that the shave on my neck is not the closest in the world but c'eat la vie.  I have taken to running a couple of passses dry to get a fairly close shave and then starting to apply the lotion as I continue.  If you start with the lotion you won't get a close shave.  I do wonder if one couldn't simply buy a shaver ad apply some lotion at the end for the same affect</review_text>
I never thought the world would get here.  I am actually spending time to type up a review, online, for shaving lotion.Well, here you go:  for every man out there who is interested and who has ever used an electric shaver, if you haven't tried the Norelco Cool Skin electric shaver with this lotion, you have to.  Whoever has sensitive skin, you need to switch to this, because it does a great job.  That's all I have to say and I won't waste anymore time</review_text>
Forget the liquids and throw away lens tissues. This cloth works exceptionally well on my camera lenses. I highly recommend it, and am buying a couple more, for my car glove compartment for sunglasses and my computer screen.</review_text>
A lot of work when into making this cloth, excellent for cleaning lenses of all kinds: glasses, video and digital cameras, etc. If you care about your lenses health, this is the cloth to buy, congrats 3M</review_text>
... I purchased this item to remove some debris off my camcorder lens and found it to do the job very nicely.The microfiber texture feels nice - a little beady, but soft and textured.Using it was easy, I just wiped the lens in a circular fashion with light pressure and eventually the debris was gone. (some fingerprints and what appeared to be a scratch but wasn't)The packaging is a little subpar though. It comes in a plastic bag which you tear open at the bottom to slide the cloth out. However doing so leaves adhesive residue, which the cloth then sticks to and you have to tear it off, making those sections of the cloth appear phyically different - a bit roughed up I'd say. This is poor design as the packaging says to store the cloth inside the bag when not in use to avoid contamination, so I used a scissor to cut the bottom of the bag with the adhesive residue off.I've yet to machine wash it, but so far it works well. It's just a cheap lens cleaning cloth after all</review_text>
this edger is a perfect match with the wahl beard mustache trimmer. You can do a real professional job with these two items.Robert paul Jone</review_text>
After total knee replacement, this wedge sure helped to keep my knee in one place and elevated, while preventing me from moving too much while I slept or was resting.Highly recommended</review_text>
Just received it and used it and can only say it is the Greatest Shaver EVER !!!!!!!!!The closest Shave, No Razor Burn, Fastest shave Yet And very quite.Thank You Norelco for this Great Saver. J</review_text>
I've been using 2 of these batteries in my walkman for 10 hours now and they are still going very strong.  It's living up to its reputation as described so far.</review_text>
Heats up quickly. Tends to dry out more than previous CHI flat iron I had. MUCH more economical</review_text>
This is the second Aquis Microfiber Body towel I have purchased.  The waffle weave makes a huge difference.  I had a plain microfiber towel and it just didn't feel like a towel.  The Aquis towel has a real towel feel, dries me off  great and then dries out quickly.  I keep it in my gym locker and it's dry the next time I need it.  In the summer, I use it after swimming in the morning and it's dry by the time I teach swimming in the afternoon.  And it doesn't take up much room in my locker or gym bag.  It would be great where I used to spend my summers in Michigan where it was tough to dry out the beach towels.</review_text>
This is the BEST !!! Drys you off fast,and drys fast too.. So soft and comfy on my skin!!</review_text>
Having had perfectly clear skin through my teens, 20s, and most of my 30s, I now have post-pregnancy adult-onset cystic acne that began at age 36. My skin is far too delicate and sensitive to tolerate most OTC acne products. I bought this product out of desperation, not believing it would work. After reading hundreds of reviews and advice and testing it for 2 weeks, I have found that it works well, with some modifications. My experience: cystic acne goes through its normal cycle (rising to surface, becoming a hideous scab, etc.) in a fraction of the normal time (4 days versus 4 weeks) when treated as directed with Zeno, OR it disappears completely without ever having risen to the surface (after a week or so), when treated very aggressively with Zeno. My advice: Don't expect it to work after 1-3 treatments and in 24 hours as advertised. Do know that with diligence and patience, it will work. Be very aggressive. Do double-cycles (allow the Zeno to remain on your skin after it beeps, then press the button for a second cycle) every few hours as long as the bump is detectable in any way. You may get very slight burning of your skin (causing a whitish film or slight peeling) and you may go through your cartridge tips quickly, but believe me, it's worth it to avoid the horrible months-long process of cystic acne. I am using this in conjunction with a very thorough natural skincare regime and improved nutrition, and seeing the results I have hoped for after 2 weeks</review_text>
There are several listings for this item in different versions.  Before making a decision, check out the other versions, you will see many different reviews.  Overall, it seems to be as long as you use the product as intended, it works!  You can see my full review under Zeno Pro Pink</review_text>
This product works great, they recharge fast, are just warm to the touch not hot, and have extremely long battery life. Battery charger works great and has nice car charger adapter</review_text>
My Mom came home from rehab and needed an easy way to reach her remote, pills, magazines, eat breakfast... and still get the  table out of the way so she could reach her walker.  This type of tray was very useful in rehab.  However she didn't want something the looked like the hospital.  The white top with a space for a drink and pens and pencils that don't roll away when you move the tray was perfect.  She liked the white top (vs. the wood grain in rehab) since she could tell when it was really clean.  She was also pleased with the foot rest as part of the base.  This was perfect.  The reason I rated this at 4 stars and not 5 stars was that the bed kit came with one incorrect size nut so I had to go to the hardware store.</review_text>
The Oral B EB417 dual head power brush replacement does a great job of getting into tight places, reaching back teeth, removing plaque, has a nice gum massage action, and leaves your mouth and teeth feeling clean and very refreshed. The two heads work twice as good as one, but may take some getting used to if your used to a single brush head.Using it by gently guiding it over your teeth, and letting it do all the work, it will last a long time too. It was nearly three months before I had to replace mine. Most Oral B brushes are interchangeable with all Oral B units. This one though, according to the buying info here, may not be used with the Cross Action brush. It will also indicate when it's time for replacement by the fading colors of the bristles.(the box shows as good picture of new and used). Just a little of your favorite toothpaste goes a long way too!It's a 5 star product, but unless you are just one person who just wants to try it out, the better buy would be to purchase the three pack. It's almost like getting one free. My pack also came with different color rings, that fit on the brush at the base and is nice for families to tell the brushes apart. It's nice to have a spare for unexpected guests as well.Keep Smiling....Laurie</review_text>
These Never leak and are good enough to wear over night. This is the only diaper I buy</review_text>
This works best for me.  I don't like a wet or greasy look.  This holds well, then dries as if nothing is on the hair.  Without it, my hair falls down into my eyes.  I think it's the best</review_text>
I bought the Remington MB-300 Mustache and Beard trimmer for my husband and was holding my breath as he is very picky. He has a gorgeous full beard and keeps it precisely trimmed. The Remington has several adjustments for length,that pleases him the most,it trims whatever he aims it at,and does it well. It is light weight and maneuvers easily.</review_text>
Overall an excellent trimmer - this is what I have been needing all of these years.  Finally a piece of equipment that does it all.  I have been very pleased with this trimmer - it is solid, and cuts without problem.  I love the adjustments, and the removeable head.  Thanks Remington, and my wife for the Christmas present</review_text>
I purchased this as a gift for my husband and he loves it.  Well made with good trim length settings, it's also easy to hold.  Recommended</review_text>
The day I ordered this pair at Amazon, I saw the same Homedics slippers at Sears for $21.99 on sale and I was immediately assured that price wise, this is a great buy. I got the slippers within 3 days. The material is very soft and "towely", and pretty in pink- it feels really good to just walk in them. Though they have a battery compartment underneath the sole, they are not too heavy to walk in either. Each slipper uses 2 AA batteries. The massage is actually more effective while sitting. And my mum and my sister keep eyeing my slippers. I ordered another one for my future mum-in-law as well! I'm sure she'll love it. Also, I wear a shoe size 8, sometimes 8.5, but the Homedics Small Size for the massaging slippers fit just fine, actually a little better coz a good fit gives a better feeling of the vibrations. If you're thinking of buying this, go for it</review_text>
When I first tried this Marshmallow Vanishing Crme in a sampler kit, I purchased five more kits and then a 1.5 ounce glass container of this product. Can I say it is addictive?Yes, I guess it does have a banana cream pie scent and the texture is similar to a banana cream pie topped with whip cream. To say this is decadent is an understatement. You will be very tempted to slather your entire body in a good helping of this cream.Fortunately, it goes a long way and absorbs extremely well. In fact, that is why they call it "vanishing" crme. The ingredient list is impressive and contains rose water, mango butter, beeswax, grapeseed oil, rosehip seed oil, Vitamin E, marshmallow extract, willowbark extract, calendula flower extract, and a heady fragrance.Grapeseed oil is one of the most powerful antioxidants and is high in proanthocyanidins, a group of bioflavonoids that are superior because they are water soluble. This ingredient also prevents skin cell damage caused by pollution and sun exposure."Marsh Mallow" is actually a pink flowering herb found in marshes and damp meadows. It has been used for centuries as a food and a medicine. The leaves and roots secrete an emollient fluid with healing properties for inflamed skin. In the past, people boiled the roots in wine to make a cough remedy.I found this luscious creamy dreamy product to be healing for the body and mind. Not only will you feel comforted by nature, your skin will be baby soft and this product can be used for all-over body healing. The silver lid and glass jar have an unusually cute appeal.If you love this product, you might want to try the Pore-refining mask, Evening Primrose Overnight Crme and the very unique parsley blemish stick. To take luxury to the next level, try the Shea Butter Decollete Crme on your feet, hands or all over your entire body. What an amazing line of products. They heal, protect and soothe your mind.I'm still trying all the Burt's Bees products, and love how these products make me feel. They add a level of protection to your skin care routine and the clay mask I recently tried cleaned my pores like a dream.~TheRebeccaReview.co</review_text>
I purchased the Caruso for my wife after returning a Conair Infinity. The Conair Infinity did not measure up to her expectations. She is happy with the Caruso and feels that it does an good job setting curl. I will offer a few observations of my own. I would think that companies that produce these devices would be more sensative to the needs of a broader spectum of customer. For instance, women have different lengths of hair. This device provides 6 petite, 6 small, 6 medium, 6 large, 6 jumbo. That might be fine for women with shoulder length hair, but not for everyone.There's not enough of one size to get the job done. There's not enough of two sizes to get the job done. If your hair has just been cut, it's to short to use the larger sizes, unless you have long hair to start with. My wife's hair is not quite shoulder length, she's got a problem. So, I figured, no big deal, just order a dozen of the right size. One dozen additional rollers cost $35. I only paid $29 for the unit with 30 rollers.That's not what I call customer friendly.</review_text>
I have had a couple sets of these, and LOVE THEM.  This set is for a gift.  I am so anxious to give it to her</review_text>
Item was received in perfect shape.  It is a wonderful item and a great buy</review_text>
Now I finally have the look and feel of a celebrity.  The best product on earth period!  I've tried all ingrown hair product's since 1985 beleive me Ive' spent thousand of dollars, nothing comes close to it "forget about it" Saliylic Acid is history in my book. Sorry Dermatologist their is a cure.  I bought 1 bottle before christmas 2006.  Since the new year 2007 started I've already bought 2 bottle's and I'm spreading the word.  Don't delay a smooth and perfect face is just a few days away.Thanks to all who have complimented my slick and smooth face.J. Diaz    Aka  (Papi rico</review_text>
My son loves this. It's great for a night light. He can even fill it up himself. I recommend it for a childrens room</review_text>
This humidifier is easy to refil and not a  big eye-sore even in small rooms.  Also, stays very clean not a lot of build up like other humidifiers.  Would give it 5 stars but you do have to refil it about every 8 hours.  Which I guess it's good that it's easy to refil.  The price is also the reason for 4 stars instead of 5.  I think it is a little pricey for not a lot of features compared to bigger ones with more features for the same price.  Perhaps you pay for the convient size.Overall, I really do like this humidifer and is the only one I like to have in the house because of low maintence and small size.</review_text>
As soon as I got this item, I tried it out right away.  I will agree the battery cover is rather flimsy but that's a minor point.  The real issue is whether it could do what it claims to do -- take down mosquitos and flys.  Sure enough, I killed 5 mosquitos after sitting outside for just a few minutes.  I also took down a housefly without any sweat.  This is a great device as mosquitos are a real problem where I'm at and it sucks being held hostage indoors by insects.  No more an issue</review_text>
Having previously owned battery powered travel razors, I was always disappointed with their power and battery life. After all, what's the point ditching a heavier charger and razor if you have to carry a load of extra batteries and still end up stubbly faced? The Braun 370-BK was a pleasant surprise, however; powerful enough to hack through my hiking stubble and plenty of juice for an extended outing. I also liked the folding design which protects the cutting surfaces and keeps the cleaning brush from getting lost. A great piece of tech at a good price</review_text>
I bought this for my father who only has one leg to use in his shower/tub combo.  He loves it.  Esp. the height adjustment feature</review_text>
Being sick and tired of shaving constantly and buying expensive blades, I did some research and decided to try an epilator.  I figured I'd give this model a try. I have not been disappointed!  Yes, it hurt the first time I used it--I hadn't shaved in almost a week and I had a lot of thick dark hair.  But, it was pulling it right out.  The more you use it, the less it hurts. I haven't had ugly, rough stubble since. I also like that Panasonic has included a shaver head--this works great to trim up too-long hairs before epilation or for the more sensitive areas that are just too painful to epilate.  The heads are easily interchangable and a snap to clean.  This is a great all-around epilator/shaver.</review_text>
It is working well, little slow warm up. But actually I wanted a hot air brush, not this, because I have very short hair, but i was mistaken when i ordered hot brush instead of hot air brush</review_text>
Does everything as advertized. Love the turbo feature that speeds up the heating process to less than one minute</review_text>
Definitely the best heating pad I've ever experienced. I'll never buy any other kind of heating pad again. This is by far the best and well worth the money. I love that it can set the temperature precisely and much higher than any other heating pads I've ever seen (that only have "high medium and low" settings, and usually the high and medium settings cause burns, or don't get hot enough, or go from barely any heat to burning!) This heating pad's lcd shows the actual temperature it's at, which is great. And yes it feels very moist, but not like you're getting dampness on your clothing. My only complaint is that it shuts off after 60 minutes. I could easily have this on all day :</review_text>
As a dentist of over 20+ years experience, I have seen over and over again the results of not flossing one's teeth.  The unfortunate result of such neglect is cavities (especially in kids), and inevitable gum disease in adults, which in both cass over time leads to tooth loss.  Gum disease almost always starts in-between the teeth and the only way to clean the germs that cause gum disease and cavities from between the teeth is with floss.  Mechanical scrubbing with floss is the key, and all the daily brushings and rinsings will not remove the in-between stubborn plaque below the gumline.  The bottom line is that we need to floss our teeth if we want to keep them for a lifetime.I have heard all the excuses for not flossing: The floss is too hard to handle, my fingers turn blue, my fingers are too fat, I'm too clumsy, the floss hurts my gums, etc, etc.  This disposable flosser is great for kids, who may not have the dexterity to load a non-disposable flosser, such as the "Flossaide Dental Floss Holder", which I recommend for adults (see my review).I have recommended this floss aid to my young patients over the years and I strongly recommend it to you as well.  One still has to develop the habit of flossing daily, and this device aides in the mechanics of flossing, making it a breeze.  Get it and save your teeth!Jim "Konedog" Koeni</review_text>
This would be a great item except it isn't clear that it only works on handles that are pointing to the right.  Our doors have the handles going to the left leaving this item useless for us</review_text>
I bought one of these to squeege the water out of my past-shoulder-length hair.  It works great!  I gotta admit, it's just big enough for my head and I have a teeny little cranium so normal adults would probably prefer to buy the "extra large" size towel (which isn't really all that large.</review_text>
This is a great fiber supplement!!  When you chew it, it starts out kind of crunchy but quickly turns chewy kind of like a chewy sweet-tart.  I usually keep a glass of water by even thou it says you don't need water. They have a good flavor and yes I do use it as a substitute for candy every once in a while. Just remember too much of a good thing will give you gas :-) so don't be in a small elevator.</review_text>
They are a nice compact size for travel. They work as advertised, just expect to let them heat up longer than the stated "quick curl" time</review_text>
I have never used a roller. After reading the reveiws I decided to purchase two set of rollers. I have long hair. It works really great on my hair. Looking at my hair everyone says it looks beautiful</review_text>
I purchased this as a gift for a friend who has beautiful long hair and she told me they worked wonderfully.  I also own a set and have had them for several years travelling with me to the office, gym and around the world.  They are easy to pack and are lightweight</review_text>
Great compact design. Takes up very little room in your suitcase. Rollers heat up & are ready to use in about 2-3 minutes like the product claims. Sets hair better then most rollers (and I have tried many). The only thing that I would change, is to add 2-4 more rollers. But I liked these rollers so much, I actually bought a 2nd set & use these at home over the 5 other sets of rollers I own!</review_text>
This is the one I buy for friends and the one they use at my pediatricians office. It is like the one I bought 5 years ago with my first baby, the one that is still humming along.I have been really happy with our thermometer with the exception that it was-and-is still too big to use with my second child, a boy who persists in having 'tiny' ear canals even though he is three now. It has worked well for every other kid I know though.About the variation in temperature taking. My advice is to practice taking your and your children's temperature while you and they are healthy. For one thing, not everyone has the `standard' 98.6 degree normal temperature; and for another thing it isn't always easy to get the tip pointed in the right direction once it is in the ear canal. It takes practice.A good home purchase. (For really little babies we used a pacifier thermometer with great success.</review_text>
I got this product when the price dropped down to $12. So for that price I liked this product a lot. It heats the lotion well. Initially I thought it was small, but now I think it is the correct size. I did not realize how much better it is to apply heated lotion until this. I switch it on when I go for a bath and by the time I am back, the lotion is ready and warm. It is a great buy, and for all you bargain shoppers, wait till the price drops. It is  especially a great buy during winter</review_text>
I ordered one of these for my girlfriend and she loves it.  Friends and family have tried it and are thrilled.  This product will make holiday shopping easy for several women on my list</review_text>
This is the best invention yet.  I could not believe how warm and smooth the cream felt.  What a difference from cold cream to warm cream.   The cream itself was smoother and yes, buttery!  I love this, this is my best investment yet</review_text>
Such a thoughtful gift.  A real treat for those of us living in colder climates - especially in the winter.  The warm lotion is truly a treat to dry, itchy winter skin.  Anyone would love this!</review_text>
Dr. Scholl's Foot Cream was excellent. It's a rich overnight foot cream with a pleasant smell. My feet felt softer in the morning after using it at night and I noticed a difference immediately in my dry, cracked heels. I also ended up using it on my hands and elbows before I went to bed. Especially my hands were really soft in the morning. I've tried other foot creams and not been really impressed. But I think the difference is that Dr. Scholl's has no alcohol in it, and it's really rich so you can actually feel the moisture in your skin</review_text>
For me a good  tweezer is well worth paying for and this is a very good tweezer. I had the same one, this brand, for six years and then dropped it and it went out of alignment. I immediately ordered my new tweezer. If not dropped I suspect this would last a lifetime</review_text>
I agree with the previous reviewer.I have used this brush for years!It was recommended to me by a hairdresser, and I will never use a different brush.Unless you have fine, thin, hair,  you will love this brush!!!</review_text>
I bought this scale for my wife (ya, I'm that sort of guy)! She's definitely not heavy, but 'concerned' and a follower of Weight Watchers. I was shocked to read various scale reviews prior to purchasing this one and find so many that did not weigh accurately! Well, this one was highly rated by most reviewers for accuracy & they are right. This scale is very accurate in determing a person's mass (sorry, I was a Physics major too) and confirmed at her Weight Watchers' weighings. As for it's accurate determination of "body fat" and "water", I can't say, but feel these are a bit gimicry anyway.As for my wife, she loves the scale & me. Although, her love for me covers over many poorly chosen gifts, so I'm not absolutely sure about her love for the scale. However, I do know she uses it ever day and enjoys telling me of her victories</review_text>
This writting instrument is superb in it's ability to compensate the energetic writer</review_text>
I have always dated men who wear this cologne. Not on purpose but I always seem to find or smell men who wear this scent. My mother calls it sex in a bottle. The scent is light and pleasant but still smells like a man should smell</review_text>
My bedroom receives an inordinate amount of morning light and, being a light sleeper, I've tried numerous ways to protect my slumber. It doesn't help that my husband (God love him) snores as loud as a small jet plane. I've tried silicone ear plugs and satin eye masks only to find that the plugs make me feel like I have a head cold and the masks leave unwanted gaps that let in the light.I received the Tranquility Zone eye mask for a birthday present and I could hardly wait to try it. I LOVE this thing! It's thick and large enough to block out all of the light and, due to the design, the mask is positioned perfectly over my ears. The sounds are pleasant (I'm a big fan of the "Babbling Brook" track) and I love being able to plug my mp3 player in so I can listen to my own nature-sounds tracks, too.I've given this 5 stars because there's no option for 4.5. In all honesty, there are a few drawbacks. First, when I say this is thick I'm not kidding. Without my A/C in the summer it might get a bit warm. Second, the sound clips themselves are on very short loops... so if you have a brain like mine that tunes in to what you're hearing you'll notice that the clip repeats itself every 5 seconds or so. Were it not for this I'd be a bigger fan of the first track -- the one that sounds like you're in a forest -- but I get distracted (and awakened) by hearing that bird sound that comes closer then fades.Even with these things in mind, I have to say I haven't slept this well in YEARS. I love this thing, and I wish I'd found it earlier. In fact, I love it so much I've given it as a gift to two friends who'd tried on my mask while they were visiting and fell in love with it, too</review_text>
If you have trouble sleeping...THIS mask is for you!!  For anyone struggling to get even a few minutes worth of sleep...  You will not be disappointed!!  Fabulous!  Whether for a nap or for getting through the night - this mask will definitely help!  I have given several as gifts and everyone is in agreement with me!  The only negative is - the company changed from an endless sound model to 30 minutes of sound...therefore - I wake up and have to re-hit the sound selection...but, I'm still getting more sleep than I have in years and years!</review_text>
These are a helpful item for me; the cloth pockets are nice, and the instructions for microwaving are clear and simple</review_text>
I looked a many other back support pads.Some were too big, and others were just complicated.The Obus Forme Side to Side is perfect.It is very light weight and small, therefore, very portable.I use it in the car and take it with me to the office.The strap on the back fits well around any chair back,although, I have found I don't need to use it because it stays put</review_text>
This dryer works great but it gets pretty hot.  Watch your ears and fingertips</review_text>
The stuff can seem somewhat pricy (specially on a college budget) but it's well worth it. The taste isn't much to talk about; you're better of just holding your nose and chugging it at once. Then again, weightlifters don't eat supplements for taste do they? I have a huge energy problem, I lack it a lot. Between class and work, I'm usually drained at the end of the day, but this stuff helps me get into the gym and hit it hard. This isn't to say that it won't requre motivation on your part, but it sure helps. During the workout, you may notice an increase in your pump. My muscles felt so tight and big, that I just wanted to lift more and more. By the time I was done, I went to the lockeroom to change and saw a monster in the mirror. I've had great pumps before, but this was insane! It didn't even look like me at all; it felt great. I've been using it for 2 months now and I don't train a day without it. Highly, highly recommended</review_text>
There's nothing like grabbing a warm totally sanitized toothbrush. I have used this for years after I saw the inventor on 20/20 I had to try it out. It works great! Its like using a new toothbrush everyday. Well worth it</review_text>
I bought this for my mom for Christmas.  I have the same one.  I take mine on every trip I go on.  She always says she needs one.  My whole life I have been a light sleeper and now I sleep through almost everything (sometimes even my alarm)</review_text>
This Nature Made product is excellent. However, readers should be aware that this products DOES NOT contain IRON for a very good reason. Taking iron supplements sets you up for potential health problems if you are a woman over 50.  I hope the other reviewer takes note of this.</review_text>
Its a freakin wet nap, what else can I say? Not much to critique here.I live in a small town & their kind of hard to find so Amazon to the rescue.Pros:1. style(square)2. looks. It doesn't shout "hey I'm a wet nap"3. shape. It stays put in my truck & doesn't roll around.4. does a great job of what its intended to do, nothiing more.cons:1. Non</review_text>
While a little dubious, I am know a believer--really helps me get motivated and stay energized focused for my workouts.  Start with a single scoop and adjust as needed</review_text>
This is a pretty good flavor. It isn't my all time favorite (Apricot) but way up there</review_text>
Clif Bars are amoung the best tasting energy bars I have ever tried. They may not pack as many calories or grams of protein as other brands, but there have been times where I could not even finish a competeing bar because of dismal taste or texture</review_text>
The best sports bar around. Great taste, organic, contains plenty of Antioxidants, and contains a good amount of protein.The only down side is the high amount of carbs, especially the sugars, but I still give it five stars</review_text>
Clif Bars have been part of my families life for a long time and provides a good quick meal or snack depending on your activity level.  Definitely recommend having water available</review_text>
I've tried many types of nutrition bars and many are too sweet or they are not tasty. Clif bars get it right</review_text>
After buying several different seat cushions for my office chair I found this seat and it is the best choice I ever made. The seat has a low profile but is extremely comfortable</review_text>
I absolutely love this stuff. I would recommend this to any person that has frizz. It makes my hair feel so silky smoothe. I started using it about 2 months ago and cannot stand to go without it. Just use a little because it can make your hair look oily if you use too much and don't put it close to the scalp either for the same reason. I tried the Chi Silk Infusion because I thought they would be the same since they are both made by Farouk but the Chi is not nearly as good. I would give this 100 stars I could.</review_text>
Had I read these reviews before buying this, I probably wouldn't have purchased it.  But I had been looking at the much more expensive Sonicare toothbrushes after my dentist recommended Sonicare after I asked.  I didn't ask if there was a certain MODEL that he recommended, so I assumed I'd have to pay from $40-$150 for a Sonicare.  When I saw this one for $30 at Target, I figured I didn't have much to lose.I've had no problems with any of the other problems mentioned and have been happy with how it makes my teeth feel super clean and has even cleaned this spot that even my dental hygienist couldn't get.  It turns off automatically after 2 minutes, so I know that I'm brushing my teeth longer.  One thing that takes getting used to is NOT removing it while it's going...you'll splatter toothpaste all over yourself! :D  Another plus is not having your tummy jiggle like it does with a manual toothbrush!!The only negative is that it goes thru 2 AA batteries about once a month, but the directions said that it lasts about 60 brushes per battery change and that's about right.  I've started using rechargable batteries and have had no problems.</review_text>
I have a few minor quibbles with this razor, but it gives you a nice close, comfortable shave. And isn't that what we want in the end?I don't know anyone who buys one of these things for its "ergonomic design features." It holds the charge for a good long time, and shaves your face nice. Rinse it clean with running water and you're done. That's what I'm looking for.The only things keeping me from a 5 star review is I'm not yet comfortable with how the razor sounds when running. It seems like it's always needing a charge...but that's how it sounds at full charge. It will take some getting used to I guess..others might find the quiet running mode a plus.Also, the monthly cleaning of the cutters/combs is a bit complicated.</review_text>
Have had several Norelco razors over the years.  This is the closest shave I have ever gotten from any electric razor - and it is also the quietest.  Only comment is that it requires recharging more frequently that its claims but not enough of a problem to offset the quality of shave.  Highly recommend</review_text>
Upgraded from an old Norelco to this and just love it. Shaves close and almost effortlessly including the very course hair over the upper lip. The only con I see is the 8 hour charge time, which has been the norm for Norelcos in this class for a long time. If you need a very good basic electric shaver for a good price, this is a great choice</review_text>
Upgraded to this razor after my old Remington died, and I've been very happy with it.  It cut a bit close, which irritated my skin at first, but I think that was just me getting used to the "Lift & cut."This would be an excellent razor if it wasn't for two features (or lack thereof) that make it a pain to use.1.  The internal battery is NiCd.  This type of battery has "memory" to it, which means for optimal performance, the battery should be fully drained before you recharge it.  Otherwise, the life of the battery will slowly shorten until the battery is useless.2.  There isn't a low battery indicator.By itself, either of these features wouldn't pose a problem.  Combined, you're left wondering when you'll have to charge the shaver, or when you're off on that business trip, if you'll need to bring the charger.In the long run, this razor is cheap enough and I expect the battery to last for years.  Still, it would have been better if the battery was made of NiMH or some technology that's not 15 years old.</review_text>
The refills were easy to order & fit my brush perfectly.  It's a lot easier ordering on line & received in home rather than trying to find the merchandise in a store</review_text>
Product arrived as expected.  I've had the tooth brush for about a year now and I love it.  One complain I have is that the interior of the brush head can get pretty dirty.  It cleans up pretty well with a soak in warm water and bleach.  I have not tried soaking it in Oxyclean, that might work even better.</review_text>
The first epilator that I used was The Epi-lady with coils that came out in the 80's.  I did not use this for long....A tool of complete TORTURE!I finally got brave enough to give epilators a try again and got one from "VEET" which has a single roller of tweezers but it did such a good job that I was completely hooked on using an epilator. Good-bye razors and wax!I figured that if a single roller did a good job that the Conair which had two rollers would do even better. The Conair does a good job and I'm keeping it as my spare,  but the epilator from Veet actually does a better job.I no longer have any discomfort from the epilators and I even do my bikini area and underarms.I love the results on my underarms and the money saved on waxing.Once you see and feel the results you will be completely won over.UPDATE:  I've had more time to use the Conair Epilator and now I've actually been using it more than my "Veet".Just give yourself time to adjust to this epilator and you will be very happy with it.As a matter of fact I am ordering one as a gift for one of my friends</review_text>
This an excellent tool to self massage yourself.  It is very steady and very controllable.  You can really reach in with it. I tried different canes and this is the best one.  Buy it for yourself and your friends and they will love it!Don't forget to buy the instructional DVD.  It is really helpful in learning the proper way to use it</review_text>
I pumped exclusively with my first child and had no need for disposable pads b/c washable ones were sufficient.  With my second child, I did both and I found these to be the best b/c washable ones are not enough.  They are large so won't shift when you roll in bed.  They are very absorbent though I have woken up a couple times trenched.  They are very thin and discreet.  Other pads are not as big so not enough overage.  I never bother with the adhesives b/c they don't work.  They are a must for nursing moms and pumping moms in the first few month when you have lots of milk.  I just wished they were softer and less paper like</review_text>
This is the best dispenser we have used.  It attches to the wall easily, is eay to fill and is constructed in such a way that it has multiple uses.  We purchased smaller ones to give as gifts-knowing others would like it also.</review_text>
I bought one of these 'gizmos' as a gift 3 years ago and I was so happy to find it on here!! It is like going to a salon and getting the best shampoo ever!</review_text>
I found this to be a good product and it works well in my hair it does exactly what I want it to and I only paid $14.99 for it. It doesn't cause my hair to frizz up and it's easy to style when I take the rollers out. As far as it taking too long to heat up, I don't really let that affect my review because I plug it in and while it is heating up I do my makeup or something else. (I'm a multi-tasker anyway)  I also don't find that the clips leave a mark in my hair but my hair has some perm in it so it may do that on straighter hair.  Overall I like it.</review_text>
Over the years, I have tried many different brands and types of heated rollers and I never liked using any of them.  I recently bought a new set which I had to return due to the fact that I had a terrible time trying to roll my hair on the almost smooth surface of the rollers and then after clipping the rolls, they would immediately fall out of my hair....scream! I bought the Remmington #1080N wax core roller set and I have finally found the easiest and quickest  way to curl my hair.  The rollers surface, when warm, grab the hair ends immediately to allow great control when trying to roll even short hair.  The rollers are held in place by a full clip which looks more like a comb so the clips do not leave a ridge in my hair.  Once heated, the rollers are relatively cool to the touch (no more burned fingers) but due to the wax core, the rollers hold plenty of     heat and it takes just a few minutes after setting to produce excellent, long lasting results.  The set takes about 10 - 15 minutes to warm up.  I've found the warm up time takes longer than the time I actually leave the curlers in my hair.  This is the Best curler set I have EVER used.  If I was to ask for one change, it would be a quicker warm up time.  However, just the fact that rolling is so quick and easy, makes up for the few extra minutes of preparation.  I'm hard to please, so my recommendation says alot.  Thanks Remmington (I still don't like your other regular rollers! Ha)</review_text>
I have had this heating pad for several months and have never had a problem with it. It gets very hot/warm very fast and is very comforting. I use it on my neck and shoulders to help relax the muscles that cause some headaches. I would recommend this product to anyone. I'm purchasing another one for my stepfather as a gift</review_text>
I have read reveiws before i bought it that said the trimmer "pinches" or cut people, but i haven't found that to be the case. I wouldn't use it in ultra sensitive places (but i try not to use anything sharp and potentially dangerous near sensitive areas) but it does the trick quite well.  I have really enjoyed it and think it functions really well for a good price.  It also has an attachment to be a regukar shaver (which wasn't advertised when i bought it) but worked well on my legs; not as great as some more expensive  electric leg shavers but is great when you don't have much time.  All in all i suggest buying it.</review_text>
I think that they are great diapers. I have used other diapers in the past and I am now sitcking with Luvs!!!! I get more for my money and they work great.</review_text>
I purchased 5 of these for myself and coworkers. We are all on our feet all day long. After one other coworker told us about the one he had, we all had to have one to help our tired feet. Everyone of us is very happy with this product. It is a great value for the price. There are other messagers that are more expensive but these are just super. We did have a problem with one, but Amazon quickly exchanged it for us. I think it was defective from the factory. Great product and even better service from Amazon</review_text>
This hair dryer is truly a professional, salon type dryer. Many dryers are advertised as such, but this one lives up to that reputation. Very sleek, beautiful coloring and easy to handle with Turbo feature. This was a surprise(turbo) which I'm enjoying, coupled with the smooth and strong drying. The sound is even pleasant, not too loud, and it works quickly.(especially since I have very thick hair)I would recommend this dryer as an excellent buy for the inexpensive price.AJ in N</review_text>
We keep this in our kitchen and sanitize dropped baby toys and pacifiers as needed.  It takes a 30 minute cycle, and you just put things in and walk away.  It hasn't damaged anything vs. sanitizing in the washing machine - and I don't have to worry about any chemical residue from spray sanitizers.  We've even started to use it on more things around the house like toothbrushes, etc. to periodically clean them.  I think it's great</review_text>
I really like this sanitizer.  The only reason I did not give it 5 stars is because I wish that it was bigger so I could fit bottles and things slightly larger in it.  But, I do put her pacifiers and bottle nipples in there.</review_text>
The shaver was very good.  It gives a very close shave.  Not only do I shave my face but I also shave my head.  It feels like I use a normal shaver after I am done.  My nly advice is to empty the hair out between every shave.  It seems to give a better shave this wa</review_text>
WORKS GREAT AND WITH ANY MATTRESS.  DUE TO SEVERE NECK INJURIES I CAN NOW SLEEP BETTER AT A SLIGHT INCLINE.  THANKS ...</review_text>
Works great but I wish I could find it in stores.  The one RiteAid that does carry it, doesn't always have it in stock.  I also can not always find it in just any Rite Aid.  Some don't carry it at all...annoying!My daughter is the canker sore sufferer.  I did some research before I discovered Rembrandt, and found that the ingredient, Sodium Lauryl Sulfate, found in almost all toothepastes is the culprate.  Rembrandt for Canker Sores does not contain this key ingredient.  Sodium lauryl sulfate (SLS) is what makes our toothepaste foam.  My daughter hardly ever has anymore canker sore breakouts.  If she does, it seems to be from getting a cold.  Try and find a toothpaste without SLS...they aren't out there.  It would be nice to have some competition to bring the price down and be more readily available.  But all in all, I'm glad someone has made this product available, even if it's pricey and hard to find.</review_text>
He'd always had problems with frequent canker sores.  After he tried this (on a recommendation from his dentist), his canker sores went from 2-3/week, to 2-3/year!</review_text>
These wipes are strong, have just the right amount of moisture, and don't leave that slimy feeling that most of the major brands leave. My son had diaper rashes as a newborn; when we were at home, we could wash/rinse him with water and dry completely before rediapering, but when we were out, and had to use wipes, his rash would flare up. After switching to these wipes and 7th Gen diapers, the rash went away. Later on, I tried Pampers again, and the rash came back. Using Seventh Gen really has kept his skin rash free. My older son also has a lot of itching when we use Pampers; much less with these wipes & diapers</review_text>
I don't know if it makes your hair shiny or not (I never noticed increased shine) however, I do think it does it does a nice job.  It worked better when my hair was around shoulder length, but it puts a nice curl in your hair and as long as it's not too humid out, it stays in.  Now that my hair is down to my waist, it doesn't hold curl anymore.  Just a little on the ends and if it's even a little humid, forget it.  The main thing that bothers me about this set is the clips that hold the rollers in.  I don't know what they were thinking, but they really suck.  They pull on your hair a little while they're holding the roller in and make you look an awful lot like madusa.  Anyone who happens to see you will most certainly have a few jokes and laughs</review_text>
This razor is the best I have ever shaved with. It copes with every length of hair and angle of growth whether I shave every day, every other day, or even every third day. Perfect</review_text>
Well, the other reviews tell you that the shaver works great [compared to other battery operated shavers]. I agree.My point is that one can buy Lithium batteries for about a dollar each. Google for LED flashlight reviews and you will find highg quality cheap Lithium batteries. Some of them were even tested and evaluated by the flashlight guys</review_text>
Bought the massager - overall OK but it is heavy to use with one hand, after sometime it gets to you.  It has a good vibration capability better than the others i had. Could have a better handle and a longer cord.  How about making them 110 - 240V then i can travel with it</review_text>
Has all of the features that I wanted; digital readout, body fat monitor. Relatively easy to set up</review_text>
This is easy to use and set up.  It even has a 3rd space for a guest.  You don't have to get your body fat and water each time.  I like it</review_text>
Accurate scale - records use of two different users plus guests (or your chlidren!) Remembers prior info. Body fat % is a great and fairly accurate feature. These combined features make it worth the cost. Plan on reading the manual to set up</review_text>
I have had 2 other Sonicare toothbrushes and love them! I shopped around and due to Amazon's FABULOUS return policy and excellent customer service...There was no question where I would purchase. Their price was very competitive and their excellent customer service made it easy to feel good about buying here</review_text>
Although the compartments seem small, you can fit lots of food into this bowl. It's divided into about 4 or 5 sections, so you can separate your veggies, meat, etc. The only thing that bummed me out was the ice pack - the frozen gel expanded on the inside and caused the container to break :( So, I use it to store food in the fridge. I have all of the other Fit & Fresh containers and none of the ice packs on those have broken.</review_text>
I think it nice for me,make my eyes relax after long-time working before computer</review_text>
Its a very nice little fountain. The lighting on the ceiling is really cool and the water noises are adjustable depending on how you arrange the rocks. It doesn't have near enough rocks, so I'm going to go and get some, but I think once I fill it up a little more it'll look a lot better too. I'm satisfied, I actually bought another one :</review_text>
I purchased the mitts for a gift and also for myself. The person for whom I purchased them is very happy with them and so am I. I was looking for a mitt that could keep my hands as hot as possible because I have arthritis and was surprised that the heat stays for more than 1 hour. It is too soon to tell but I hope it will help me with the arthritis in my hands.</review_text>
Works like a charm.  It is absolutely worth the price.  I would buy another in a heartbeat</review_text>
I used this while breastfeeding my son...and while I only had one issue of chapping, it was a lifesaver.  I loved it then and have used it on several other things since..great on chapped hands, lips etc.  But I don't know what I would have done without this wonder creme.  And it's an essential baby gift that I tend to give at showers!</review_text>
If you own one of these shavers, then you need to replace with these every year. Buy the BEST, buy these, and shaver will stay like new</review_text>
I bought another one of these because I dropped my orginal at the grocery store and broke the bulb.I tried contacting the company with this new one.U cannot get an answer. The company seems to have a non working number. Other than that , the product ok and I havent been sick since I have used it./</review_text>
I've been using this scrub for a while - it greatly improved the quality of the shave that I get.  I get a lot less irritation.I've also used a similar product from Lancome (more expensive) and actually prefer Nivea better</review_text>
This is a great heating pad if you like heat. It ranges from Low to HI with 4 settings in between. (that is 6 settings) Especially nice is the loooooong cord.  My old heating pad has like a 6 ft. cord and I always needed an extension cord for it. Good purchase!</review_text>
I have had this heating pad for over a year and am very pleased with it.  The auto shut off is annoying when I forget to reset the pad and it goes completely cool but otherwise, very pleased.  Just ordered one for my grandma and she is thrilled with the soft cover and the fact that it doesn't "rattle" like the old fashioned ones.  Great improvment and larger size</review_text>
It works so great. I broke my left wrist and was in a cast for nine weeks.  I will be using the stand after I can use my left wrist. It is very sturdy and adjust to different hights</review_text>
Smells DIVINE! This is a powder-sweet and refreshing scent that won't overwhelm the senses. It's soft and subtle, yet killer if it complements your body chemistry. I love using this particular fragrance (especially during special occasions). It exudes both simplicity and sophistication--wonderful qualities that make me feel so feminine and utterly sexy!!! Try it</review_text>
This razor is fantastic. The gel pieces are very soft and keep even my dry skin from being too bad!! The only problem I had with it was the gel parts don't last quite as long as a bottle of shaving cream/gel would. But if you are looking for a quick, handy and yet still good shave, this is exactly what you are looking for</review_text>
I had never used an auto cuff before, so I had my doubts, but after using this over a period of weeks it seems to be right on the money every time. I would buy it agai</review_text>
I have used this blood pressure monitor almost every day for weeks and it works great.  It's an excellent value and I would recommend it to my friends without reservation</review_text>
I have purchased a total of 12 of these batteries (6 two-packs) and I must say that they work exactly how I projected them to. They hold a charge well enough for my uses in  various electronics and my infant's papasan swing. Regular Duracell alkalines will keep the swing running for a few days. These batteries on a full charge almost match the alkalines' life and I have recharged and reused many times already with no sign of charge loss. I am very pleased so far with my purchase. Get these until hybrid nimh batteries in size D become easily available and cheaper</review_text>
I didn't have any trouble with them being too large. I tested them in a battery-operated light string against a no-name, non-rechargeable brand and they lasted almost exactly the same amount of time.</review_text>
Excellent product, easy to mount and the clarity of the mirror is great</review_text>
The mirror is great. I use it for shaving my face and it fits the bill perfectly. Both the normal and 5x mirrors are nice and clear</review_text>
The Jerdon 7P7506CF (or as I call it, the ol'6CF) is a nice, reflective wall-attachable mirror.  I can't say enough about how reflective this thing is; I'm a bit of an amateur facepainter (although I have zero artistic ability- my Spider-Man faces usually end up looking like spotty tomatoes), so I need a good mirror whenever I self-paint.  I have gone through three similar models before finding the 6CF, and none has been as clear and user-friendly.In short, if you're looking for the best mirror value for your dollar, I can't recommend this thing enough.  It's the mirror of the 21st century, and beyond</review_text>
This is a good medium priced shaver.  It does a good job, is fast, and easy to clean.  It is attractive, and fits the hand well. Not top of the line, but a good value.  Nothing negative to report.</review_text>
I have a Braun 8995 shaver which is fairly good but upon reading the reviews I just had to try out the Panasonic and I am v impressed.Dry it shaves v slightly closer than the braun but with just a splash of water and a dab of king of shaves gel the result is amazing and quite quick too, a v close shave in about 2 minutes. I keep stroking my face to feel the smoothness.I dont use the cleaning station, I just rinse it under the tap so the only ongoing cost will be the foil and cutters but with the results I am getting I am well pleased</review_text>
Now my husband can't "borrow" my gasses and I NEVER loose them.  I have one of each color and get rave comments every time I take them off in front of strangers.</review_text>
I like the shampoo. It is nice. But I do not like the plastic bottle. Because you cannot remove the cap</review_text>
I work at a nursing home for the elderly and travel my entire lunch break to take my kindergardener to daycare after school and then pick him up with my two year old to go home, and to know that I have this product at my beck and call. WOW!! I am a owner of this product for 6 months now and I all I can say is I love it.. So what is requires special water a gallon lasts me for two months so I don't mind spending $.75 every two months. I use it in conjunction with my pore cleanser from Panasonic and I now I use less make up than ever. I normally wear foundation, pressed powder and loose. Now it is just pressed powder. It allows my natural glow to come out and minimized my pores. I do my facial with a towel over my head to intensify the treatment along with a favorite cd and I am on a fifteen minute vacation without leaving home.  I take the towel  off and my pores are ready for the final stage. I turn on the cool mist and apply a moisturizer at the last minute and I am ready to face another day.</review_text>
I bought it for my daughter's birthday.  She says it hurts at first but really gets the kinks out.  She is very pleased with it</review_text>
Convenient to use, good battery life, good shave for an electric shaver, but still not as good as a blade.  Also a little hard to use at edges, such as sideburns, under and around nose</review_text>
I have loved Dolce & Gabanna light blue since it came out.  I was so excited to find it at such a competitive price at amazon, and am certainly a satisfied customer!  The shipping was so fast, I was expecting to wait at least 2 weeks, and it was delivered ahead of schedle!  Thanks so much</review_text>
Great price, free shipping....basically...I LOVE IT!!I placed my order on Sunday and got it 8:00 a.m. Tuesday morning...I HIGHLY recommend this seller...I will definitely continue to buy from this seller myself..</review_text>
I loved it and guys really love it.  The smell is so fresh and clean.</review_text>
I'm usually a very skeptical person and I don't trust too many things that say they will help you do this or that in a short amount of time. But these vitamins actually do work. It takes some time and they are pretty expensive but they work. So if you need something to help your hair grow you should buy these vitamins cause amazingly they do work and will show results. The only thing I hate about the product is the price. But if you have money and want help with growing your hair then you're in luck. I'm young and I don't have alot of money so I can't buy these vitamins all the time. But if you have a steady cash flow then you're in luck and they will totally help you</review_text>
Unlike many of the other reviewers, I actually bought this shaver to use on my head. I have been shaving my head for the past 2 years and during that time have used a Panasonic ES8066. It was a fine product (able to be used either wet or dry, unlike the Braun), but I had no idea that upgrading to the Braun 8985 would make such a difference. I shaved my head in one third the time it took me using the Panasonic! No longer did I need to keep going over the same spot again and again. The Braun took off the hair in one or two passes, cutting just as close with considerable ease and less irritation. I can't believe I wasted two years shaving with my old shaver! I know Panasonic has since come out with new and improved shavers, and I can't comment on its new Vortex shaver, but I know I won't be returning my new Braun any time soon</review_text>
This is the best shaver I have found during 25 to 30 years of electric shaving</review_text>
I bought this for my wife when her Sonicare died. She loves it. Great price. She didn't want the better one and is very happy with it. Her teeth look great and she likes the way they feel after brushing</review_text>
Initially the sensation made me giggle.  After a couple uses I got used to the process and have even changed my initial thoughts that the whole timing idea was silly.  My teeth feel cleaner, mouth fresher, and I'm hopeful that I will no longer get the "floss" lecture from my dental team.Now that's something to smile about!</review_text>
Haven't had to clean it yet and it keeps the humidity level in out daughter's room between 41 and 53%.  We have had it for 3 months now and no problems at all.  Works as advertised and worth every penny</review_text>
I have been using this line of products since they were marketed.  My Plastic Surgeon(not used for facial needs)keeeps remarking on my skin and has to remind himself that I am 61!</review_text>
My last Braun Razor was model 6550, which I purchased 7 years ago. The Braun 8975 is a pleasure using, quick and close shave. The technology has come a long way. I have always used Braun and this is by far the best yet.</review_text>
I was skeptical of this product - especially at the price - however I am so pleased with its effectiveness.  I rely on other reviewers remarks and so I am writing to tell you that it is definately worth the price.  I can't believe how quickly it clears up a pimple. When I think of all the money I've spent on products over the years - and I'm in my 40s!  I was tired of buying products that overdried my skin but left me with a red, angry looking spot.  This product is truly amazing and works as effectively on mild acne.  I only wish the Zeno was around when I was a teenager</review_text>
These glasses are a great idea.  However, they do not work with long hair.  The back "strap" of the glasses has to ride high up on the back of the head for the lenses to rest low on the nose (so you can see over them for distance).  Long hair lays on the back of the glasses and pushes them down in the back, making the front of the glasses pop up and placing the lenses right in front of the eyes. I guess most people who need reading glasses don't have long hair</review_text>
Good Product - the pressure could be a little stronger with the sponge head.   It has a nice scent, and when the crystals had leaked upon arrival I had excellent customer service from the company to replace it.</review_text>
This was my heating pad, but my hairless cat took it over. He has a special pet heating pad of his own that he loved until he discovered this one. The first day I couldn't pry him off.I love that it's washable. In fact, I'm getting a second one for him to use while the others in the wash. Of course, I keep it pretty low for him. Being able to choose the times for shutoff is nice too since a lot of heating pads shutoff in two hours and some days that's not enough.</review_text>
This heating pad wraps around, stays put, does a perfect job and turns off by itself. Spend the money and get a better mousetrap</review_text>
Pink Sugar is a wonderful scent. I have received many compliments on this fragrance. Its not a strong scent nor is it perfumey. It is however a sweet scent. Everyone i know that has this fragrance loves it. At this price $32.14 for 3.4 oz spray you cannot find it cheaper anywhere else and free shipping on top of that. I say buy it you cannot go wrong</review_text>
I get compliments all the time on this scent.  It is one of my favorites.  It smells exactly like cotton candy.  Its fun, flirty, and nostalgic of childhood romps at the fair!  If you like sweet edible scents, then this one is for you</review_text>
I've tried for literally the last 6 years to find a way to straighten my hair (and have it stay straight)! I am happy to say that I've finally found something that works! I've had many different straighteners, and this one is by far the best. I have long curly hair, and this straightener gets it done in about 20 minutes. Much better than the hour I'm used to. Plus, the straightening lasts. My hair stays completely flat all day, instead of curling up on the ends like it did with my other straightener. You simply can't get better than this!</review_text>
I bought this straightener at the advice of my hairdresser (well, the PINK one was my idea) and this is by far the best product I've ever used. I even took a long run yesterday and my hair still looks great - and it's usually a nappy, tangled mess after I work out. There really is nothing better than the CHI for straight, silky hair. I've used it on a couple friends and they swore to go out and buy it. It's worth the price</review_text>
My arms used to get so sore because I'd blow-dry my thick, frizzy, curly hair for about 1 1/2 hours and then have to go over it again with a cheapy flat iron from wal-mart.After having a stylist at Mastercuts use this on my hair and achieve even better results in under half an hour, I knew I had to buy this product.This is a great price considering at most places like Trade Secret, the iron alone can cost about $129 plus tax, plus the Chi products are $15 and up.It's a great value, and it benefits a great cause, so why not?So if you have unruly, thick, curly hair- this is the product for you!Just be careful because it does get really hot- I burned my ear a bit. Other than some common sense, anyone can use it and achieve great results.I tried messing with it to flip out my hair and curl it, and I've almost got it down</review_text>
Over the years at various jobs, I have seen this flashlight several times. It is abused and subjected to the most terrible chemical and physical abuse. It may end up looking beat up and yucky, but they always work, no matter what the contractor or whomever does to it. If you need a reliable flashlight for the toolbox, work truck, pick-up glove compartment, etc., this is the only one you need.If you need a good flashlight at home, and tired of buying and throwing out all those junky flashlights from the grocery store, this one will be the last flashlight you will ever have to buy. I finally bought one just for my home, and I am only sorry I did not do this years ago (I am also happy to have one of these things that is not totally beat up like the one in my toolbox; I refuse to replace it).I like this version because it has a strong magnet, and you stick onto the refrigerator or the side of your truck. I also like that it has switch guards, so it will not be accidentally turned on because it is buried beneath 25# of stuff in your toolbox.One nit-picky complaint. It has a clip for a spare bulb behind the reflector. However, it comes empty and you have to supply your own, so buy a spare bulb at the same time you buy this flashlight.</review_text>
First, this is a big and cumbersome....  but second, this is the best foot spa.  Got it for the wife and had to try it myself.  I am a wuss when it comes to super hot temps and I had to ease into the heat, it stayed hot the entire time.  The jets were nice and the wireless remote is priceless (just make sure its in your hand when you sit down so you don't have to move an inch :)  ).  The rollers on the bottom are nice too.  It gets loud when on high-jets mode, but nothing to grand.  Fast shipper, would recommend</review_text>
The dispenser looks good, holds a decent volume of shampoo, conditioner etc. It is simple to refill the bottles, and so far there is no leakage. The mounting was easy, glued onto the tiles with silicone glue (included). If it broke or we decided to replace it, we would probably struggle quite a bit to get it off the tiles. The top shelf does not have a cross bar on the front, so if you mount the dispenser under your shower head, the hose will knock over whatever you might place on the shelf. The little hooks will hold disposable razors but not the ones with larger heads. Overall satisfied, good product for the price</review_text>
This was sent to my daughter and son-in-law as a thank you present for a recent visit. I had noticed numerous bottles on the floor of their shower and thought it would be a great way to neaten it up.  They love it!!! Not only does it get rid of the clutter and make it easier to dispense soap, shampoo,etc., my son-in-law can now shave in the shower and keep his shaving paraphernalia there as well</review_text>
Used to have a lot of liquid soap and shampoo get washed down the drain by my two kids... kids will be kids... but now they really like having their own dispenser buttons to push. Easy to mount and easy to use</review_text>
It is very easy to use, turns on very quickly, and seems to be quite accurate. I also love that there are no extras required (e.g., ear tip covers). The kids want to have their temperature taken</review_text>
I own this unit for more than a year. Bought it in the local drug store for $20. First unit was bad, displaying low battary error. I exchanged it same day for another one. I compared readings with traditional thermometers  and found it to be very accurate, fast, and can show in both C and F. The best I've ever had.The case is bad - lock broke in a week</review_text>
I was all set to do the typical 10 day antibiotic course for a sinus infection (I even had bought the antibiotics), but decided to try this first. It is very effective in clearing the sinuses, nose, throat and lungs. Couple things:1. It makes a minor mention of using a solution (if desired) in the tank provided. I used Vicks. It more than doubles the steam output. So even if you don't get a solution, use plain water. Without it, the output is not impressive.2. If you do get Vicks, get your magnifying glass out and read the dilution instructions. They do not make it clear without reading the fine print that it is a highly concentrated solution. If you add it undiluted, I think you'll go blind...I highly recommend this unit</review_text>
This Mabis Steam Inhaler REALLY puts out the steam!I am very satisfied and would heartily reccommend this item to anyone looking for a steam inhaler</review_text>
Great price, good product, escellent service.  I will buy from this supplier again</review_text>
Just love the Homedic foot bath. Easy to use and very ssothingon the feet. the pedicure attachments are a plus. The price was just great!</review_text>
this is really fun to do with a friend its so spa like i love it! but it has so many warnings im afraid to do something wrong</review_text>
This is a great sized foot bath.  I pour hot water in it, sit back and relax.  It doesn't keep the water warm, but if I start off with really hot water it stays warm until I'm ready to get out.  Using the pedicure attachements is hard work though- I just assume use a hand-held brush.  The bubble feature is too loud to use while watching TV.  Still, for the price, I like this foot bath. I've even given it as a gift</review_text>
I bought this for my boyfriend. I needed something affordable, and this was it. The bubble machine is quiet, and the warmth of the water lasts for a pretty long time.The only complaint i have are the warnings it has. It just gets me uneasy and that something drastic might happen if I make a mistake.well other than that, this product is good. I've had it for I think a couple of months now, and nothing awful has happened and it's still working fine. :</review_text>
This product gives your hair great volume without looking greasy.(Be careful not to use too much!) It works best if you have a little time to diffuse your hair with a blow dryer! Not surprisingly, when I use curl conscious many people will compliment the curls and the depth it adds to my hair :)I wish it would combat frizz a little more, but my hair is less frizzy when I use it. I guess the next thing I'll try is the Bumble and Bumble Frizz Fighter</review_text>
I've had my son in Huggies brand since he was born. I started out with newborns and just went up in size. I loved them and they never sagged (unless they were really full). I loved the trim look to them. When I had to get Pampers brand because the store was out, the pampers brand always looked like he had a full sagging load. Even if I had just put them on and they were dry!When my son was 1, he decided to take off the "tape" on the daipers and he just would not keep it on. So I switched him to pull ups. He kept those on and has been in pull ups for 3 years. Sometimes they did leak at night, because he went too much, but if I changed him once a night he was fine. Now that he's older, I don't have to change him, because he doesn't go at night.These are really best out there, and they don't look like they are always sagging like other diapers</review_text>
I love this book light!  It has survived countless drops to the hardwood floor by me and my 2 year old.  It works great with hardback and paperback books.  This is by far the best book light I have ever used</review_text>
Imagine your eyes closed, and tiny vibrating fingers massaging your head and neck. Until you try this product, you can't truly imagine how good it feels.Everyone deserves a little joy in their day, right?</review_text>
This product is totally awesome. It works great, no problems at all. Since I have mostly carpteting in my apartment, I have to move it to a hard surface every time I want to use it. It zeros perfectly every time and gives me an accurate reading when compared to the doctors scale</review_text>
I was requested to write a review by Amazon. I felt this request was premature since I used this product only for a month. So far I am quite satisfied with the user friendlyness, price, and ability to use and clean the shaver in wet environment.</review_text>
I love this razor...It gives a nice close shave, is easy to clean and can be used wet or dry.  Nothing to complain about here</review_text>
I received one of these towels as a gift several years ago.  It was, by far, one of the best gifts I have ever received!  It soaks all of the water out of your hair and leaves it perfect for blow drying.  For women, this is a five star gift</review_text>
This is by far my favorite out of all the Odwalla Bars. I used to purchase it at Trader Joe's, but they no longer carry this flavor; so I was especially delighted when I saw it on Amazon.</review_text>
I've only used the kit once, and it did what it was supposed to.  No problems, everything went fine, and I intend to use it again within about a month.  It should pay for itself very quickly</review_text>
I have medium colored hair, and I've used this trimmer many times.  It shaves away the hair just fine for me, you know need to know how to get to all the hair.  If your hair is so coarse that this trimmer doesn't work, you I'd recommend waxing!  Fast, effective, good angling</review_text>
I have received so many compliments on this fragrance. I can always pick out the scent when someone else is wearing it. Although a fragrance will smell different on each person, I have not known of anyone this one did not work for. I guess the negative reviewer is the first I have heard of. I highly recommend this to anyone who likes a fresh fragrance</review_text>
Great tasting bar. Nice and soft make it easy to eat</review_text>
i love these bars. i've tried all the flavors and they're all pretty darned great. i eat them more for a snack than a meal because they aren't as filling as i'd like, but they're great for a snack or sugar craving</review_text>
These were a great deal and they are the only diapers, other than Cruisers, that my son doesn't leak through.</review_text>
This is a great lumbar support for crappy car and office chairs.  Also check out Elaine Petrone's MIRACLE BALLS, which you can also use in the car and for other things.  The support is sturdy and has a mesh back, which helps to keep you cool and comfortable.  A GREAT deal for the cost</review_text>
I really liked this product.  I am a late 30's woman whose skin is basically pretty good.  I have occasional mild breakouts and some blackheads, but even before I bought the Neutrogena microdermabrasion I would receive compliments on how smooth my skin is. But around age 35 I looked in the mirror and realized my skin was getting that middle-age dullness to it.  Unwilling to pay for a professional microdermabrasion, I decided to try the Neutrogena at home system.The Neutrogena Microdermabrasion cream is easy to apply.  The cream had the slightest pleasant smell, and was not sticky at all.  I used well less than a teaspoon, so a little goes a long way.  It was no problem to rinse it off my face with water, and the sponge was very easy to clean as well.  The treatment took me less than 10 minutes, fit in easily to my bedtime routine, and after the initial start-up treatments you only need to do it a couple times a week.My skin definitely felt softer, smoother and more invigorated.  I could notice a difference after only one treatment.  But the real proof came from the way my husband did a double take a couple days later and commented that I looked younger.  (He didn't know about the microdermabrasion.)  And even my 6 year old daughter told me my face looked pretty.  There was a clear and noticeable difference--after only a few treatments my middle-aged dull skin had definitely gotten back some of its youthful glow, and the few large pores I have did appear smaller.Being lazy, I have not incorporated it into my regular routine like I should, but I do pull it out a few days before special occasions, vacations, or anytime I feel the need for a little brightening up, and will definitely always keep it on hand.If you have particularly sensitive skin, this may not be a great product for you, as it is a bit, well, abrasive.  For me, it was a painless process, and I would highly recommend it to anyone looking to give their skin a more youthful glow</review_text>
It's all in your technique (which took me many trials to learn)If you have had professional microdermabrassion then you will know how much scrubbing and pressure you will need to apply on your face. The crystals are abrasive and if you do not have the proper techniques you will hurt your face. I use the crystals in pure form ONCE a week (without the vibrating mechanism) BEFORE BEDTIME. These are the steps I do that WORK FOR ME. You may have a different system that might WORK FOR YOU.1.	Thoroughly wash face with cleanser (I use Neutrogena facial liquid soap) and rinse well.2.	While still damp, I use crystals to thoroughly exfoliate my face avoiding eye area. I go around in QUICK circular motion while applying pressure for 1 minute.3.	I rinse quickly and use Neutrogena Deep Clean Cream Cleanser to get all the crystals out since crystals are difficult to get out(it is also soothing).4.	(Its not over yet) After patting my face dry I follow up by using Neutrogena Pore Refining Mask. It's a cooling gel that you keep on for 5 mins to tighten pores. Rinse off and pat dry.5.	I do not put anything else on my face before sleeping.My face comes out really fresh, soft and smooth. The next morning I just use the cream cleanser to wash.</review_text>
Compared to the first humidifier I got from walmart, this cute cow is absolutely quiet and working just perfect. Oh, well I just got it yesterday so it's too early to say perfect, but considering others' reviews, I am pretty confident that I am gonna love it longer than at the first sight.The only thing is I don't know where to put it. The power cord has to be plugged into a wall socket and the cord is not long. I am a little concern that the nearby stuff such as my wood chair or chest, or even other electrical appliances will get damaged by surrounded with the emitting mist all the time</review_text>
I have two penguin humidifiers which I purchased a couple of months ago. For the money I think these are great and simple to use. I did not have any problems with leakage--the key is to make sure that the top is on securely. Also, some minor dripping is to be expected when you take the penguin body off the base--just carry a washcloth with you--no problem.Super quiet. I think it is just the right size for a bedroom. Easy to clean and fill. I had tried others (honeywell and vicks) and this is by far my favorite</review_text>
We all have very pale skin in my family, and these are great little "I forgot to put on sunscreen" helpers!  I keep one in the car, one in my purse, etc., so we are never without one.  Excellent product, and easy to use</review_text>
This is the best shaver I have ever owned and I wish it was still available</review_text>
this is 100 percent plastic, makes me nervous dealing with it.  The variable sprays are nice, one is so wide it shoots outside the shower.  make sure you crank on this when fixing it to the water pipe.  I really had to tighten it to keep it from leaking.  One other reader snapped hers on the install, I was afraid the same would happen.  It is a good shower head, not great</review_text>
This is the last hair straightener you will every buy. Heats up quickly and straightens long, thick and even curly hair in minutes. Haven't stopped receiving compliments since I started using it.</review_text>
I love this product. I have thick hair and the ceramic plates are very wide wich allow you to staighten your hair quickly. Does an awesome job</review_text>
I am having the same problem.  I ordered this product from Amazon on August 26.  It is now October 26.  I have not recieved it yet.  I have never had this problem with Amazon before.  I may have to cancel my order too and go somewhere else.  It is a shame, because Amazon does have the best price I have found so far.  I gave it 5 stars only because I had to give it a rating.  I wanted to be fair to the company, but I have honestly never used one</review_text>
This item is great. It holds shampoo and conditioner, or whatever liquids you need in the shower, and also has a handy basket that I use to keep the shower spray cleaner and my shaving cream. The handy hooks hold my razor and my washcloth. Really cuts down on the clutter and puts everything in one place. However, I had to buy this item from another vendor because Amazon kept delaying shipment. After the delays had exceeded a month, I finally cancelled my order and went elsewhere. Good product, bad transaction</review_text>
The monitor is relatively cheap, easy to use, and mostly accurate. The one gripe I have is that if I take my pulse 3 times in one minute or less the rate can range by up to 40 points! Usually, this is not a problem. I tend to check it 3 times and average the 3 which is sufficient for my purposes.</review_text>
I had been using a spring scale for years and it was fine until I went to a friend's house and saw what I was missing. I put that scale on my wish list that day. This is a lightweight , fairly compact  scale with "on/off" "tare" and "grams/ozs." buttons. it has a clear, plastic,removable bowl for measuring and says it can weigh up to about 3lbs. and down to 1/4 oz. I like it for its slim design its ease of use and for its easy clean up</review_text>
I bought an epilator because I was tired of shaving my legs and waxing was just too expensive for me.  I've had my epilator for several weeks now and I am already seeing amazing results!I used it for the first time on my legs.  I'm not going to lie...It was painful.  I just made sure to go slowly, pausing every few inches, and making sure my skin was pulled as tightly as I could get it.  Eventually, I was able to get most of the thick, dark hairs off of my legs.**Please know that the Epilator is not an immediate "cure-all".  Hair grows in stages, so as soon as you get rid of some hairs, several more grow in behind them.  (Eventually you can probably get rid of most to all of them, but it will take some time.)  Because of this, it is good to try epilating a couple of times a week.  Since it's winter, I just let it all grow out so that the Epilator can get more hairs.  However, when new hair grows in, I am finding that they are thinner and blonde instead of dark brown.  It doesn't hurt nearly as much to pull those out!  I also know that I'll be able to do this in the spring and summer because the hair is lighter.  My legs are smoother and I don't get razor burn!  Right after epilating, sometimes I do experience a little irritation but, unlike razor burn, it goes away after just a short time.Another neat thing is that, unlike waxing, the Epilator can grab the teeny tiny almost invisible hairs.  This gives your skin a smoother feel and it gets hairs at the beginning stages of growth!  I used to have to wait two weeks or so for my hair to grow long enough to be waxed.  Now, I get smoother skin just about whenever I want to!I was a little nervous at first about spending money on a product I had not heard much about.  With the exception of the few reviews I read online, I was pretty much in the dark.  I went ahead and went for it, then realized that this thing paid for itself in about two weeks!  Not only have I epilated my legs, I have also used it under my arms, on my upper lip, and on my bikini line.  The results have been better than I could have imagined!!Again, I'm not going to lie...OUCH!!!!!  Epilating under my arms hurt initially and they were sore for a few days (I have very thick hairs).  However, I got the majority of the hairs and after the first time, I realized that I'm never going to have to shave again!  Yes, some little blonde hairs grow back, but they are ALL thinner and much less painful.  In fact, sometimes it tickles a little.  :o)  I epilate there once to twice a week (about a five minute job if you're being careful, two if you're in a hurry) and I have smoother underarms!I used to get my upper lip waxed about once a month.  Now I just epilate.  It hurts, but just for a second.  Plus, I keep up with it so instead of 50 hairs being pulled at once with hot wax, I only need to pull 5-10 each time.**A word of caution: Our skin is more sensitive in some areas, so if you choose to epilate around the bikini line, be careful.  I managed to give myself a burn from going too slowly with the rotating "blade".  Now I just make sure that I don't leave it in one place for more than a couple of seconds.  If I miss some hairs, I come back another time to get them.This epilator comes with a little loufa pad to help reduce ingrown hairs (I've only had a few and the pad fixes them) and a little cleaning brush.  The epilator is very easy to clean.  The top (dark purple section) pops off and you run it under hot water.  When it dries, you put it back on.  **Note, the epilator does not store hairs inside of it.  When they are pulled out, they tend to either gather on the front of the epilator (I stop periodically to wipe them off) or they go flying.  I sit on a towel when epilating to catch most of the hairs.I hope this review was helpful to you with your decision about buying an epilator.  I am very satisfied with this product and I recommend it to anyone who has at least a little pain tolerance and really wants to get rid of hair stop having to shave all the time.**Are the few minutes of pain worth it???  ABSOLUTELY!  :o)</review_text>
This is the best reacher I have ever used.  I am in a wheelchair due to MS and have used various types over the past 6 years but the quality and ease of use is much better with this.</review_text>
By far, the best hair straightener I have purchased. I have spent so much time, money and effort searching for a straightener that delivers results. I can now say that I have found it. I bought the 2" Turbo and it gets the job done on my course, naturally curly hair. One of my all time, favorite purchases. I never travel without it</review_text>
I've had this product for almost a year now.  I have very thick, frizzy, hair and have spent my life getting it relaxed every six months, and blowing drying it straight.  I've never used a straight iron because they could never handle my hair.  But with this one, I have not needed a blow dryer since I got it!  Now my hair is straighter than it has ever been in my life, which I thought I would never see.  Of course this makes it very straight so I can't get any shape or curls from it(which is what I was going for). Cut my drying time by almost 2 hours (as long as I apply some protective serum on when still wet).  Great product and still going strong.</review_text>
I decided to buy this product before i read the reviews.  In my opinion the trays stay on better than the strip kind.  There is alot of whitening goo that you press into your teeth and it helps the trays stay in place.  The first morning the goo came totally out of my bottom tray but that was becuase i pressed too hard.  I havent had the problem since.I noticed a difference after 3 days and they are much whiter after 7 days.  My gums turned white if the whitening goo touched them for the full 45 minutes and felt tingly and hurt slightly.  The pick color returned within an hour. It really isnt as bad as the other reviewers make it seem.All in all if you are looking for a product that works, this is a good one.  I was truly surprised at how well they worked.  I will be purchasing these in the future</review_text>
I needed something to help me maintain my short hair inbetween barber shop appointments and this is a good thing to buy. My fiancee helps me keep the maitenence between my appointments</review_text>
Never owned one of these electric jobs before. Could not believe how good it felt and how clean my teeth felt and looked. Hated brushing my teeth before and now I will look forward to the experience. Never wanted to spend the money before but now they are at an affordable price point. Why not have 2 and get all the different heads for a real professional clean?Everyone should have one.</review_text>
This model has all the features of the Elite 9500 (2 brush heads, 2 cleaning modes, programmable quadpacer, and a guage to indicate about how much charge is remaining in the battery), but it's $12 cheaper from Amazon!All the "programmable quadpacer" feature amounts to is the ability to leave it on for an extra (i.e., a fifth) 30-second interval, or the ability to turn the timer off so that it's just on/off.  I regard most of the features as functional ornamentation ("bells and whistles"), but the Elite 9800 also happens to be a dependable, super-lightweight model that will run a good three weeks on a charge with only one person using it.  I went on a three-week trip and didn't bother to pack my charger, and it had charge to spare when I got back.  NOTE: I always allow the NiCd battery run all the way down (to exhaustion) before charging it, and that enhances both the charge and battery life.  (NiCd's only have so many charge cycles.)If this is your first electric, you might like the way it comes out of the box programmed to gradually ramp-up the power over the first fourteen brushings.What's the difference between the 9800 and the 9500?  The models appear identical.  The only difference I found is that one comes in a box that says 9800, the other says 9500.  :-)</review_text>
This is my second Norelco Wet Shaver. So, yes, I like the product. Here's my rundown:Pluses:- Good shave- Less razor burn- lot easier to insert packets (compared to my older model)- easy to cleanMinuses:- Hard to get that "patch" under your nose- Have to switch out an add-on to get sideburns straight- battery/power seem to wane at times- packets are expensiveI'm a cheap SOB, so here's my way of stretching out the life of the packets. Wet your face first with hot water, rinse your shaver with hot water and then squeeze out the lotion. Do a first pass shave. Rinse the shaver and do a second pass without the lotion with a wet face/shaver. Keep a blade on-hand to get the under-the-nose patch and your sideburns.All-in-all doner likes</review_text>
I have had other bath pillows that slid around or just were not comfortable, either itchy or not supportive at all.  This pillow is just right, and nice and soft, and hasn't gotten exceptionally dirty or moldy, which I was worried about</review_text>
I already own a Syncopro Shaver so I decided to get one for my dad. He had been asking about electric shavers for a couple of weeks prior to me purhasing one for him. The reason I choose Braun is because I love my shaver and have never had any problems. Just keep it clean and buy the replacement parts when needed and you'll be ib great shape. I love the way it shaves nice and clean!!!! I trully recommend this product.</review_text>
I took "My" unit to a monthly meeting for seniors.  Their machine broke & I took mine as a replacement.  They liked it so well, they had me buy this unit for the monthly meetings.  They like all the different aspects of the machine.  A suggestions could be to include a card that you could carry in your wallet & write down the date & the numbers from the machine?</review_text>
I have tried many contact lens solutions, and this one works the best for me.  Since switching to Acuvue 2 disposable lenses a couple of years ago, I noticed that my eyes did not maintain their moisture as well as with my former daily wear lenses.  Some solutions burned my eyes even after rinsing my lenses in saline, but the OptiFree is truly different for me, helping to clean my lenses daily and seemingly helping to maintain their flexibility and comfort all day.  Although I still rinse the OptiFree off of my lenses with saline before wearing them, I have found no irritation.  And, even better, daily rinsing and overnight storage in the OptiFree help me to extend the life of my disposable lenses for several weeks beyond what I could without using it.  That saves money because I have to purchase lenses less frequently.  Give it a try, especially at this price!  Wow</review_text>
$10 bucks and does the job. You do need to adjust it every once in awhile but that's easy to do.</review_text>
I've only had this scale for a short time, but so far so good.  I've found that in order to get a scale that is perfect or near perfect you have to spend a boat load of money. As someone before has mentioned the one drawback to this scale is that you have to set it back to zero every so often.  I specifically wanted to get an analog scale for this reason, with an inexpensive digital scale, which is what I had last, you can't reset it like you can an analog.  This scale is a great buy, for only $10 how can you go wrong!</review_text>
And now a word from David Lynch, as spoken by Dean Stockwell as Doctor Yueh in DUNE: "The tooth. The tooooootttttttth. Remember the tooth."Seriously, my daughter loves Dora the Explorer and my goals are to get her to brush her teeth for longer than two minutes.I bought this Dora the Explorer battery powered electric toothbrush, and she does.Game. Set. Match.Best money I ever spent on simultaneous child and parent satisfaction.When I tested this model on my finger, I was surprised at how powerful it was for a child-sized unit. This electric toothbrush decidedly will not rip her little gums off her skull, but the teeth definitely get a good scrubbing.Battery life is okay, I estimate it costs about  a cent for her to brush her teeth each time. The future value of that expenditure is far lower than the dental bills I'd otherwise have, so this is a money saving unit.If your child in a member of the Dora cultus, this is one of the better items to own</review_text>
This small flosses is great. To get the most out of it make sure you use the string floss and not the plastic ones that comes with it.The little plastic floss can break and get stuck between your teeth. Happened at least couple of times so I switch to the string floss</review_text>
To start - I miss my hair. Last september I cut my hip length hair to mid back, and then in december to just at the shoulders, and then again to the chin in January - and from January through June I trimmed it regularly to keep it that length. (I've been getting rid of the henna that was in my hair - I couldn't get it out via any other method tried except "growing out"). My hair grows kinda slow now too - it used to grow faster, but I suppose everything slows down the older you get.My last cut was late June - and it was at mid to upper neck length  - basically a little bit longer than the chin length cut, and then layered. That got rid of the really saturated henna'd hair - so I was ready to start growing it out. After much digging around online I came across hair 37 and all the reviews on it - both good and bad. I gave it a shot - got my pills in the first week of July and started taking them. Last night - maybe it was wishful thinking, but I noticed a difference in the hair length - it seemed it'd picked up a little length a little extra quickly - and then my boyfriend commented on it later that day. He knows I've been working to go back to my natural hair color - and there's a noticeable demarcation line from the henna and the natural hair color. Last night he looked at me and said "Hey wow - you're hair's really grown - I can see a half inch more of the roots! Wow - you're hair is getting dark!"I was pretty pleased with that - not bad for just 2 weeks on the vitamins! I can't wait to see how it is in another 2 weeks, come August - if I have another 1/2 inch to add to it, I will definitely be reordering these pills!But a side note, from previous reviews and my own experience... it's a lot of pills to take - but make sure you keep up with them every day. I find taken a stage one pill at morning and afternoon, and then dividing up the stage 2 pills into 3 doses of 2 pills throughout the day works very well.</review_text>
Hi,I'm not a "review" person, but when I read the existing reviews, I felt like doing this.I used this product for 2 months and I must tell you that it really WORKS!I'm hispanic-black woman (dominican) with relaxed fine hair and my hair grows normally, but only neck-chin lenght, no further than that. With this product I achieved a maximum growth rate and now my hair is leaving behind the accustomed lenght.I bought again the product to see how longer it can grows!!!I've been completely sincere with you...I'm not a staffer of this product company, I'm a real and very happy user!!!Hope this comment will be helpful for other women. I have only one last thing to say: Try it!!!! It worked for me..</review_text>
Excellent price and quick shipping. This was the best available for 3.4 oz size</review_text>
I am in my early 30's and have been experiencing severe and embarassing break-outs along my jaw line, chin and cheeks for the past couple of years.  I have tried Murad, Proactiv, AcneFree and many other systems without success.A month ago I picked up the Neutrogena system when I saw it on sale. Within five days days my skin started to clear.  Now, I have a completely clear complexion and have not had a single break-out since starting the system. I have had no problems with drying and my skin is much softer than before.  Finally, a product that works and comes at a decent price!</review_text>
This is the best affordable acne solution that ive ever used. I had acne on my forehead and the acne started to get smaller and even the acne on my cheeks just disappeared the next morning. On the box there is a sticker that said that it works faster than proactiv solution and its right! Proactiv takes like 2 weeks to work but this works over night. The only minor thing about it is when you put on the overnight acne control lotion, it starts feeling like its harding into a mask on your face. It feels like its restricing muscle movement on your face. Its no biggy because it works and it washes right off in the morning when im in the shower. I cant believe a little lotion can make such a difference. If you are looking for acne solution at a affordable price then this is exacly what you are looking for</review_text>
I have seen these in catalogs before & didn't give them a second thought.  Then one day when I was cleaning under & around all of my shampoo bottles, etc in the shower, it hit me that one of these might just consolidate all the shampoos/conditions & body wash that I have collected in my shower.  So, I ordered one a higher price & I am so thrilled that I am ordering one for the kids' bathroom where I had hubby put in an extra shelf just to hold all the shampoos etc.  Now it will all be in one place, not messy & out of the reach of my toddler!The other thing that I have noticed is that I don't use nearly as much shampoo as I did before - I get a few squirts & if that isn't enough, I get more - no more dumping a handfull of shampoo in my hand.  I know I use far less shampoo than I did before I had this so I am no longer wasting it!This is just the greatest concept & this product is very easy to keep clean & it works & looks great in the shower.I would recommend this product to anyone!  & if you don't think you will fill up all four sections - get a smaller one but I found the 4 section one is just what I needed; one for clarifying shampoo, one for conditioning shampoo, one for conditioner & one for body wash.  No more bars or shampoos cluttering my bathroom</review_text>
This dispenser is easy to install and works perfectly every time. After initially filling the dispensers, it took several pumps for the product to dispense but after that it comes out on the first push of the button. It has been very convenient in my shower and no more shampoo bottles all over the shower! It also saves on my shampoo because the kids just push the button twice to dispense the amount they need instead of pouring shampoo out of the bottles and using more than they need</review_text>
Used to have a lot of liquid soap and shampoo get washed down the drain by my two kids... kids will be kids... but now they really like having their own dispenser buttons to push. Easy to mount and easy to use</review_text>
I received this for Christmas from my Amazon Wishlist. I wanted to give it a couple of months of use before reviewing.I was a long time user of Norelco shavers, but switched to a blade since I couldn't get a close enough shave. Now that the whiskers are mostly gray, you can't tell for a few days if I shaved or not, so closeness is no longer an issue. I typically use this shaver in the shower, and have noticed that if you wash your face first, it takes more of the Cool Skin creme to give a smooth, close shave. Just a hint, guys. For the most part this shaver does a good job of getting around the wrinkles, dimples and Adam's apple cleanly with very little drag. My only complaint is that the trimmer head is a separate attachment and that makes it difficult to trim the 'stash & sideburns while showering. Small complaint that doesn't remove any ratings stars. All in all a great shaver</review_text>
(....).  It takes some getting used to, but after a couple of weeks it provides a very comfortable shave.  I got razor burn on my neck for the first couple weeks, but I think I was pressing too hard like I had to with my old razor.  Just a light touch gives a close shave.  The attachable sideburn trimmer doesn't do a very good job in my opinion, but I kept my old razor that worked better for that purpose.  The gel packs go pretty quickly, but maybe I'm using too much.  I'm still trying to get the hang of it.  It's a different experience than your basic razor</review_text>
This shaver replaced a Norelco Advantage (6 years old) that was shaving good but would no longer hold a charge for more than a couple of days.  I can't honestly say if it shaves as close as a blade because I haven't shaved with a blade in many years.I have used foil shavers in the past (Braun and Panasonic) and though they might shave closer than a rotary the cost to replace the foils and the nicks that you get is not worth it.I have been using this shaver for about 3 months.  During that time I have charged it only twice including the initial charge and that is using it at least every other day.  At first I thought it was underpowered because it is so quiet but soon found out that it shaves much closer than my old Advantage which I thought was doing a great job.It shaves quick and close ( Personally I think as close as a blade).  When you are done shaving you just rinse it under the tap and let it dry. It doesn't get any easier than that. I have cleaned the heads once as stated in the instructions and that is easy too.The only con is I have dry sensitive skin and have not seen any difference between the 3 comfort settings. Use electric shave before shaving and I think that you will agree that it shaves as close as a blade without the irritation.Highly recommended and worth the price.</review_text>
I ordered this parfum because it is really cheap. I received it 4 days after ordering, delivered very fast. The flavor is very nice, make me feel comfortable</review_text>
Replacement blades are a must. The razor will remind you about once a year which is fine in most cases. But, if you have a heavy beard or shave more than once a day, as I do, then you should replace the blades every 8 months or so. The reminder on the razor is only a suggestion, not a command. After all, it does not know when the blades get dull. So, I simply ignore the reminder and replace the blades when I feel it is necessary.One thing you must do is use the new blades for several days until they settle in and adjust to your skin. Until then you may have a little irritation. Another problem I have solved is the hair on my neck. I use to think the harder I press the razor, the better it would get those stray hairs. But, all I got was a rash. I discovered that if I simply use a very light touch and not press hard then it got those hairs much better and with no redness.Replace your blades at least once a year and your face with thank you</review_text>
We received these cards as a christmas gift.  They are very well made.  The quality is outstanding.  Some have beads on them and some have details that you cannot get on a card without spending a fortune for them.  Well worth it to buy them.  You won't be disappointed!</review_text>
THESE BATTERIES ARE USED NON-STOP, ONE SET IN AND ONE ON THE CHARGER. NO PROBLEMS WOULD BUY AGAIN !</review_text>
It's useful.  Not the prettiest, but it makes reading more comfortable, especially for those times when you don't feel like sitting all proper at the table or desk</review_text>
My fiance (now wife) and I have been looking for a workable solution for the hair down under.  She has tried waxing - too painful - and shaving would cause a lot of bumps and irritation, even with the Shick Intutition.  Her pubic region was basically living on Neosporen, Bikini Zone, and Gold Bond (not together and not in any particular order).  We also tried scissors, but that was hard to negotiate, if you will, in the more intimate of areas.  At this point she was seriously thinking laser hair removal, but wasn't ready to pony up the $$ and commit to an irrevocable decision.  Although, based on the other posts here and accepted fashion trends, I highly doubt that an "au natural massive overgrowth" will be in style.The trimmer is great.  Yes, Amazon should take down the photo of the storage pouch.  Yes, it won't get you totally smooth or bald.  But it is a well built TRIMMER, which is painless and easy to use.  You can adjust the length you want, and you can easily work around the more sensitive and intimate southern locations.Just take it easy around the labia minora and remember to use a mirror.  If you want the smooth look, use this handy device before you break out the razor and shaving cream/lotion. It makes it much easier and cuts down on irritation.I suppose, although we have no interest in it, that you can get creative with styling your pubic hair into shapes and designs.  Hey what ever works for you and/or you an your partner</review_text>
I take two of this product before bed and it relaxes me and helps me sleep</review_text>
The satin finish and the design are very attractive.  I had to pump each chamber about 100 times to get it primed but after that it worked great.  You might want to prime it with water instead of shampoo to get things going.  The directions, which I lost, said something about priming.Installation was easy.  It includes both glue or 4 short adhesive strips.  I went with the adhesive strips and it seems secure.  I figured if I ever have to remove it, I could just pull it off and use Goof Off to remove the adhesive.If you fill one of the chambers with body soap, I recommend Neutrogena Rainbath Refreshing Shower and Bath Gel, Original Formula and a natural sponge.  I bought a synthetic sponge that looks like a natural one at Wal-Mart and it's a little rough</review_text>
I bought this to try it out based on a friend's recommendation.  Previously I'd always packed a couple old ratty towels with the dog's stuff before heading to the lake or the beach.  Now I only need one towel and it dries like you'd never believe.  I have a 65 pound dog that loves the water.  I make him shake the water off himself (a trick as important as sit or lay down when you have a dog this big) then I towel him dry in less than a minute.  I now own 3 of these towels and have purchased them for just about anyone I know with a dog that gets wet.  We live in Seattle so not only are we surrounded by lakes other bodies of water, but we have rainy winters.  Having one of these towels hanging behind the door with the coats was a god send this winter as well.  I can't speak enough praise about this towel.  Though a $30 pricetag for a meer towel could seem daunting, believe me when I tell you this is worth it.  You'll end up buying two</review_text>
Okay, I haven't owned a new hair dryer for over 25 years, but I must say, this one is exactly perfect and has everything I would ever want in a hair dryer.  It has a retractible chord and is and dries my hair quickly, leaving it soft and frizz-free.  I highly recommend this product</review_text>
The best price around for this type massager.  Price was my main reason for the purchase.  Mine does heat up, but the massager does have to be running for a few minutes before you notice it.  The programmable feature is nice as well as the many variable speeds.  I would highly recommend it.</review_text>
Just received this massager and my wife and I can't stop massaging each other with it. Especially great deal for the special Amazon price. I've been wanting one of these for years because I can hardly feel those little hand held ones (that just fit in the palm of your hand). Glad I splurged.Only problem is that Amazon site says "7 heads", Item description says "6 heads", and actul product only included 5 heads. The one missing, from the picture on the box, is the "Acu Point" heads. I'm guessing that's why it's on sale? Still worth it if you get it on sale. Great massager.</review_text>
I have tried lots of protein powders.  I get online the low-carb, low-calorie protein powders as I am just trying to put on muscle and it is hard to find one that you can stomach.  I was stuck on Champions Whey (Chocolate) for the past year as the best but I just got my shipment of the Gold Standard - Cookies & Cream and it is AMAZING!  I love this stuff.  I tried it with fat free milk in just a shaker bottle and it was tremendous.  I am going to have this before and after my daily workout, but best yet, rather than binging on any ice cream desires late at night, I am going to get a scoop of fat free frozen vanilla yogurt, put a scoop of this in with some fat free milk and I have my fat free protein shake</review_text>
I've used hot air brushes for a couple years.  This works better than my last.  The low setting and the larger brush works better for me.  The high setting blows the hair off the bristles.  It's nice having the small brush option for different styles though.  I believe my hair stays styled longer and without as much work and injuries using a hot air brush versus a curling iron</review_text>
So far, these fit the bill. Just used them for the first time--find that they are easy to put on, and comfortable--and better yet, don't interfere with jewelry as they would if they hung off a chain/rope/string</review_text>
Very convenient to use. However, since the neck band is rigid and does not fold, it is difficult to carry</review_text>
Excellent product. Works well.Only problem is that the container holding water could be bigger</review_text>
I have to write a review for the below review (the one I have in quotes). The below reviewer states this is 170 Watts and you need 1875 watts. I nearly fell off my seat! Not only by the review but by how many people recommended it! FIRST, 100 watts is average for a hair straighter. 170 watts is excellent! 1875 would melt your hair! I did not think it was fair that this person rated the item without having knowledge on wattage."This straightener only has 170 watts of heating power. That is not a very good number! If you want salon-straight hair you need a ceramic straightener with 1875 watts... especially if you have thick or very frizzy hair!</review_text>
I love this straightener!  I have had two other straighteners including one from a salon that cost over $80 and this one works much better then either of the other two.  All my friends also love it and are always asking to barrow it</review_text>
I never thought that I could get my hair straight enough to actually like it.  Until I found this VS Sassoon straightener.  It is THE BEST!!  I use it all the time and I love the way that it makes my hair look shiny and feel feather soft.  I would tell anyone with wavy or curly hair who wants super straight, soft hair, to use this product.  You can't go wrong!</review_text>
I used this product and can't say enough good things about it. My friend bought it for me for my birthday and it was fun and easy to use and I lost 30 pounds in 6 months and I was never hungry. I ate at restaurants and always managed to find a perfect menu in my DietMate. I love it.  thank yo</review_text>
CliC Eyewear is a thoroughly convenient way to wear reading glasses. I keep them with me hung around my neck all the time.  The glasses are made well.  Almost every person who sees me click them together wants to know where I got them</review_text>
Very convenient to use. However, since the neck band is rigid and does not fold, it is difficult to carry</review_text>
My husband bought three pairs of these glasses, and they are the only pair that he hasn't lost yet.  He absolutely loves them.  Just keep them around his neck all day and clips them together for quick use.  I think they look funny; but who cares- they are convenient and a great product</review_text>
The only sunglass reading glasses I could find, plus because they can hang around the neck I don't forget where they are</review_text>
For the last 15 years I have been a manual razor user.  I decided to try an electric razor and after researching found the Norelco 7745X to be just what I wanted.  I can say that I am glad I did.  It is very quiet and the lotion dispenser definitely makes shaving a joy</review_text>
I bought this vaporizer several weeks ago. I feel better after I use this. It created steam very fast (about 2-3 minutes after plugging). You may have to fill some salt to make it create a lot of steam. However, a lot of steam means the water will decrease rapidly so if you want to use this vick for a long time(about 12-20 hours), you may not need to use salt</review_text>
We only use Seventh Generation laundry products now. It is amazing how much better our clothes feel with these products. The baby detergent gets the babies very dirty clothes very clean in our front loader</review_text>
A good product, to be sure...I've used Seventh Generation's other laundry detergents and have been very pleased. This "review" is however a cautionary: while it states on Amazon that each bottle cleans 40 loads, it is only rated for 18 loads. Just a heads up![note: I tried to notify Amazon about this but their system for corrections is inoperable at the moment. Thus, this "review"</review_text>
My first Aquis mitt was rectangular. I like this one better.  Rounding the edges makes sense since it is meant to be worn on the hand.  Aquis microfiber is the only fabric I use on my face. It is gentle on the skin, yet cleans more thoroughly than anything else I have used. (I find it amazing that both attributes apply to the same fabric!)If the manufacturer is listening, I would like to be able to buy the mitts in sets of 2. This would be perfect for bathing baby/children. There is a slit in the seam, on the thumb side, so your thumb can protrude. You can grip/lift without removing your mitts. Some size choices (S/M & L/XL) would be nice, as this mitt would not fit a large man's han</review_text>
The roller balls are excellent!  The rolling action and three different speeds are excellent as well.  The only drawback is the mesh over the pillow.  It is abrasive to the skin.  I have had to put a thin pillow case on top of it and that solved the problem.  The only other problem is it has a hard area where your head lies so you must make sure you are situated properly.  Other than that, it is the best machine on the market I have found and I have tried many</review_text>
Casein is a great, long-lasting protein, perfect for right before bed as its aminos are release more slowly than whey.  Casein, in general, is bland (think no fat, no salt, cottage cheese), and harder to mix than whey.  Optimum Nutrition has here a decent casein, that is not too bad tasting and mixes better than most every other casein I've tried.  The price is ok, but I'd like to see it cheaper (who wouldn't?).  I mix it with whey and use it throughout the day.  I have tried and rejected the chocolate flavor</review_text>
Yes it is pricey but worth it.I tried the Gilette skin care and liked it. At that point, $5 bucks for 1.7 ounces felt crazy. So when I bought this I thought I must be mad. But for my skin it works fantastic. It also has the distinct advantage of how it dispenses. You get a controlled amount unlike a tube by pressing down on the top. Yes you can not see how much is left. But I have had tubes that are not clear and you are in the same boat. At least here you have the best possible non-clear dispenser you could get.I have always had good skin so I do not need that much to have good results. It is not greasy nor does it have much of a fragerence. It leaves my skin feeling smooth and has made shaving easier and smoother. Probably the Q10 is a bunch of hype. And yes I usually buy Sauve or 'Swiss formula' which are much less pricey.I can get 2 months out of 1.7 ounces. Under $4 a month to feel great and help protect my skin? Worth it to me</review_text>
I've had other razors and believe me, this one is the most reliable on I've had! It works well, does NOT hurt? (maybe the people who had one that pinches or hurts them got a bad one?) A feature I like and use often is the head pops up to cut longer hair...unfortunately at times I need this before I use the regular cutter. Battery life is acceptable, power is good, and just a few swipes is all you need. You really can't compare a blade razor to an electric- they are not yet comparable for cutting or time used. This razor, however, has a better level of shaving than other electrics, closer to a blade than the others. In convenience an electric is much better than any blade- you can use it anywhere, dry, just sittin' around</review_text>
Amazon still hasn't quite figured out how to ship these... mine arrived with one case broken open, although the whole thing had been stuffed in a clear garbage bag</review_text>
I have Pergo and cannot get it too wet or the floor will bubble.  The Swiffer Wet cloths are the perfect solution. They're so incredibly easy to use and there are no water spills to watch out for once you're done.  I hate that I'm consuming a product that is so disposable, but at the same time, it works so well</review_text>
Adds a great fragrance to the room. We bought several different scents and placed them throughout the house. It's a different smell in every room. What a pleasant change from smelling the pets.</review_text>
This was almost too strong for me at first.  I put it on the lower level of the house and it took away that "basement" smell for months.  I was impressed with the "throw" this thing had.  I would definitely repurchase.</review_text>
I bought this item because I was going to Europe for a month. I didn't want the hassle of using a voltage converter because you can only use one electric item at a time, unless you buy more than one converter kit. You do need a plug adaptor, (these are relatively inexpensive), then you just switch the voltage, plug it in and it works great. I used it in Switzerland, France and Italy. When I came home to the States I just switched the voltage back and I now use it at home. It is small and takes up very little space in the suitcase. I would recommend it for anyone in need of a hair dryer traveling abroad</review_text>
I purchased this hair dryer for an unusual reason:  my old 1875 watt Conair was actually too much wattage for my bathroom (the circuit kept tripping), so I was actually looking for a dryer with LESS wattage.  However, I didn't want to sacrifice power, as I hoped not to have to devote any additional drying time to my shoulder-length hair.So far, I've been pleased with this hair dryer.  It does seem a bit louder than my previous model--not obnoxiously so, just a higher, more concentrated fan noise.  The dryer is extremely light and compact; it's actually smaller than my folding travel dryer.  It is very basic, with a choice of high/low settings only (there is no heat/cool option), but it seems to dry my hair just as efficiently as my old higher-wattage dryer.Overall, this is a very good basic hair dryer which gives you a wide variety of use options for a great price</review_text>
This is a great little dryer if you travel, or just for home use.Well worth the price.Cookiema</review_text>
Compared to the Conair 1,600W I have used for the past seven years or so it sounded incredibly loud and high-pitched when I first turned it on, but you may have a high-pitched blow dryer now--compared to my old Conair--and won't notice a difference. It doesn't have a cold air feature, which many women use regularly to either finish off their styling or to cause less damage to the hair; or like me, in the summer when the option of switching from hot to cold is preferable. These two drawbacks, especially having only the hot at high or low setting, is why I give it four out of five, instead of five out of five star rating.Pluses: price--for $13 it can't be beat for the frugal shopper; efficiency--it blowdries my hair a bit faster than the Conair did though I don't understand the science behind that; appearance--it's cute and compact; weight--a toddler could wield this blow-dryer with ease; carrying ease--small enough to fit neatly in just about any drawer or a crammed gym bag, under the sink, et cetera.I haven't had this long enough to rate how durable it is, so I hope someone who's owned one for at least a year comes on to write, "it's still going strong.</review_text>
This is an exceptional value for an exceptional dryer.  I have paid alot more for more well known, brand named dryers.  I have long THICK hair and this product dries my hair in half the time other dryers have done in the past.  Buy this hair dryer, you won't be sorry</review_text>
I appreciate the gentle, yet powerful cleaning of All Free Clear Allergen Detergent.  I have an infant & find this cleans her clothes & ours well without leaving any harsh irritants, so it's easier to do the family's laundry all together</review_text>
Great tasting bar. Nice and soft make it easy to eat</review_text>
I have been very satisfied with the monitor.  It is easy to use and seems to be quite accurate.  I was disappointed to find when I opened the box that there were no instructions included.  A quick phone call had them on the way.  I was able to use it without the instructions but could not set the time, etc.  All-in-all it is a quite satisfactory device</review_text>
I have used the unit for about two weeks, with NiMH rechargable batteries installed, and it performs as advertised. There is, in my opinion, a design flaw: the Start/Stop button acts as the power on{off function, and is easily depressed at unwanted times, e.g. putting into or removing from the case.  They could/should have included an AC adapter</review_text>
This parfum is the most superlative of fragrance that hit the liquid stands today and for decades to come. It has such an amazing aroma it almost makes you want to eat it! It is by far, in my zestfull opinion the odoriferous maximus of profumo! I give this bold Majesty of the monarchy, the (il Duce)! FIVE STARS "*****"</review_text>
I purchased the Sound Therapy Radio to take on a trip.  My roommate is a snorer, and I figured I needed the sound. I tried it out at home and liked it.  It has a good variety of sounds and is easy to figue out how to use. The alarm and clock are added goodies for me as I was looking for a sound machine that was small and light enough for travel.  It was a good buy for my purposes.</review_text>
I like the portability and adjustability of this mirror.  It takes up little space and can be stowed away very compactly.  It serves my needs very well.  I was disappointed that only the magnifying mirror is lit.  I tend to use the normal mirror more often.  The other is the clock loses it's setting when I stow it away.  It has to be reset and left out if you were really wanting to use the clock feature.  As far as I am concerned...I was looking for a mirror and really could care less about the clock</review_text>
My husband and I love this thermometer for our own use - let alone the grandkids! It's fast, easy, and reliable. Highly recommend it</review_text>
I tried the ear thermometers and NEVER could get them to work.Our pediatrician used one of these "rub across the forehead" kind at her office during a checkup and said it was as accurate as the ear kind and MUCH easier to use ... especially when kids have earaches (... grabbing an itty-bitty earlobe and sticking that hard end into the swollen, sore ear canal??? ... ouch.)With a minute's practice (after reading the instructions), you get the hang of using it and never dread checking temperatures again</review_text>
I have been using this razor for about 6 years now, probably as long as they have been out. They may be pricey but well worth it. I used to use disposables and nicked/cut my legs almost every time. I switched to these and have maybe nicked my legs very little. It is so quick and easy to use, and my legs are much smoother than they ever were with disposables and shaving creams. They do only last for 3-5 shaves, but if you figure in the price of disposables and shaving cream, it's probably not that much more expensive</review_text>
This has helped my wife and I to lower our cholesterol.  I take it in conjunction with Red Yeast Rice Extract(this must be taken at night) because my numbers are very high.  My wife's numbers are right on borderline.  We took blood tests before and after using it and have seen great improvements.  My numbers went down 37 points in a few months and my wife's numbers went down about half of mine.  (I also take double the dose she does.)  It's a great way to keep healthy, naturally.  My father-in-law started using it and has seen improvements, also.  His dangerous PSA numbers (prostrate) even dropped radically.  We don't know if that was due to the fish oil-but he believes it was.  His dr. said he'd never seen numbers drop that much.  We tell just about everyone we know about it.</review_text>
Recommend it. Suppressed my appetite the first day. When I got hungry it took a few bytes to feel full again</review_text>
I just started taking this pill because I don't have time to eat at the job I was previously at.  It helped a lot!! I did lose 8 pound in 1 week. But when I started an office job, I had more than enough time to eat, but I still kept up with taking the pill.  It helps with my hunger, it really does.  I used to be so hungry and fill up my plate more than I can eat!  Now since taking this pill I am sensible with my portions and do not rush to eat as if I'm starving like before.  I agree with one of the reviews, if you still eat when you're not hungry, this pill will not help you.  You have to have the in mind that you want to help yourself eat better, slower and sensible portions.</review_text>
I have not been overweight for many years, but I still have that last 5-10 pounds that just will not stay off. I have several issues with eating - I tend to eat very large portions when I am really enjoying a meal, I snack a lot, and I have a major sweet tooth. This product has taken care of all 3 problems.I am currently taking 1000 mg 3 times a day. I plan to cut back a little once I'm at my target weight. I find that this dosage will generally suppress my appetite and/or urge to eat for 3-6 hours.It's odd for me to experience hunger without cravings and a frantic urge to eat...but that's what the pills do for me. Most of the time I can tell I'm hungry only because my stomach is growling and it has been several hours since my last meal...but I don't feel like I have to eat anything right away. I can go grocery shopping when I'm hungry and not make poor choices, and even when I finish up at the gym after work I don't feel ravenous anymore.I definitely get full faster. It doesn't feel like it used to when I overate, I just can tell I've eaten enough and I stop. What a concept! And often I can just have a bite or two and be good for another 30-60 min if I'm too busy to sit down and eat.My urge to snack has really been curbed. I still have one or two snacks most days, but they are much smaller and often more healthy. Now I can actually stay up several hours past dinner without making another mini-meal, which I used to do almost every night.Hoodia does not completely kill my appetite, it suppresses it quite a bit but more than anything it takes away all of my cravings. That is definitely my favorite part - I used to crave sugar from morning until night practically every day. Since my first day on these pills, the only time I've had sweets is when someone has offered me something. I'm able to eat just a little and not wish for ten times more. It does not occur to me to go to the vending machine at work anymore, or buy candy when I'm shopping.Maybe even more than the weight loss, the emotional benefits of these pills are incredible for me. I'm no longer berating myself constantly for overeating or having too much candy or dessert. I'm not depressed all day anymore because my favorite pants have gotten snug, and all I can think about is why I don't have the willpower to prevent it.I would DEFINITELY recommend this product, especially to anyone who has issues with food like I do</review_text>
This protein is unbelievable. I have tried *many* different brands/varieties and this is without a doubt one of the best out there. It doesn't have the characteristic nausiating whey smell or taste, it's not too sweet, mixes lump-free in cold or piping hot water and packs a punch with 23g of easily digestable protein per scoop. Once you try it, this stuff will definitely become a staple in your pantry.</review_text>
It cost a little more, but it's worth it.  It keeps the last 5 temperatures so you can compare</review_text>
I have a preemie who's temperature needs to be monitored pretty much constantly.  At every diaper change we were taking axial temps with one of those standard digital thermometers.  TORTURE!  Took forever and baby screamed her head off the whole time.  Then my sister got this thermometer for us and it is fabulous.What we like:1. When baby is screaming, the light blinks and then goes solid when temp is done, great when you can't hear the beep.2. It truly does take a second unless baby is thrashing about.3. Produces a long beep when you are taking your own temperature, no guesswork about when it's finished which is an improvement over earlier models.What we don't like:1. Preemies have TINY ear holes.  So we have had to wait till our baby's ear was big enough to be able to use this thing.2. The lens covers are a pain to switch out and keep on hand, it would be nice if there were a way to just sanitize the lens after each use.3. We see a discrepancy of almost one degree between the left and right ear which makes us question the accuracy somewhat.  The enclosed brochure explains various causes of this, but that doesn't help when trying to determine what exactly your baby's temperature is.We have done both the axial and ear temp and found that the right ear on our baby corresponds with the digital thermometer's reading on her armpit.  However, the enclosed chart shows the variances between oral, rectal, axial, and ear temperatures which make it somewhat confusing.  So we alternate between the digital and the ear thermometer just to be sure.I personally WOULD recommend this thermometer for older babies and kids, just be sure that you test it out when kids are healthy to figure out your baseline and what is normal.  It takes some investigation to develop your method based on what your needs are, but it is a nice, quick to use product and my family LOVES using it for adult temperature readings.  We think we will be happier with it when baby is bigger and we are using it for sick readings only</review_text>
As a tape measure, it does what it says it does. You press a button and the tape tightens around your body part. You won't have to worry about, "Did I hold the tape tigher last time?" as the tension is always the same for consistent measurements every time. The tape starts measurement at 2" since the tape casing holds the tape and that part measures around 2 inches. I think this tape is accurate plus-or-minus half-an-inch but it sure beats a regular tape measure since at least the button ensures that each time the tape wraps around you at the same tension level</review_text>
at first i didn't quite get how great this shaving cream is because you have to work a little harder to get it to lather than the other shaving creams or gels i had been using. but once it breaks into a lather, it's great. plus it lasts at least 3 times longer than regular cans of shaving cream/gel. i'm buying this from now on</review_text>
I was amazed at how well this device worked and how easy it was to setup out of the box. The best part, naturally, is how well it worked on clearing out my clogged nasal passages. I feel refreshed everytime I used it. It took awhile to get the drainage to stop, but I am glad I purchased this system. It works</review_text>
First of all, let me say this product is great in almost every way. So if you need to feel better about your nose and/or throat, go for it.My main complain about the Grossan Hydro Pulse is that it is noticeably expensive. Some time ago, Grossan was making just his own irrigator tip matching it to a Waterpik machine that cost a half the price of the Hydro Pulse. But then, Grossan decided to produce his own machine and, if I'm right, Viajet is making it for him. Viajet sells the same machine, except for the Grossan tip, at about -again- a half the price of the Hydro Pulse.  The Breathe-ease solution that you might use along with the irrigator is also expensive (I have check this comparing it with a simillar product that can be purchased in my country).So what makes the Hydro Pulse so expensive? Maybe health is a business, after all.Other than that, like I have said, this product is great for almost any respiratory problem. I used to irrigate my nose with a similar solution that comes in a 135 ml bottle, and is intended to use it over 50 times. The Hydro Pulse lets you do a 500 ml clean everytime, so you get the idea.Also, if you are suffering respiratory problems and want to chek an interesting drug-free treatment, look for the Buteyko Method</review_text>
Product is exactly what you would expect.  I have been using it for 2 months 3-5 times a day with great success.  I would buy it again knowing how well it works</review_text>
I'm not a sucker for advertising and I'm definitely not an impulse buyer.  But I did purchase a Schick Quattro razor some time ago to replace my old, tired blade.  And I've been satisfied thoroughly with it.  However, after needing some refills, I bought these Titanium Coated Blades.  Wow.  I didn't believe it at first but I actually took a new titanium blade and the regular Schick blades and (I can't believe I'm about to confess this...) did one of those hokey "side-by-side" tests.  This blade is excellent.  It is an upgrade above their standard blade and, to me, worth the difference in price</review_text>
I've owned this item for about a year and it works great.  Comfortble to sleep several days in a row on and never had a problem with it deflating.  I recommend this item</review_text>
After reading other reviews on air mattresses I was worried that this mattress would not last long before a leak developed.  But it's been over 2 months and so far so good.  I sleep on it every night, (I'm buying a real bed when I move in June) and it is holding up</review_text>
Looking for something small and portable? This is Perfec</review_text>
my kids love this it fades right into the next color they fall right to sleep watching it change its an awesome light i was very pleased and its not to bright like some light up the room its just perfect mom of a 3 and 5 yr old !!</review_text>
this is exactly what i wanted--the last 1 i bought is over 10 yrs old and still going--i was afraid each day it would go out and could not find a replacement anywhere---you are a life--i mean, hair saver!!diane in texa</review_text>
I have 3 of the priva ultra waterproof sheet protectors and love the product! It saves washing the whole bed. Just put a draw sheet over the protector and it saves so much laundry. Washes and dries extremely well</review_text>
I bought two of these for my son....hoping to wean him out of pull-ups at night, without having to strip the whole bed when there is an accident.  This pad is definitely leakproof.  The only con is that even though it says it has an anti-slip backing....that is not the case.  I have tried it with jersey sheets, and flannel sheets...but it does move alot and get bunched up.  So, I do end up having to strip the bed every now and then because the pad moved during the night.   If I had it to do over again, I would definitely buy the pad with the tuck-under flaps.</review_text>
Alka-Seltzer got it right and in a big way. Drink this and 20 minutes later your headache is gone and your stomach is settled so you can motor down to the local taco stand for some much needed nourishment. I prefer the regular flavor as opposed to the citrus.</review_text>
B&B Styling Creme is absolutely the greatest hair product I have ever used.  Thanks for making it available on line</review_text>
I bought the first mattress topper for myself and my husband.  After the first night I knew I wanted one to put in our RV too.  My husband complained about the smell when I unpacked the topper but that dissipates quickly and he too slept well and woke up without back pain for the first time in years.  He had me order one for his sister for Christmas. I thought my sister would enjoy this comfortable mattress topper so now I have purchased four!  This is a wonderful product.  I would recommend it to anyone</review_text>
I am diabetic and I have been losing about 10 lbs per month for 6 months eating these bars as a between meal source of protein.  They satisfy my taste for something sweet and are filling.</review_text>
I've used the Pigeon brand (I believe it's from Japan) milk storage bags- those are the best-quality bags I've ever used. Unfortunately, they're also very difficult to find. These Lansinoh bags are a good substitute at 1/3 of Pigeon's price. Not bad at all! My baby and I travel a lot so I bring along my stock of bmilk in these Lansinoh bags. No mishaps thus far. Highly recommended</review_text>
I love these bags. They are easy to get out of the container, easy to open and close, and once the milk is in, they stand on their own. To be honest, I haven't tried other brands, so these may not be the only great ones</review_text>
I've used this product with two of my children with out problems.  I have never had a leak unlike with some of the other brands.  Suggestions: Write the date on the bag before you start to pump or a nurse once suggested that you use labels.  Also, never fill the bag!  It's only meant to hold 6 oz.These bags are much thicker than the Gerber bags and they are the only ones to have the double zipper. I used these liners with my Avent Disposable system and standard bottles.I've gone through over 600 of these bags and I must say Amazon has the best price around</review_text>
These bags are much sturdier and thicker than the Gerber bags.  You also don't have to cut the bags open after defrosting/heating them up.  Amazingly they are cheaper than the Gerber bags too!  I've used them for several months and haven't had one leak yet.  But I am pretty careful and store the milk bags flat in tupperware containers in the freezer</review_text>
THIS IS A GREAT PRODUCT. I USE IT ON MY EYEGLASSES AS WELL AS MY COMPUTER SCREEN,TV SCREEN. RECOMMEND IT TO AL</review_text>
I have used every diaper in the market and narrowed it down to pampers and huggies, I have a big 21 month old baby and been looking for the perfect night time diaper with no leaks!! My son still fits in the size % diapers but this is the one we specifically use at night and been really happy about it, no leaks, no gel coming out of the diaper and defintely a happy baby when he wakes up in the morning!</review_text>
I used the Huggies Overnite diapers on my son at night until we started potty training.  I used to put absorbent inserts inside his pull-ups to get him through the night without leaks, but even that didn't work very well.  Finally, Huggies came out with an overnight pull-up - and it really works well!!!  Excellent product</review_text>
I have had this straightener for a while, and I still have no complaints about it.  It is an affordable option for those looking for a pretty good straightener.  I love the heat settings... I only need to put mine on the second setting (338 degrees) for it to do a good job, and I have very thick wavy/curly hair.  I like the 1" because it allows me to flip out the ends of my hair, but I'm sure the 2" one is great too</review_text>
I get this stuff for my husband.  He's got really thick hair and it has the tendency to get oily but this stuff makes his hair perfectly soft and shiny.  It's worth the money</review_text>
I used the Remington twice up to now, and the bottom line it is a great machine, you will never need to lube it, and that is a big deal with clippers. its easy to clean, sharp and easy to work with</review_text>
Wonderful for getting all of your trigger points in your back especially, but also in your neck and feet.  Your body feels so relaxed after using the TheraCane.</review_text>
I have had a number of surgeries and injuries over the years.  I see a chiropracter and a physical therapist every few weeks. Both of them work wonders, but then my body tightens up.  I can't afford to see them every day!  I bought the theracane because I saw someone else with one at a long distance cycling event.  Now I've purchased another 3 to share with friends.It works!  This tool has helped me stay loose, and has taken away a lot of the shoulder stiffness that I have suffered for the past 7 years.  I suggest the addition of the trigger point therapy workbook, which will give you a lot of the details about the body and why/where it hurts.  But even if you don't want to study, you can still get lots of benefits from daily use of the theracane</review_text>
The knots in my back - my "spots" never really go away due to posture and my work in front of the computer.  One day I asked a coworker what the odd green thing by his desk was.  He explained the concept, I tried it for about two seconds and immediately knew this was something special.   The leverage is perfect for zeroing in on your back knots and applying STRONG pressure to them - like having a strong friend digging their knuckle in and holding it there.  I bought one the next day.  You don't need an expensive vibrating massage wand that has all sorts of silly features - just this simple stick that can pinpoint and dissolve all your stress spots.</review_text>
Its a nice little trimmer and not cumbersome at all like the remington trimmers. It has a cheap little organizer but as long as your not rough with it, it shouldnt break. Another benefit is that you can rinse all the attachments under hot water in addition to brushing the hair out prior to that to ensure a very clean trimmer.Just remember folks this is a trimmer not a wet blade or electric razor..it will leave a very fine layer of stubble which is fine by me. A man can still look neat if he shapes up the facial hair before reducing it to fine stubble. My shaving experience with this thing is pleasant...it does not pull hairs which is very refreshing for a trimmer. The only other device I never had/have that problem with is my braun 360 complete (parts of the year I shave, other parts of the year I trim). Its a very nice package and efficient. The only drawback is that it seems fragile...so be careful not to drop any part of this set</review_text>
This is the razor to use!  Excellent product, does what is says</review_text>
Lathers well, with a pleasant (subtle) scent.  Shipping costs spoil some of the fun.  You might consider BarclayCrocker, given its shipping and product costs</review_text>
This is a fine, well lasting bar of soup that smells like sweet oranges--you will catch wiffs of the very pleasant fragrance every time you enter the bathroom.  It reminds me of tangerine lifesavers, if that helps.It's a big bar, too, the dimensions of the bar are, in inches:  4 x 2.5 and 1.5 thick</review_text>
I've had one of these little trimmers for four or five years now.  It does its jobs, and I've have no reliability problems at all.One word of advice -- don't use it on "the boys" without the little plastic guard or you'll be sorry..</review_text>
When my baby was a newborn we left our closet light on all night at first so we could check on him.  It was also a jarring necessity to turn on the overhead light for diaper changes and feedings.  Then I bought one of these lights and was impressed at the perfect amount of light it gives out.  Just enough to see your baby by, but not enough to keep everyone awake.  It's been almost a year now, and I'm just about to purchase two more.  We use the light now in our toddler's room and turning it on is now part of our bedtime routine.  We use it every night</review_text>
What I wanted for Christmas was something to turn my bath tub into a whirlpool, and my boyfriend bought this for me. The bubbles are no doubt amazing, they're plenty strong even at the lowest setting. As for the massage part, I didn't use that too much- it just vibrates some, and the bubbles seemed to be more massaging than the vibrating massager. The only thing I did not really care for is that it was kind of difficult to keep on the tub floor. It has suction cups, but they didn't work too well- everytime I moved my feet or legs, it wanted to float to the top of the water. Overall, I'd say this is a pretty good gift! I will definitely use it many more times</review_text>
These paper towels are as good as any cheaper paper towels; they are not cloth-like or super thick, but they are as good as any other paper towels you might find for the same price that aren't made of recycled materials.  In short, they are cheap and better for the environment than non-recycled, chlorine-bleached products</review_text>
After 6 months of unexplained intense fatigue and malaise, numerous doctor visits without results, I obtained Source of Life vitamins upon the recommendation of a friend whose physician had recommended it for them.  With the very first dose, I went from dragging around to walking around--while most vitamins require weeks of use before results are seen.At my very next doctor's appointment, I told of my experience with Source of Life and I continue to report it to anyone and everyone that mentions being excessively tired.   Members of my family and several friends now regularly use this outstanding product, and have reported similar results.   Not only did I feel much better with higher energy levels, I also notice fingernail and hair growth as well.I use the liquid version and it is actually very tasty.  I highly recommend this product.  I've used it for 3 years and have obtained consistent good results.</review_text>
If you wonder why you're feeling lethargic or if you have one of those little abdominal paunches you thought was just advancing age, then you might need probiotic therapy.  You might even need it if your resistance to colds is low!Because we live much "cleaner" lives than our ancestors did, sterilizing our dishes, putting our food in the fridge, and spraying pesticides on everything, we live our lives virtually bacteria-free.  Free of the GOOD bacteria, that is.  The baddies seem to still get us, and without the good ones to balance them out, we're in trouble.A lack of friendly bacteria in your intestines can cause problems throughout your body.  To put it in "nice" terms, it's a little like having backed up plumbing inside you, and the world just ain't gonna be right until you fix it.I started on probiotic therapy several months ago, and I was amazed at the following things that happened almost immediately:*That little stomach paunch WENT AWAY.  I kid you not.  Talk about an instant self-esteem booster.*My chronic [men, cover your ears] yeast infections decreased dramatically (even without my eliminating wheat from my diet, which I know I ought to do).*I had more energy and felt more like the me of years ago.*I became more resistant to colds than I used to be.If you're considering supplementing your diet with probiotics, you should know that not all of them are created equal.  In fact, testing done by www.consumerlab.com indicates that the vast majority of probiotic supplements don't deliver the number of live organisms they claim -- not even close!  Those little creatures are very delicate, and things like processing, shipping, and sitting on your shelf can kill them.  And let's not even talk about what your stomach acid does to them.Primal Defense is one of the few supplements that delivers the amount of probiotics it claims to.  (I can tell from its effects on me.)  In addition, it contains lots of good-for-you green foods that also help build that all-important inner strength.One very important caveat about Primal Defense, though:  Because it's SO effective, don't even think about starting out taking 3 tablets a day!  Not unless you don't mind a lot of abdominal discomfort and are able to spend several days all by yourself at home.  I took one a day for about 2 months, and then I finally felt ready to move up to 2.  It'll be at least another month before I'm up to the recommended 3.One more thing:  Drink lots of water.  You need it anyway, and Primal Defense works best when you're well hydrated</review_text>
Works as advertised and I am happy with it's function.  Much nicer than other battery powered toothbrushes.  One issue is that supposed "quick change" tool to remove the brush head either I can't figure out or it is defective, but once you put it on the brush head a pin is supposed to press into a slot to release the brush head.  It never releases.  Is there a trick to do this?  Also the instructions say put on the tool press in and then pull off the brush head.  The problem with this is once the tool is on and you press in, there is no way to pull off the brush head as the tool is still attached.  Once you take the tool off the brush head will not slide out.  Anyone figured this out yet</review_text>
I have used this twice a day and love it. Best buy at this price</review_text>
I got mine for free on sale at least 6 months ago and it's great.  I know I should probably replace the head by now, but it still seems to work fine, so I don't.  I've only changed the battery once.  If you want a cheap brush that gets the job done easier than the old fashioned type, this is it.  Then again, if you're not lazy or weak, you can probably do just as good a job with a regular toothbrush and not waste batteries</review_text>
I bought this toothbrush a month ago, and have been very satistfied with it. The battery lasts about a month and the brush leaves me with a clean feeling that you can't get from a manual toothbrush. The price is good, the battery life is good, and the battery door is very easy to open! I would buy it again!</review_text>
Flax is a plant. The seeds in the flax plant are filled with flaxseed oil, (sometimes called linseed oil). The seeds contain fatty oils called alpha-linolenic acid (ALA) and linoleic acid. ALA is the omega-3 oil in flaxseed. Flaxseed contains both omega-3 fatty acids and omega-6 fatty acids. Flaxseed is nature's richest storehouse of omega-3 fatty acids, and contains more than twice as much omega-3 oil as fish oils, and it costs less , ounce for ounce. Flax also contains other important substances like lignans, which may protect against some types of cancer. The husks of the seeds are rich in mucilage. Both the seed oil and mucilage have many nutritional and therapeutic properties.There are many potential benefits from taking Flax seed oil:Flaxseed Oil lowers cholesterol levels, thereby improving cardiovascular health and lessening the risk of arteriosclerosis.Flaxseed also contains plant nutrients like phytoestrogens. These are natural estrogen-like substances that can lessen the discomfort of menopause.Flaxseed oil may lower high blood pressure.Flaxseed oil helps some people improve their psoriasis and eczema, as it has anti-inflammatory properties. Flaxseed may also reduce the itching, swelling, and redness associated with certain skin disorders such as acne.Flaxseed oil has a positive effect on rheumatoid arthritis due to its ability to calm inflammation.Flaxseed reduces LDL (low-density lipoprotein) cholesterol (the body's "bad cholesterol") and lowers triglyceride levels. Research shows that flaxseed oil gives much better protection against heart attacks than canola oil or olive oil.Taking flaxseed may reduce cancer risk. This is because flaxseed contains the richest sources of lignan building blocks, which play a major role in preventing cardiovascular diseases and cancer. New research indicates that the lignans in flaxseed have both short-term and long-term protective effects against colon cancer.Nature Made Flaxseed Oil is a quality source of flaxseed oil, as the company is well-known and reputable. One tip: keep your flaxseed oil away from light and heat, as both degrade the oil.The usual beneficial dose of Flaxseed Oil is 2-3 capsules once per day taken with a meal.Jim "Konedog" Koenig</review_text>
i love these little bibs.  i say little, because even though they are the size of regular cloth bibs, the big size Bibsters, which i also bought, are HUGE, and cover my 9mo. old baby to almost past his diapers.  i was reluctant to buy Bibsters at first, because they seemed such a waste of material being disposable- and i guess they are-- however, they serve a good purpose in that they are extremely light and thin and fully waterproof, so that my super-drooler doesn't get his outfits totally wet like he does with his cloth bibs, which i'm frequently switching out.  Bibsters are also very easy to pack into the diaper bag, and i'm never without a bib. i've also been using the big size bibsters on my 2yr old in the car, for random snack spills.  these are not really reusable, but i sometimes do use them for 2 meals, depending on how clean they are. The price was right when Amazon grocery had the spend 50 get 10 dea</review_text>
My wife loves this!  It was not too expensive, and she really has been very appreciative, esp for her eye makeup</review_text>
Love it!  Love it! Love it!  It's like a high pressure car wash. ( I don't sound like a high pressure salesman?</review_text>
This is one of those products I'd put on my "must have" list if I had an elderly parent who couldn't handle a vaccumm and had some area rugs or runners near the front door or entrance to any room. For daily touch-ups, these things can't be beat. They are extremely light and get all the stuff that gets dragged into the house between deep vacuuming.Of course, I really believe that a doormat at the front door will go a LONG way in keeping out a lot of the dust and debris. For the stuff that gets by that, use the Carpet Flick. I tend to shake out my runners and deep vaccum them regularly but I've noticed that some people who are elderly don't have the strength for that.Because I help out taking care of two people over 90, this has been a great help to them in maintaining their independence and ability to keep things clean when I'm not around...and I'm all for helping people to help themselves stay functional!</review_text>
Easy on the back and shoulders, as this is very light. It does a good enough surface job until the weekend vaccuuming. My 2 year old daughter loves to use it to help mommy! I bought this in a drug and discount store for $13.95. It's worth that</review_text>
The razor and trimmer are both easy to use and give a nice clean shave.  I am very happy with this item</review_text>
I gave this to a bearded man for Christmas. To my knowledge, he has used it only once, with no complaints. Was nice for the main reason, he had no electrical outlet in bathroom and had to drag large drop cord from another room to use old one. This one is so convenient and I am sure he enjoys it. Purchasing was a breeze. Thank yo</review_text>
I purchased this dryer to replace an older one that is far too loud.   While this new one is much quieter than the old one, it really isn't super-quiet.  Still, I have no complaints on the noise, but the flimsy wall mounting hardware is another story.  The threaded holes in the mounting plate are extremely fragile, so much so that they both were wrung out during the initial mounting of the dryer.  It didn't help any that the mounting holes were extremely hard to locate once the plate was mounted - it's hard to see thru that white plastic shell.  I ended up having to discard the original threaded screws and use two slightly larger metal tapping screws to mount the dryer to the bracket.  This worked fine, but the original mounting hardware isn't very well designed in my opinion.  Other than that the dryer seems to work very well, although I haven't had it long enough to know how well it will last.  All in all, I'd give the dryer 4 stars out of 5</review_text>
I've owned two Thermaphore heating pads, different sizes, for many years and I'm using one right now! They're quality made to last a lifetime. They trap moisture from the air so no need for soaking sponges to insert. The trigger switch allows you to heat as needed as hot as you like and if you fall asleep there are no worries of burns..if the trigger isn't depressed it isn't heating. I wouldn't be without mine. It helps me manage my arthritis/fibromylagia/nerve damage pain. I've recommended it to many of my friends who have been very pleased as well.</review_text>
This is a wonderful product. It smells great as well as works great. I was worried that it would be too drying on my skin, but it wasn't. It seemed to balance between where it was needed and where it wasn't</review_text>
As advertized, as promised - and at a savings!  (Better pricing c/w - Walmart, Target and online</review_text>
When I don't eat as many veggies as I should these are easy to take</review_text>
This makeup covers my rosea and a birthmark. Its light and lasts all day. I put it on with a brush. and I love how I don't feel or look like I have makeup on at all. Love the case and the mirror..Thanks! Jud</review_text>
I am one of the people who just doesn't like applying liquid foundation and cannot do it well, but needs more than just the light coverage of powder foundation. The New Complexion cream foundations do exactly that. I have used numerous cream (or liquid-powder) foundations and this is by far the best and at a good price as well!The neat little compact includes a mirror and separate storage space for your sponge, which I love because I hate when my sponges become covered in product, all in the same space as a regular compact. I've personally never been one to use compact mirrors, myself, however.But it's not the package or the sponge which I love, it's the product. It's neither too liquid nor is it too stiff, like some products. It's perfectly creamy and works well with the sponge it comes with.You really needn't use a lot to have even overall covered but by using more you can obtain a thicker coverage. I find that this makeup blends well with my skin and does a good job of evening out my skin tone, as well, without appearing too much like a mask.You can feel it a little but it somehow just feels right on my skin. Also, I do recommend using a powder over it to reduce shine.Overall, I love this makeup</review_text>
I do a lot of walking, as well as standing on my feet all day for work. Receiving this product as a Test Drive was FABULOUS! I never knew a cream could work so well at relieving my tired, aching feet and restoring my skin. I'd DEFINITELY recommend this product</review_text>
Got my Chillow a few months ago and wish I had not waited so long! It is great! My own personal "thermostat" having gone haywire years ago, I have wished for something to help me sleep and be cool. This is it! First, it allows my husband to cuddle up next to me without my pushing him away cause he's so darn warm and I just can't take the extra heat. Second, I have wished for a firm pillow forever!! and have tried many different pillows and a great side benefit of the Chillow is that it makes my pillow really firm. It can be a bit too cold for a minute or two, but it evens out before long. For those of you who have that problem, you might consider doing what I did. I purchased a "Bedsack" quilted & zippered pillow cover. Put the pillow + the Chillow in that and then in a pillowcase and it's just perfect. Might also help the vinyl scent that some of you complain about. I will agree that the Chillow makes my pillow very heavy, but that is my only complaint. And I'm not carrying it around so the weight is really not an issue.  Other than that, I wish I had purchased one of these Chillows long ago. It is a menopausal woman's dream come true!</review_text>
out of all the hair striaghters I have owned and I have gone through about 6 this is the best one yet! I really like it! it straightens my hair perfectly, and you cant beat the price</review_text>
Well this is marketed as a quick and healthy snack for kids, but I find it perfect for me.  It's a great charge of chocolate and not too many calories and bit of fiber, what more can you ask for</review_text>
The filter is small compared with most other systems; has a sturdy, metal fixture and pull-knob activator; filters quickly with plenty pressure; and of course it has the great Culligan taste</review_text>
Excellent product.  Really protects you.  My dermatologist recommended this product and although it's more expensive - it's worth the protection for your skin.  I'm glad my children are using it</review_text>
Finally, a product that does as it promises.  Excellent sun burn protection -- even in Hawaii</review_text>
I am very satisfied with Nizoral Anti-Dandruff Shampoo. Many anti-dandruff shampoos tend to make my hair feel dry or rough. I have thick, waist-length hair and Nizoral got rid of the dandruff and left it feeling soft and easy to manage. Unlike some anti-dandruff shampoos that have a medicinal smell, Nizoral has a pleasant fragrance. I'll definitely use this product any time I need a dandruff shampoo</review_text>
Nizoral Anti-Dandruff Shampoo seems to be a very good product. I noticed a difference the first time I used it -- there was no residue on my scalp, and my flakiness was greatly reduced. It produced a very rich lather, also. The only thing I didn't like about it was the possibility that I'd have an allergic reaction to the ingredients, but the instructions didn't tell which ingredients might make this happen. I, myself, am sensitive to many products, and didn't have any reaction to the ingredients of the shampoo. I would recommend this product to others</review_text>
Love it, love it, love it!  It got my hair soooooo straight and in record time.  I highly recommend this product.  Esp. for African American hairtypes.  :-</review_text>
excellent productmy hair was striaght and dry in a matter of minutes</review_text>
The foot massager is great. It's open design allows it to be used on the legs as well as the feet unlike others that are boot like. The massager adjusts to your size legs and feet automatically for a snug fit. The massager is adjustable to almost any configuartion with tilt, raise/lower and etc. The only problem with this device is that it can become top heavy as a result of the adjustability of it. So keeping it upright can be a bit challenging. But for the price and quality this is a great relief on the feet and legs as well as wallet</review_text>
This product is simply phenomenal. I've seen better results using this than with department store brands</review_text>
I picked this up at the store a couple of months ago, and it works well.  I does have a nice light scent initially, and it sooths the face.  It does not have any SPF though, so in summer I used a different balm. But it has been good this winter. Check it out</review_text>
It usually takes forever for me to dry my hair, but it dried really fast and STRAIGHT!  I can go a few extra weeks without a relaxer!  And the color is beautiful... I just love orange :O</review_text>
Saw this product, or maybe it was a similar one in a shop in Cairns, Australia.  It was selling for about $70 Australia Dollars.....which is still quite expensive converted to US$.  I came back to U.S. and found it on Amazon for $15.99, with free ship if I purchased $30.  So, I bought two......one for myself, one for my husband!  It is wonderful!  We wear contacts for distance, so it is such a convenience to always have it around our necks, less the neckchains, which always used to get tangled.  It's an ingenius invention</review_text>
We have a GoldenDoodle with a lot of hair and this clipper works wonderfully. It breezes right through the thickest hair! I highly recommend</review_text>
The clippers are excellent quality and cut well. We have a poodle  that has very thick hair. If you take your time, these clippers do a wonderful job</review_text>
I bought this model 7 years ago for over $100 and it is still running strong although I only use it to clip a small family dog.  Nevertheless, forget the cheap vibrating 'magnetic motor' clippers - not enough power and the buzzing bothers the animal.  This clipper uses a superior rotating motor that is more powerful and provides a consistent cutting action.  In fact, with the right (replaceable) blade, you could use this to cut kids hair as well.  It stays cool, unlike the magnetic motor design.  Use with Oster Kool Lube and you  will never have problems getting a clean cut.  It uses blades by Oster so there is a lot of versatility possible</review_text>
Man these things are the best. They can handle whatever issues I throw at them. I've done considerable load testing as I'm a truck driver who makes infrequent stops. Thanks for making my life easier. I'm totally back into life with Depends</review_text>
Saw this product, or maybe it was a similar one in a shop in Cairns, Australia.  It was selling for about $70 Australia Dollars.....which is still quite expensive converted to US$.  I came back to U.S. and found it on Amazon for $15.99, with free ship if I purchased $30.  So, I bought two......one for myself, one for my husband!  It is wonderful!  We wear contacts for distance, so it is such a convenience to always have it around our necks, less the neckchains, which always used to get tangled.  It's an ingenius invention</review_text>
Nicely designed., effecitve, close shave, very reasonable cost, BUT..could they tell you simply how to turn it ON? Embarassed to admit, took me almost 15 minutes to figure out the ON/OFF feature</review_text>
I was looking for a lightweight simple wet/dry shaving device that had inexpensive replacement foil and blade assemblies. The Panasonic WES9941P fit perfectly. Gives a nice shave, and it's so easy to clean. It replaces my old Braun single head linear. (I like the Panasonic better.) The batteries supply over two weeks of shaves on a single charge. Give it a few weeks of shaves to break in to cut real close</review_text>
Had one for the last 2 years until I tore the screen. This is the best shaver I have ever used. Shaves fast and clean.Its cheap enough that I will buy another one rather than replace the screen.Don't like the charger as it is too easy to knock the shaver off of it</review_text>
This is one of the nicest electric shavers that I've owned and the first wet-type shaver. I have previously owned Norelcos for over a decade. The original Norelcos (made in Holland) were fine but the recent ones have pathetic quality and they literally pull hair! It is painful! I eventually gave up trying to use my replacement lift-and-cut Norelco and decided to try out a high end model that cost close to two hundred dollars. Bad idea - you don't always get what you pay for! I was not quite happy with that either and after a two year haitus with disposable Gillettes, decided to try a wet shaver. I took my chance on this one, based solely on the reviews here. This is the very first "wet" shaver I've used and absolutely love it. It gives a close enough shave but not too close. You can use it with whatever shaving cream you use.Note that the Panasonic manual encourages using the cheapest foam type (not gel), Barbasol like stuff with this shaver. It also comes with a basic carrying pouch and the cleaning is as easy as it can get (just wash the thing under tap water). They really meant that this unit is washable. It is recharagable, lasts seven days on a charge, and costs less than replacement blades for competing brands. The build quality is excellent. The charger is a very clever design that gets the shaver completely off your counter space. You cannot go wrong with this. Amazon has a great value here. Sometimes you get more than you asked for and this is one of those rare things. Highly recommended.</review_text>
Shaves great wet or dry. I like it because it pivots real good. No cuts, it was worth every penny</review_text>
My husband and I have one drink of Nature's Plus every morning and sometimes at lunch or for dinner.We started out with Vanilla. I add a handful of instant oatmeal- 2 baby carrots- a spoonful of peanut butter- 5 ice cubes- 1 cup 1% milk and you're hooked!The ice cubes make it like a real shake.I have a Vita Mix and that realy makes it blend well. I blend for 30 seconds.My husband uses the Vanilla with 1 cup of 1% milk - 4 TBS of Ovaltine - a handful of oatmeal- a spoonful of peanut butter- 5 ice cubes- blend for 30 seconds and I don't have to cook!I like the Strawberry. I take a cup of milk (1%)- 6 frozen strawberries- a handful of instant oatmeal- 2 baby carrots - and 4 ice cubes. Havenly and very satisfying and losing weight to boot!</review_text>
I have tried many brands of soy shakes, and this one is delicious.. I sure recomend it to anyone that wants to start the healthy habit of drinking soy. Cookies & Cream flavor tastes like a real shake!! I really enjoy this drinks</review_text>
The product is very good, do not misunderstand me although it is not as good as the same produt when we bought it ten years ago: The curls tend to stay put less time compared with the former hair curler tubes.But still, we strongly recommend them against heat activated tubes. It's a good buy</review_text>
I bought this bag for my husband as a surprise (as I had bought another brand, and he did not like the Asian floral print).  It's very roomy, looks great, fits ergonomically.  I really love the pocket design and the space that they have, as well as the interior design.  Fits things better than my own bag!  My husband loves it and can't wait to use it!  Plus that, this is the best price I've seen online, and of course, Amazon ships quickly and accurately</review_text>
This product is a blessing for handicapped users. It is solidly built, easy to roll about with and makes being mobile a wonderful reality. Plus, I don't think you can beat the price, which gives you a model that can't be beaten. Also, delivery was lightening fast</review_text>
I absolutely love this scale!  It is easy to program and enjoyable to use.  Best of all, it's beautiful to behold</review_text>
A vitamin is a vitamin but when you pay half price then you have something</review_text>
I have, on the advice of my OB/GYN been using Dove(white) for over 25 years!!My skin is very sensitive and dry and he recommended I should use it instead of other brands. He was not wrong! It works very well for me</review_text>
There are a lot of positive comments about this mirror and some very negative comments.  I weighed both before I made my decision and chose to give more weight to the positive comments.  I am glad I did.  The light from the mirror is bright, the slide bar for the different light settings works very well.  If you hold the switch to the count of 2 or 3 and then release the lights work every time.  I enjoy the mirror very much and would buy another or recommend that someone buy it for their use.The only negative I have about the mirror is that the flourescent tubes buzz a little but I am getting accustomed and learning to tune them out.</review_text>
I bought this product specifically because it was originally described as being/having "mood-brightening Natural Spectrum light." I thought it would help on the gloomy Pacific Northwest winter days. I got it on a Friday sale price, so it seemed like a good value for the product description given here.The lamp just arrived (a few days ago - when I originally submitted this review), and the product's FAQ sheet states this product is "designed only to provide excellent quality light for daily tasks and hobbies. This lamp does *not* offer the correct level of light intensity specified by the National Institute of Mental Health for the treatment of Seasonal Affective Disorder (S.A.D.).The product literature packed with the lamp has no mention at all that this product offers "mood-brightening" light. Because of this glaring misrepresentation, I am currently debating whether to the return the lamp.I agree with the other reviewer that the adhesive labels (there are two) are VERY sticky and difficult to remove completely. I used a combination of methods to remove the adhesive residue.And I agree with the comments about the company name being printed on the front of the lamp. When I saw it in the picture, I thought it had to be some kind of company watermark or logo for the stock photo ONLY, so I was shocked to see "Verilux" actually printed/embossed into the lamp housing, in a very prominent location on the front of the lamp. Very cheesy, for a lamp of this price point and quality.If you're looking for a "clean" bright light, in a stylish, portable lamp, this is not a bad choice. But if you're looking for a full-spectrum light that does offer some light "therapy," this is probably the wrong choice. The company does have other, "therapeutic" lighting options, but at a higher price point.Nov 1, 2006 UPDATE - I was concerned enough about the original, misleading product description that I submitted my concerns to Amazon. I now see that the description had been revised since submitting those concerns. I want to thank Amazon for their very prompt response in correcting the product description, which should help other buyers make a more-informed decision.</review_text>
This is a useful tool in that it makes the software/hardware combination available at a less expensive price than any other I am aware of.  My only criticism is that there is not a lot of information on interpretation of the output, although from reading Heart Math literature one can get a sense of what one is doing.  However for the price it is definitely worth it and I could see that some people may want to get the game mostly for the option of having this expansion pack</review_text>
Dr. Bonners Pepperming Soap is our favorite.  Our sensitive skin does not react, it lasts a long time, and best of all, the peppermint aroma wakes up our senses in the mornings</review_text>
Smaller size DID NOT FIT me or my son. It would be nice if you could use perhaps a hat size to determine right size. Standard size worked fine.</review_text>
I just bought a Vespa scooter for short trips since the gas prices are so high.  I needed some eye protection that would work with my helmet.  These goggles are awesome!  They fit perfectly inside my helmet, and because the wrap around my head, they stay put.  The magnets in front are very strong so the goggles don't move.  The eye cups are just the right size and they're padded for comfort. These goggles have far exceeded my expectations.</review_text>
Good for dust storms in desert-like environments.  Great for looking suave.  Very convenient for easy on/off.</review_text>
I have a waterpik that I've used for years. After a while the tips will break. Try finding them in a store- NOT!Welcome Amazon! They have the WaterPik Replacement Tips for a reasonable price. If you go to Waterpik online they double the price due to shipping!!!Amazon ROCKS</review_text>
I love all the varieties of chocolate, and if you mix them in a blender, they are smooth and creamy.  You can add a frozen banana or a couple of ice cubes, and the shake is thick enough to be a milkshake.  Shaking by hand or using a hand-held mixer does not do these nutrition shakes justice.  These are a great meal replacement - healthy, nutritious, and full of quality protein.</review_text>
I haven't used it thoroughly yet. But from what I have seen so far, it is a pretty good scale to track your everyday fat loss progress. I am satisfied with this purchase for the price and quality and ease of use. I use it daily to track my body fat % and weight. So far used it for only myself. Haven't checked it out for more than 1 users</review_text>
this thing is really cool and works very easily.  Once you performthe 10 minute setup and enter your info (once), you just step onit and tell it what setup number your are and it takes and saves the measurement.  It seems very steady and well built and I think it should last a long time</review_text>
This scale was easy to understand and measures the same as my doctors office.   Easy to monitor weight and fat</review_text>
The best part about my ijoy 130 is the price I paid.  Day after Xmas Linens and Things had only the floor model left.  Got 20% off of that plus signed up for the credit card to get another 10% off.  30% off made the chair $500 instead of $700.  I am in it as I write this!!!  Very nice and relaxing.  Sometimes the "percussion" setting is a little too hard in some spots but otherwise it's great.  I would agree that I wish it went a little further up the neck.  I just sit a little lower in the chair for it.  Not sure if it's worth $700 just because that's alot of money but I've got no problem with $500.  I think my wife and I will get alot of use out of it</review_text>
This handy little device has be a lifesaver in helping to remind me to take my pills.  It is easy to set up. Just put in the # of hours between your doses, 12 or 24 hours for twice a day or once a day medications. I use two of these. The timer counts down the hours and then chirps. When you silence the alarm, it automatically starts the countdown again.The storage compartment is handy for keeping my pills when I travel. Most of the time, I just use it to remind me to take my pills.I wish I knew about this a long time ago</review_text>
I'm a vain, 39 year old male and started using this product (in combination with another highly regarded anti-wrinkle product) about three months ago. This daily application replaced a daily application of facial conditioner/moisturizer. I was hoping some barely noticable forehead wrinkles would go away. No such luck. I notice a definite reduction in wrinkle depth in the morning, before I shower, but by mid-day, the wrinkles have returned to their normal state.  Does this really work?! I suppose the only way to truly find out if this stuff works is to use it on only half the face and see the effect over time. In all fairness, I must mention that my face now routinely feels softer and smoother and less oily than before. That's why I rated this product a four instead of a three. But the frickin' wrinkles are still there!  Let me see all that clinical research all these skin care experts are touting.</review_text>
This product does wonders. It helped with blotchy skin and made my whole face feel softer yet firmer within a week. Like another customer, I have sensitive skin. I didn't feel this dried my skin out at all. But a word to the wise, make sure to read the directions carefully, this product is not meant for use around the eyes which might explain some complaints. If used properly, its fantastic</review_text>
First of all I am in my early 20's so I haven't much experience in night creams.  I just more recently took an interest in moisturizers and eye creams after I decided to quit tanning and rather preserve my youthfulness.  I use "moisture therapy cream" by Olay in the morning before I put on my makeup, and then I use this at night.  My skin always feels so soft, more soft than I think it ever did.  I can't give any testaments on its firming or anti-wrinkle ability, but I can say it does make my skin glow and my complexion look healthier.  The scent is great and it is a great smell to fall asleep to.I would recommend this product to anyone of any age.  It has a good price compared to everything else on the market and I believe it is best to start moisturizing when you are young rather than waiting until the signs of aging have already begun.  Prevention is key</review_text>
Well, let's FACE it..short of any procedure that is invasive(botox,cosmetic surgery, etc), there really isnt any magic cream that is going to reverse the aging process, but there are a number of products that will aid in improving the look, feel and texture of your face. I've been trying out several of the products out there, and I found "Olay Total Effects Night Firming Cream For Face and Neck" to be one of the best ones around.I really like this one alot because of the many benefits it has all in one jar. After using it pretty generously for a little over a month(I've used about 1/2 the jar so far), I found it worked wonders on improving the look and feel of my skin. It minimized the appearance of fine lines, really hydrated my dry skin, improving on firmness, absorbed deep into my skin, so using it every night, I could still feel the softness the next morning, and left my face feeling very smooth to the touch. I especially felt and saw visable result around my neck and throat area(where I am really starting to get that over 50 look).It has a nice, very light scent, and here's the best part... The price here at Amazon is about 1/2 of what I paid when I purchased it along with my groceries at the market(and it was even on sale at the store), so at around twelve dollars here right now, it's a real bargain.There are 7 benefits listed on the box, some I mentioned above, others include evening skin tone, minimizes the appearance of pores and reduces the appearance of blotches and age spots. Give this one a try for any of these aging signs.Don't expect a miracle. The wrinkles will not vanish, but a nice improvement in the look and feel of your skin, a healthy glow that leaves you feeling just a little better about yourself(and a a great price).The formula includes a fast absorbing skin strengthener called VitaNiacin(Vit B3, Vit E and Pro-Vit B5),wheat protein and hydrators.I like it and recommend it.....Laurie</review_text>
I love the Medi-beads products, and highly recommend them.  Although not as comfortable as the pliable elasto-gel, I love the moist heat and the weight of the pads.  I used them therapeutically both for myself and for massage therapy clients.  I only wish they made a longer one to cover the entire back, but 2 of the king-sized pads will do it.  Microwave time will vary according to the power of your microwave.</review_text>
I've been wearing glasses for almost 25 years now.  Its been difficult to find a decent way to clean glasses that doesn't either streak or damage the lenses -- especially with AR and other coatings they put on glasses these days.  The Sharper Image eyeglass cleaner does the trick.  It also, by design, cleans your frames which is a plus.I would have given 4.5 stars due to the size of polishing cloth they supply.  Its sufficient for only cleaning one pair of glasses.  I have two pair (regular and sunglasses) so no real fault there.  I recommend getting a 3M microfiber cleaning cloth as an alternative to what is supplied</review_text>
I love the smell of an essential oil in the air. I've tried tealight burners, a smear on a low-burning lamp, and a miniature crockpot designed for aromatherapy. The PearlEssence Spa Mist is absolutely the best ever for diffusing an odor and continuing to diffuse it for an extended period of time. Because I live in a humid climate, I was concerned that misting would only add to mold problems and perhaps mar wooden furniture. The cool mist instantly absorbs even into our air. The light show of the base can be turned off, but I like it most of the time. Product was offered for $10 less than at a well-known local natural market chain, and shipping was free with my order over $25 with other products.</review_text>
The sound of it working is great ambient noise for sleeping and wth oils it makes you room smell wonderful! It does a reasonable job of humidification in my medium sized bedroom but it acts a little snarky in that it tries to turn itself on often when there is no water left in it. And it doesnt hold enough water to enjoy it all night but it will run for several hours. The light show and the aromatherapy can be quite a nice mood setter romantically as well</review_text>
finally tried this, and I definitely recommend it.  It doesnt have a strong smell, very pleasant and neutral.  It feels so good on your skin after you shave, very soothing and moisturizing. Try some, you'll love it</review_text>
I've had my first bottle of this after shave for a year and I have just finally begun to run out. While I don't use it everday, I use it regularly and when needed.I use an electric shaver which often leaves my face dry and slightly irritated. This Nivea after shave is wonderful. It only takes a small amount to cover my whole face and neck. It leaves me refreshed and smooth feeling. Sometimes I'll leave the house and forget to put it on, and I'll go all the way back just to put it on. It gets your day off to a great start. No funky smells or textures here. Give it a try, you won't be disappointed</review_text>
My wife found the women's version of this cologne in bermuda and it smells great, so I happen to see the man's version of her cologne and tried it and thought it was great as well. Fruity yet woodsey smell hard to describe, Girls will eat it up!</review_text>
I started taking Anxietol 7 to help me with my stress at work. I am not usually a stressed out sort of person however I recently got transfered to NYC and I'm from Utah, just that move itself is enough to stress anyone out. I am working as a trader and it is very high energy. Anxietol 7 is helping me cope with my new life here</review_text>
This has helped me more than I can say. It has helped with a death of a very close relative. Without this I wouldn't be able to lead a normal day at my high level stress job.</review_text>
Unfortunately, millions of Americans currently suffer from the debilitating effects of stress, anxiety, and depression. In the pharmaceutical industry, anti-anxiety medications and antidepressants are among the best-selling medications on the market.The everyday stressors faced by Americans have simply become too much for many to bear, and reasonably so. In recent years, taking an anti-anxiety medication or antidepressant has become as common as taking a multivitamin. However, the side effects and long-term effects of such medications were for the most part unknown until recently.In the past year, some of the drastic negative effects of such medications have come to light, much to the horror of patients and physicians alike. Anti-anxiety medications and antidepressants have been linked to addiction, severe withdrawal, weight gain, vertigo, and even suicide and death. To treat the symptoms of stress, anxiety, and depression, without negative health implications, many are now turning to natural supplements -- safely and with much success.Most consumers are confused about which natural stress, anxiety, and depression supplements to take. Fortunately, there are now a few promising natural supplements on the market which offer truly effective results, safely. The challenge lies in distinguishing the effective products from the one's that are based more on marketing hype. It is critical that the product you choose contains those ingredients proven effective for treatment through clinical study, and that those ingredients are of the highest grade and included in the proper dosage in the product. This is the key to getting the results you desire - freedom from stress, anxiety, and depression.After researching nearly every available natural anxiety product on the market today I can tell you that many products contain low-grade ingredients in amounts far too small to be truly effective. There are a few, however, with clinical research behind them that also contain quality ingredients in efficacious doses.These products offer the definite potential to counter your emotional and physical responses to stress, anxiety, and depression. After review of the products and the available scientific literature only those products that met the criteria were recommended, Here is a list of the Top The Top 10 Stress, Anxiety and Depression Supplements On The Market Today:1) Anxietol 7(tm)2) Welatonin(tm)3) Pinadol(tm)4) Seredyn(tm)5) Prosera(tm)6) Amoryn(tm)7) Euphorx(tm)8) HerbVal Supra(tm)9) Clarocet-NRI(tm)10) Relora(tm)</review_text>
You won't have to use much lotion on your body after using this product.  I love it....</review_text>
If you don't like getting attention, these are not for you.  I'm often surprised by people's astonished reactions to the act of putting them on and taking them off; I'm so accustomed to pulling them apart, that I forget how unusual the viewing public finds it.I have been wearing Clics for nearly a year.  I pretend that I don't need glasses, but of course I do and have for nearly a decade.  Popped the standard diopter lenses out, and put in my bifocal prescription.  It worked great, despite a warning from my optical shop.  (And even if they had broken from the experiment, the price is right:  I could try it again.)Previously I was wearing glasses on a chain.  Besides the various difficulties noted by another reviewer, I also found that the plastic loops that connect the chain to the arms of the glasses have a bad habit of stretching. Then the glasses slip off the chain at inappropriate times and the frames break.I call the color of mine "magenta" - which may or may not be the same as the online "red" - I bought them in a shop (**gasp**).  My short hair is not a problem, but I agree that reading in bed doesn't work.  So I use a different pair for those occasions</review_text>
The LifeSource BP Monitor was just what I wanted and was priced just right.  It was delivered in a timely manner and I am a happy camper along with my wife. Thanks.</review_text>
After a few months of debating whether or not I needed the extra light for my work space I made the great choice of purchasing the HappyLite.  I've been using it the past few weeks and have really enjoyed how it brightens up the dark corner better than a regular lamp.Now my only concern is how to order an extra bulb.... (guess I should read the materials it came with).</review_text>
No problems. Like the small format bottle, easy to store. Works as well as anything else</review_text>
Great smell. Worth the cost. Cleans great. I have used this laundry soap for quite some time now and happy.</review_text>
I bought this for my father-in-law who had a stroke this past summer at sixty eight years old.  My mother-in-law at sixty seven, doesn't have a lot of arm and shoulder strength and cannot wield a full-size wheelchair around and constantly pull it in and out of the trunk of their toyota camry.The light weight of this chair works great for short trips to appointments.  I wouldn't recommend it for a long day shopping at the mall however.  It's not as easy to use as a full-size standard wheelchair.  This is a great chair for shorter trips and appointments to make transferring easier to manage</review_text>
Lightweight, easy to transport, easy to put together.  Just remember, the person in the chair cannot maneuver on their own.  Someone must be able to push.  But what a great product</review_text>
My mother is 87 and the shower chair makes it easier.  She likes it in the tub better and I just use warm water poured over her</review_text>
I've used several types of cervical cold packs over the past few years, both at home and also professional cold packs at chiropractic appointments to help decrease muscle inflammation, and this is by far the best because of its super flexible fabric immediately from the freezer and its ability to stay cold for a longer time if needed</review_text>
very handy and portable. Fits my neck good and I can even walk around with it on and not worry about it falling off or moving</review_text>
I got into Aquis microfiber towels because my aged mother does not have the arm strength for big fat terry towels.  I then bought some for myself because besides being light they absorb like crazy -- one swipe and you're dry.  I decided to get one of the 'adventure' line because information was that they are like the dog-drying towels which are very like the lisse crepe ones.  What I didn't realize was not only I buying a very nice towel, it comes in a very nice little nylon zippered bag, mesh on one side to facilitate drying.  We're talking the sort of little bag you'd spend about $5 to buy from a travel gear catalog.  I was thrilled to pieces.  Also in keeping with the 'adventure'-travel theme, these towels have little tags on one corner that can be snapped back on themselves to form a loop to hang the towel from.  Very handy for camping, meaningless but not annoying for home use.  I like how the loop normally is just a long tag so that the loop does not tangle in the washer</review_text>
This product was reffered to me by my hairstylist after she noticed alot of frizziness and breakage in my hair. This has worked beautifully to protect my hair from the blowdryer and straightening iron! I would give this product 10 stars if it were available! My hair is very smooth and very healthy looking because of this product and other products by Chi.  I absolutely recommend this to anyone</review_text>
I am 100% satisfied with this product and it has already earned me what I paid for. I am able to trim my front portion of hair with this on my own, where as for a complete trim, I do need my wife's assistance. If you trim on a regular basis, ie., when the hair's not over grown, you will definitely find the job more easier.I recommend it to everyone who wants to save on their haircuts. The price is a good deal too if you buy from amazon, else one may perhaps ahve to wait for the Thanks giving sale</review_text>
We purchased eight of these (6 - 3/4 in. and 2 - 1 in.) for our beauty salon in 1994, and we've never used another brand since. With their quick heat-up time and multi-level heat options, these irons perform superbly for precision curls.  I was so pleased their performance that I bought one to use at home to replace my fancy Vidal Sassoon gold barrel, which only had two heat settings - Too Hot and Burnt Scalp.  The heating element is so efficient that Level 1 or 2 is probably sufficient for most home users.  Rarely did I have to set the iron at Level 4 or 5, and never above 5.  It takes less than a minute for the iron to heat up.  Four of the six irons we originally purchased lasted through 3+ years of constant professional use.  At the price we paid, our weekly cost averaged out to pennies.  If you purchase this product you will -NOT- be disappointed</review_text>
This creatine works very good on me building muscle,it has no flavor,i recommend it with a good diet!!see results in weeks!</review_text>
I've used creatine as a strength aid to supplement my lifting for years. This is the real stuff at the best price I've ever seen.</review_text>
Excellent product, good quality at a good price. I bought this Whal's trimmer to replace a Whal's trimmer that I have used for over 15 years. That alone speaks for itself</review_text>
These are hands down, the most awesome pillows, we have ever owned.  They were originally suggested by a chiropractor at $60 per pillow, however at the time, a "water bed pillow" for $60 just sounded silly.  What brought me back around to these pillows, was the year-long search that my wife and I had been on for the perfect pillows.  One of her beloved cats managed to destroy our previous and quite comfortable pillows, which subsequently caused us to get caught up in the frustrating search for the perfect pillow.  We spent a year, buying this pillow and that pillow, all to no avail.  Then one day I rolled the dice, and bought a pair of these pillows with the covers.  The covers actually make the dish.  These are the most comfortable pillows that I have ever slept on in my 42 years on this planet!!!  These pillows rate 10 stars!!!  Just follow the directions and enjoy the best nights sleep you have ever had.  I do not work for, nor own this company, although after using their product I wish I did!!!  Our pillows are about three months old so far, and holding up exceptionally well.  They recommend you change the water every six months or so, depending on what type of water you put in.  The pillow is about half to three quarters cushion, with the water being the bottom layer.  They seal tight and do not leak. There is no audible sound from the water in the pillow, as if you follow the directions, they will instruct you on how to expel excess air.  These pillows and of those Black & Decker scissors, have to be my two best finds for 2006!!</review_text>
This is a great value - probably one of the best shower heads I've used. Yes - there are better ones for $100+, but this is absolutely amazing</review_text>
This is a truly amazing deal from Amazon, where I also received Free Priority Mail Shipping.  The photo does not display all that you will get. You will receive 6 boxes of Q-Tips Cotton Swabs, totaling an ammazing 3,500 Q-Tips in all.  I WILL NEVER EVER HAVE TO PURCHASE ANOTHER Q-TIP AS LONG AS I LIVE!!!!!  WHAT A FANTASTIC DEAL FROM AMAZON!</review_text>
This curling iron works well.  It heats quickly and I'm very satisfied</review_text>
I just bought this iron and I couldn't be happier. It's the perfect size and weight. The plates aren't unmanageably large, or pitifully small... It heats up incredibly fast-- we're talking in less than 60 seconds. I have short-ish, wavy and coarse hair- it's straight and silky smooth within 5 minutes. HAI is a brand used in many salons and it's all for a reason- they make fantastic flat irons. If you bought this same iron at a salon, you could easily pay upwards of $150 in Canada... so I consider this price an awesome deal</review_text>
I bought this dryer based on other people's review.  It is an excellent dryer.  The air flow is strong and it dries my medium to long hair faster than my old one ever did.  I didn't give it 5 stars because it is a bit heavier than most dryers...however, since it dries my hair fast, my arms don't mind the weight. :)  2 thumbs up in my book!!</review_text>
In the past, I bought hair dryers at Target because of the prices. I had no idea that a few more bucks can buy you a quality hair dryer that surpasses any Conair, Sassoon, etc. purchased at this and similar stores.The difference in the quality is noticed immediately upon use. Although the BB Pro is a little heavier than I'm used to, it dries hair faster and with fewer frizzes. It's amazing</review_text>
I purchased this dryer for my wife. It took me a long time to find it since all hair dryers come with 1600 to 1850 watts power setting. My wife's hair is thick and long, so she didn't want get anything below 2000 watts. This one is light, powerfull and handy.I strongly recommend it</review_text>
I did a great deal of research on the Internet for the "best" shower filter. I was concerned about the filter not lasting, losing water pressure, etc. I came across the Aquasana on amazon and read all the great reviews on it... After ordering it, I am so glad that I did. It was really easy to install and I honestly feel like the water pressure coming out of it is BETTER than with my old shower head. The shower head swivels and has several different settings, like massage, rainfall-type flow, etc. It really does feel like you are showering in spring water. Just the idea of showering in chlorine-free and mineral-free water is refreshing in itself. I am really happy with my purchase and would definitely recommend it to anyone living in an apartment who wants filtered water and who cannot install a filter on the main line.... It's a little pricy but well worth it.</review_text>
I am so happy with Aquasana Shower Filter. I live in a building where the water is so harsh and sometimes discolored. As a consequence, my skin shortly turned dry and I continuously got skin problems. I even thought about buying drinking water to clean my face everyday. Now that I have found Aquasana, I feel so happy. It does what it promises. I could feel the smoother skin by just using it from the first time. And it did feel like showering in natural spring water. I couldn't be happier with this product</review_text>
Compared to the Olive & Aloe bar, this one seems to lather better</review_text>
This is excellent..I like the ease of using it and the digital read out is great.  I highly recommend this produc</review_text>
They had one of these mirrors in a 5 star hotel that my husband and I stayed at and I fell in love with it! I HAD TO HAVE ONE OF MY OWN and thanks to Amazon I was able to find one. This is an EXCELLENT product. My husband installed it easily and I would never be without one again. One side is magnified and my eyebrows have never looked so good, lol, and eyelining is a breeze. Though he would never admit it, my husband uses also (trimming mustash, nose hairs (eewww), shaving, etc.)Great product. Order one. You will not be dissapointed!</review_text>
Not a bad product.  Irritates the skin a little, but does remove your hair.  The only things I don't like is that the buffers wear out quickly and your hair grows back with in 2 weeks.  It does a nice job of exfoliating the skin and is great for hard to reach places.  Not a bad product; however, I hope someone soon comes up with something that can take hair away permanently or for a longer period of time.  I would recommend this product</review_text>
Shaving gives me all sorts of problems, I must have super sensitive skin or something. I cannot afford laser and wax just isn't my thing.Grabbed this for myself before Christmas on a whim. It was money well spent!After 3 months of use, I have gotten the hang of the product. I suggest you practise then shave regularly for a month or more. Say, run the product over each leg once till you get used to it. Then trying to completely remove the hair. My legs are unbelievably soft. No rash, one little tender area after I spent too much time there. Do keep moving and keep a razor in the cabinet just in case. I still have trouble around my ankles.Hair regrowth is markedly thinner since I began using it. By about half. What remains still grows long but I'm, err, what does one call this process? - doing it once a week and only takes a few minutes</review_text>
Really strong when just sprayed, but after a little while it gets soft, but at the same time not too soft. The perfume lasts for few hours, by the time I go to bed, the scent would still be there faintly, and I fall asleep to it. It is fresh and strong at first, then soft and sweet. LOVE IT</review_text>
I ordered the HappyLite about 4 months before they even shipped the product, because it was the first reasonably priced (and sized) light to help treat SAD.  Living in Minnesota, I tend to get depressed in February, so wanted to see if the light would help. Starting in Oct/Nov 2003, I began turning it on at desk height at my work for the suggested amount of time. I did not use it on weekends.Anyway, I think that it helped me keep from sinking so low with the SAD blues in February, but it did not completely keep SAD away. I spent 4 days on the beach in Florida during the 3rd week of February, and that helped the most.I will indeed use the light again this winter, because it helps--but does not eliminate--SAD for me</review_text>
I first used this product when I got a straight razor shave in a men's salon awhile back.  It really made for a smooth shave, which you definitely need when getting a straight razor shave.  By the way, I don't recommend getting a straight razor shave on your wedding day as I foolishly did.  Your face will be very sore.  It took me 10 years before I got another straight razor shave, and I hated it as much as the first time.  I'll never get another.  However, this oil product made the shave tolerable, and it makes daily shaving fantastic.  This combined with the aftershave moisturizer makes for an incredible shave.  It's amazing how soft your skin feels afterward.  Buy the oil and the moisturizing aftershave, and you won't be disappointed</review_text>
Tis is the best joint supplement I have found on the market. Thank you Amazon for carrying it</review_text>
I love that stuff!  And now you haven't had it - but I need more - please make it available again.  Thanks</review_text>
Received my pack of 4 in 2 days with the free ship option. Shop-Rite sells individual box for 8.99, so even the regular price of $32 beat that. The $10 additional promotion was icing on the cake</review_text>
Purchased a case of Bally Energy Drink since I seemed a bit sluggish after a 12 hour work day and kept making excuses NOT to work out. Gets me up and at em' and no more excuses for not going for a long walk or trip to the gym! Drank 1 can in the morning @ 5:30 am and another around 3pm. Give it a try</review_text>
This has an average scent.  I have bought other brands of reed diffusers that I like alot more.  I would not buy this again</review_text>
Nice mirror.  Good magnification.  Solid construction.  My only change would allow vertical adjustability to allow flexibility in positioning on the wall.  I had to move a picture to position it at the correct height</review_text>
I got this for my husband and he states that the trimmer is great but it needs to have a smaller base. The charger part of the trimmer is just too big. Even though it is big for size it does not hold all the attachments. He would recommend the trimmer to do the job it is intended for</review_text>
I got the WaterPik JP-130 to replace a shower head that was set too low for my husband.  Installation was easy enough, though, we had to purchase plumber's white tape to get a good seal.  Other showerheads I've purchased have come with the tape included which is why I took off one star.  The arm was long enough that my husband can step under it and still have clearance from the wall.  It creates a soft fall of water that I really enjoy and the head is large enough that I am actually able to wash my hair more quickly as it hits more of my hair at one tim.  I've not had any problems with the thumb screws and I have been move the unit quite often so that I can shave my legs.  I've loved this product so far and would definitely purchase again.</review_text>
just bought this showerhead I have a stand -up shower built in with a pull around curtain. all other heads blow the curtain out and water on the floor. this is the one. it works great. i have a shallow well pump with 40 -60lbs of water pressure setting. my wife loves this so much i will get one for her up stairs full shower bathtub</review_text>
I got this showerhead for Christmas and am really happy with it!!  It's really a pleasant experience to have the water raining down on you.I do agree with the other reveiwer that the adjustable knobs are tough to get to stay in place.  But with mine anyways it stays in place while I'm using it and it's only later that it slowly lowers down.  Then I just move it back into place and tighten the knobs again when I want to use it.  It hasn't been any trouble so far.I love this showerhead so much that I'm actually already looking for an even larger one!!  I highly recommend these "rainfall" showerheads!</review_text>
Pik Stik reacher/grabber did exactly what it said.  I used the 32 in size to pick up items from the floor and in the yard.  I'm 5'4" and did not have to bend over to pick up things.  It picks up coins, small pieces of paper, as well as jars, and leaves/gumballs from outdoors. I am completely satisfied</review_text>
I had a horrible cold, felt like complete #### but I HAD to work. This little two ounce vitamin B shot knocked the crappy feeling outta me and I was able to get some work done. There really is no crash and the taste isn't that bad. ..it tastes like a melted freeze pop.NOTE: It may give you the jitters if you drink it on an empty stomach</review_text>
Im a truck driver that dosent drink coffee. Can you believe it!?My hours are really weird as my day may start at 8AM or at 8PM & I might work for 10 to 14 hours per shift. Ive used half a bottle to a full bottle at a time & have always gotten the boost I need to get where Im going. I also may use it to start my day or to finish it.I started using 5 hour about 6 months ago. I dont use it everyday but when I need it, it works well. The nice thing is, when I finally call it a day I can lay down & get to sleep. Unlike other products Ive used, I dont have that ragged feeling afterward.I purchase in quantities of 100 & carry 25 or so on the road.</review_text>
recieved product on time, and i wil for sure order from this company agai</review_text>
I have owned and broken most grabbers on the market. The fold-up Gopher is a joke, another, with a flimsy wire down the center breaks after too much use, and the heavy-duty unit from Lowes is hard on the wrist. This unit is the smart way to go! It is strong and durable and makes the most sense in the way it utilizes the strength of the hand and fingers and relieves pressure from the wrist. Also, it is exactly the correct length for a six foot man. No bending at the lumbar required</review_text>
My mother in law thought it was reduculous to spend more that twenty bucks on one of these because she got one that has ocean sounds... birds.. ect. But all those other machines have that creepy digital sound for white noise...and the waves inevitably break and the birds stop chirping as soon as the car alarm goes off in the street. This is the only sound we need!We bought it for our 3 month old daughter because we live in a noisy part of the city and our neighbors kept waking her up. She slep great from day one... now we use it as part of her bedtime ritual.. bath, jammies, book, SLEEPY MACHINE... and off to sleep she goes</review_text>
We originally got this to replace the "fan noise" in the winter due to our sons' room being so cold.  The first couple days the sound seemed so loud but you quickly get used to it.  We've discovered it's very helpful for blocking out the noise of other children running through the house while our newborn is sleeping in addition to the city noises at night.  With the adjustability dials it's ideal for a nursery or bedroom for those who cannot sleep without a fan.  It doesn't however, cover the sound of someone coughing or snoring loudly.  Would highly recommend this to anyone looking for a sound machine for environmental noise, especially for children</review_text>
This is the best sound machine out there.....I worked in a doctors office where they used these, and they were amazing.  My husband cannot sleep without some sort of "white noise".  We purchased this and our sleep couldn't be better.  Best bet for the money.  It's also adjustable as far as volume, just twist the top.  Very quick shipping as well.</review_text>
I don't know why most of the reviews are so negative.  Mine works perfectly, it does not flip-flop, does not drop down and you can remove those thingies inside to make the water pressure higher for a more soothing shower experience.Reason I gave it 4 stars is because I have what is called a "diverter valve" attached to my shower head.  The waterpik is meant to be installed DIRECTLY onto the shower head itself.  I could not do that, because I have a portable "wand" that is moveable via hose connected to the valve and noticed that the threading is too short for the waterpik to latch on to.Went to Home Depot and got an extension and a coupling, kind of ingenious and used lots of pipe tape to "interface" the waterpik via the extension, via the coupling ONTO the diverter valve..... Wow!  NO LEAKS!  Works PERFECTLY.For those of you out there that has a diverter valve for more then one showerhead option, go to Home Depot, Lowe's or a hardware store and what I wrote above will work as it did for me.Enjoy</review_text>
que maravilla comprar por amazon.com todo llego en perfecto estad</review_text>
I purchased this size ramp to handle wheelchair access over the two-inch threshold to our house and it has done that, but I wish now that I had selected a size longer than 16 inches in order to have a more gradual incline. I use a power wheelchair with plenty of power but have found that the chair's direction becomes a little unstable when it reaches the top of the ramp due to the slope, necessitating careful maneuvering to continue in a straight line into the house. It was easy to install, however, with the included mounting screws and seems sturdy and durable</review_text>
My hair is very wavy and frizzy, I have to condition my hair every day so it doesn't look dry and damaged. 2 weeks ago I got my hair cut, the stylist used a Sedu straightener on me. Wow! Suddenly, my hair was stick straight and super glossy (really brought out the natural highlights). I bought one from him for $199 (should have checked the Internet first).I've tried a cheap flat iron before; after wrestling with it for 40 minutes and pulling the heck out of my hair, all I got was slightly "pressed" hair.The Sedu iron has super smooth ionic plates, so it glides through your hair very easily, quickly and smoothly. No more pulling of my hair. I can give myself smooth, gorgeous, in about 5 minutes. Another plus is that the style will stay until the next time you wash your hair; Now i only have to straighten my hair every other day.Sure, Sedu is on the expensive side, but this salon-quality tool is more than worth it. Look good and feel good every day!</review_text>
I read many reviews on this product and other products similiar to it before deciding on the Sedu.  It took me a week to get the product and I anxiously tried it as soon as it arrived.  I must say that the products is a dream come true.  I am an African American woman and I have never been able to get my hair as straight as I am able to do now, not even when going to the salon.  When I went back to work from the weekend, my coworkers all commented on how much longer my hair looked (because it was truly straight).  I would recommend this to any woman.  I have not been back to the salon in the last 2 months</review_text>
I like this kit very much and my colleague are going to purchase it when they saw mine</review_text>
Calvin Klein's Obsession was one of the earliest releases in the designer fragrance craze, and it has since become a classic.  Obsession is a warm, earthy, sensual scent.  There is no floral or sweetness to it; rather, it has a musky, almost masculine quality with a bit of a vanilla note.  The scent is gently seductive--alluring enough for romance, but also subtle enough for everyday wear.  In has excellent staying power, as it lingers on the skin all day long.Although Obession has all of the qualities I usually like in a fragrance--I definitely prefer musky, spicy scents to more floral ones--for some reason, Obsession is not one of my favorites; although I do enjoy wearing it on occasion, I actually prefer stealing some of my husband's Obession for Men to wear for myself!  Overall, however, Obsession for women is a classic fragrance that I would definitely recommend</review_text>
For years I have had many a vacation ruined because I break out in hives with very little exposure to the sun.   After my dermatologist recommended this product I tried it. Two vacations later . . . Not a single hive or sunburn.  Well worth the price.   Actually goes pretty far also</review_text>
I've been using this for the last 3 months and I'm a very satisfied customer. I get a very close shave, and no razor bumpors. I'm Afircan American and my beard is coarse and curly, sometimes with many razor this can lead to ingrown   hair problems. I highly recommend this, because it's a much close shave than the typical elctric razors by brands such as Braun and Norelic. It's very cheap and the only maintainence is clipper oil. I cam across these because the only time I would get a great shave was at the barber. When he used clippers on me I've never had any problems with ingrown hair, therefore I decided to own my own pair of clippers. I'm very pleased with with product and highly recommended as a very effective and affordable method for shaving and trimming</review_text>
Didn't work if you dont take the full recommended amount. It may have helped me feel fuller, but it didnt help me lose any weight. I pulled out the old excersize bike and am plugging away at a low 20 min a day now. I still use it for the caffeien and possible apetite control benefit</review_text>
I was having a problem with over-eating and eating when I wasn't hungry and as a result, gained quite a bit of weight, and felt awful.I've only been using this product for three days, but already my portion size has shrunk immensely and my energy is way up.  I haven't felt jittery or shaky.  I feel better than I have in months.I would recommend this to those who also have problems with cravings or portion size and want to drop some un-needed weight</review_text>
I was skeptical about this product but tried it anyway.  It does work and it does eliminate the dip in the middle our mattress had formed.  This has given our mattress a little more life so it will last a little longer until it's time to give in and buy a new one</review_text>
This product was nothing short of miraculous for me.I'm in my early forties now with skin that has been trouble-prone since I hit my teens...and while I have used various and sundry products to control breakouts from acne and rosacea (which started about age 40), including retin A cream,  topical and systemic antibiotics, and every sort of over the counter cleanser, these treatments helps but if anything my breakouts were coming closer together and getting more severe as I aged.I've been using the mask for about 8 mos and my skin is the nicest and most healthy it's been in many years....I had rapid improvement of both my regular acne and the rosacea on top of it.Caution - I've never had any benzoyle peroxide sensitivity. People who are irritated by benzoyle peroxide probably won't have the same kind of experience I do.BP creams have always helped, but were not as effective as this mask, which really gets down in the pores.I use it heavily.  I apply it either before I brush my teeth or before I get in the shower.  It is cool and refreshing.  I usually let it sit as a mask for a few minutes before I rinse off, although sometimes I use it just as a cleanser when my skin needs freshening...like after I've walked through a cloud of someones cigarette smoke.It leaves my skin very, very  clean,  and *soft.*  I have never had any dryness or irritation from this product at all...indeed, my skin has become less sensitive and reactive and is calm and feels good when it used to be angry and irritated all the time.  The dryness others warn of has never been an issue for me.  it makes my skin feel like normal healthy skin.Working outside in the heat or cleaning in a dusty, dirty environment used to cause my skin to break out.  Now before cleaning or working I will actually put a bit of this mask on- wne I am done,  my skin is none the worse the wear for the activity... I stay clear and smooth.  I guess it blocks the irritants or stops the sebaceous glands from making my pores either block or become a haven for bacteria.I do not have serious acne all over my body...just a very trouble prone face for most of my adult life.   The benzoyle peroxide mask has ended this trouble for me.  I simply smooth a couple times a day for about the time it takes to brush teeth, and wash it off.  No prescriptions, no panicked spot treatment of painful blemishes or pustules...just perfect skin for me.  Amazing!!!</review_text>
I was hesitant to spend this much money on a shaver but I am so glad I did. This one gives me a really good shave. I have had it for one month and have not used a hand razor since. Another review says the cleaning process is a bit loud, which it is but since you turn it on and leave it, I just close the bathroom door so the noise is not a problem.</review_text>
I bought this Obus Forme king sized pillow because I thought it might stop my snoring.  I must admit to being surprised that the pillow actually did minimize my night time rattling if not eliminate it completely.There have been reviews that mentioned the pillow had a strange odor at first.  I found that it did give off a smell similar to that of a new carpet or some plastics, but that disappeared in just a few days and was never offensive.My wife wanted to try my pillow and liked it so much she kept it.  I have just ordered a second pillow.</review_text>
These are great glasses, easy to put on and take off, and are there around your neck waiting for you to use them. I saw them on the CSI NY coroner on TV and had to find some.  Amazon was the place to go</review_text>
The product smells really good, is very affordable and helps maintain my hair style all day. I highly recommend trying it. I will make it part of my daily hairdress (grooming) for life!</review_text>
I bought this straightner at Walmart for about the same price found on amazon and I really like it.  I bought it mostly to curl my hair like my stylist does.  I wanted a chi, but I couldn't pass this one up for the price.  I 've only used it a couple of times but it straightens well and can be used to curl my hair as well.  A good product for the price!!</review_text>
I bought this for my husband.  He had a plantars wart on the bottom of his foot that was removed but became a callus that gave him pain.  Emu oil is the first thing that softened it and it is better than it has ever been and he had suffered with it for years</review_text>
NV diet pills are working great for me- I lost 8lbs in a month!!! they work as long as you eat healthy and exercise regularly while taking the pills. It isn't a miracle pill so if you take it but eat nonstop all day and don't work out, of course nothing is going to happen. They really do control hunger because I take 2 a day and one day I was busy and forgot to take my 2nd pill and I was STARVING looking to eat anything and everything in sight</review_text>
Great piece of equipment, no guessing how accurate the scale might be with this great Healthometer</review_text>
Having struggled with digital scales that broke after a few years, I finally decided to get the scale my doctor has.  It's terrific because I can see it clearly (the numbers are right in my face) and it is built to last forever! My daughter and I assembled it with a minimum of effort. The directions are written clearly and all adjustments are super easy to handle. It is clearly the best scale I've ever owned.  The down side is that it needs a bit more space than a regular floor scale.  You can, however, buy a piece of plywood and put the scale on top of the wood in a carpeted room if your bathroom can't handle the bigger size</review_text>
We use these in all of our humidifiers and they do a great job</review_text>
This is very soothing for people with arthritis or any kind of injury and makes your hand feel wonderful</review_text>
I love them! I have a fairly expensive 6 piece lithograph and each piece is about 15 lbs. We were not only able to hang them with minimal damage to the drywall but have them almost perfectly abutting each other</review_text>
They taste good and stop those hunger pangs for quite some time</review_text>
I read in one of the magazines, that many stars in Hollywood eat chocolateto lose weight. I thought, that was some kind of cruel joke, until I readthat the chocolate they eat is with hoodia, but I could not find the namefor those chocolates.I searched the internet, and was I happy to find Chocoleans!I was going out on a date to my favorite sushi place, and had one  chocoleanbefore I left the house.It worked! I could barely finish two sushi's  and I felt soo full.Now I  eat one or two chocoleans a day with water or coffee, and eat soomuch less!I already lost two dress sizes, amazing.And, they are sooo delicious</review_text>
I haven't actually used the bottles sent to me as of yet but used this product all last summer.  I love the fact that the Blue Lizard Suncream stays on so well.  My kids can swim and stay at the beach for hours and Blue Lizard does the trick!!!  I don't think they got burnt one time last year while I was using this.  Great Product!!</review_text>
this is the best bargain for your money.pampers swaddlers are better than pampers. even better than costco brand. worth every penny</review_text>
These are the best diapers I have used. They are soft, flexible, and easily adjustable for a good secure fit. They hold leaks extremely well. Of course leaks do occur (why wouldn't they if your baby has, say for example, 4 explosive poops in the course of 5 minutes....it's happened), however this is to be expected. They do not occur regularly and the diapers are not saggy, but fit very snuggly which provides for good protection. I HIGHLY recommend these</review_text>
The magnet is solid, the frame wiggle perfectly to make it clic and fit just like the picture shows.  Lenses are clear and functional.  However, they need to give a bit more space to accomodate larger heads, since it can get snug and this is NOT your usual glasses.  Notice that the frame encircles the head, making head size an issue.On the plus side- the glasses won't fall off when you bend forward, they stay around your neck after you unclick 'em, and they are functional</review_text>
I had my original clic readers for about six years before I had to replace them. I love the quality of the lenses, the ease of use and the fact that I do not have to remember where I put them when I took them off. I never take them off and have even  ordered several pair for other people at work. I am a carpenter and other than having to clean sawdust that accumulates on them once in a while, find them to be one  of the most useful tools I own.</review_text>
If you don't like getting attention, these are not for you.  I'm often surprised by people's astonished reactions to the act of putting them on and taking them off; I'm so accustomed to pulling them apart, that I forget how unusual the viewing public finds it.I have been wearing Clics for nearly a year.  I pretend that I don't need glasses, but of course I do and have for nearly a decade.  Popped the standard diopter lenses out, and put in my bifocal prescription.  It worked great, despite a warning from my optical shop.  (And even if they had broken from the experiment, the price is right:  I could try it again.)Previously I was wearing glasses on a chain.  Besides the various difficulties noted by another reviewer, I also found that the plastic loops that connect the chain to the arms of the glasses have a bad habit of stretching. Then the glasses slip off the chain at inappropriate times and the frames break.I call the color of mine "magenta" - which may or may not be the same as the online "red" - I bought them in a shop (**gasp**).  My short hair is not a problem, but I agree that reading in bed doesn't work.  So I use a different pair for those occasions</review_text>
These glasses are a great idea.  However, they do not work with long hair.  The back "strap" of the glasses has to ride high up on the back of the head for the lenses to rest low on the nose (so you can see over them for distance).  Long hair lays on the back of the glasses and pushes them down in the back, making the front of the glasses pop up and placing the lenses right in front of the eyes. I guess most people who need reading glasses don't have long hair</review_text>
I loved this product, really leaves my hair really straight without even blow drying!! I have curly hair and it worked pretty well, my hair was smooth and shiny, I'm very happy with my straightener</review_text>
I like this product a lot. My hair type is curly and frizzy specially after the hair gets dried up naturally after the head bath. I used this product and my hair looks good now. It looks smooth and straight now and I can feel the softness when I touch my hair. I definitely will recommend this product to my friends.....</review_text>
omgosh i cannot tell you how much i love this straightener. it makes my hair SO SOFT its like baby bottom soft or when u sand wood for a really really long time. i LOVE it. i use it everymorning.. at night i use the wet setting to dry off my hair and then in the mroning i finish it off with the dry settting. but i also use sunsilk pink bottle 24/7 creme. its an absolute must-have.to the person who gave it one star.. maybe yours was a defect. im sure everyone else who has rated it so far loved it. did you straighten it section by section? it doesnt work if you do it all at once.i recommend this straightener! its not that expensive and also makes a great christmas gift. looks nice too.enjoy</review_text>
i normally have severe pain in my neck especially when i first get up in the morning causing extremely painful headaches and migraines. this pillow has kept my neck in a suitable position, eliminating about 70-90% of my problems</review_text>
I was suffering from intense neck and shoulder pain before I started using this pillow.  When I started sleeping on it a couple of months ago, the pain was gone after the first night, and it hasn't come back since then.  It supports my neck perfectly.  I highly recommend</review_text>
I've been relying on this lotions for over a decade.  Of the many I've tried, it's the only one that provides both immediate dryness relief and long-lasting moisturizing.  Some may find the initial glycerin slickness to be excessive, especially on hands, but if you have skin as dry as mine you'll tolerate a minute or two of "greasiness" for the softness and comfort that lasts for hours.  These comments are for Neutrogena Emulsion only -- Neutrogena Body Lotion did not work well for me</review_text>
Over the past two years I have been using several different green food products to try to find one that has a reasonable taste and seems to satisfy my physical needs. At age 70 those needs are many. After approximately two rounds of trying, it is Miracle Greens that has been most consistant in good taste and at the same time satisfying many of the needs I have for feeling better in general</review_text>
Bumble & Bumble products are a special "me" treat for pampering. The shampoo is mild and keeps my long, permed hair in great shape</review_text>
I have several of these glasses now.  Love them. They are strong and adjustable and so much better then wearing the granny cord around your neck.  I wish there was a berrer looking sunglass besides that goggle looking one.  Good price and good product.</review_text>
I saw these reading glasses on CSI:NY and just had to have them! It's really nice to have a quality pair of reading glasses...and the WOW factor doesn't hurt either! I've read some of the reviews and can see where women with hair past their shoulders might have a problem with this type of glasses. My hair is shortish (layered to the bottom of my neck) and I wouldn't want it any longer if I was going to wear these glasses a lot...which I do! They aren't portable...but they aren't supposed to be. I keep mine in my office where I need to take them on and off the most frequently. I'll probably get another pair for home but I'll used my old ones I can put in my case for carrying in my purse. All in all...I'm very glad I got them</review_text>
This is the longest period of time that my husband has kept a pair of reading glasses. The Click readers loop around his neck and are always there when he needs them. He gets lots of comments about how neat they are</review_text>
This isn't a product thats going to get you laid after she sniffs it a couple of times. It's starts the chat and dialog.   What it does do is start the conversation and keep you the their target. M-11 kicks up the yackity yak in her with you being the focus. I;ve tried a few of them including that 90 dollar rip off thats advertised in Popular Science, and this is  product works just fine. Give it a go guys. It gets you past that awkward dork moment when you are trying to talk about somthing other that what Starbucks you hang at. Its not a sex pill so forget it. But, it will open up the road you need to walk down to get to the garden of eden or whatever. So don't be a little whimp. Be a man and give it a go. Its a way to the women you want via the mental route. Yes, you have to think. It will work for you so do it</review_text>
I wanted a cordless shaver because at my age (49) I need my glasses on to see the hairs I'm shaving, and that doesn't work well in the shower!  This Braun is a good buy, easy to use, and works well if you follow the directions and shave slowly.  It's not as close or smooth as a blade and shaving gel, but it's quicker and less mess, so I think it's a good trade-off.</review_text>
The Ultrasonic Aromatheropy Fountain is really unique.  The sound generated, yet unheard, causes water to spring up from the surface 3-4 inches to provide a fountain-like water sound. At the same time, the frequency of the sound waves create a plesant cool misty fog that slowly boils over the sides and out along the surface it is sitting on. All the while, led lights under the water slowly change seemingly to all colors.  The construction was just a little light duty other than that, Very Nice</review_text>
I've had this trimmer for 10 years and never had a problem.  Sometimes the switch needs to be moved twice but it always works.  Never falls apart and cut hair great.  I'd buy another if this one would ever wear out!</review_text>
Most reviewers on this site are unenthusiastic about this particular product.  I think the main reason for that level of dissatisfaction is, as someone else suggested, that people need to pay attention to how, exactly, this trimmer works.  Because of its design, best results are obtained when it is inserted, withdrawn, then inserted again, and the procedure repeated.  Second tip: rinse the rotating blade, switched ON, under the HOT tap to remove accumulated hair, etc, after each use.  It works better when clean.The main PLUS of this product is its size.  Yes, it is flimsy, made in China, and would probably sell for $2.50 if it didn't say Panasonic on it - or come with a 12-month Panasonic warranty.  But it works very well if you use it right and keep it clean. I have had mine a couple of years and the only problem is that the blade is now dull and replacement blades are apparently not available</review_text>
I really like this curling iron...- and you definitely can't beat the price!  It heats up very quickly, and gives me great curls.  The key to working with large barrel curls are to use a mouse or cream to texturize your hair.  Then, after you curl, make sure to take a blowdryer on cold/low setting to lock the curls down.  I always receive so many compliments on my hair!!</review_text>
I am a big fan of 2" curling irons, but they can be difficult to find.  My last one (different brand) wore out a couple years ago and I had a hard time finding a replacement until now.I have shoulder length hair, fairly thick, plus wavy and frizzy.  2" curling irons do a great job of smoothing and straightening my hair, while also turning it under (or up, if desired) at the ends for a nice, finished look.  I find it much easier and faster than using a traditional flat/straight iron while achieving superior results.  You will not get "curl" with this curling iron.  You will get smooth hair quickly and easily.  Highly recommended</review_text>
I was searching for a two inch curling iron for a while. I have had so -so dealings with Gold N Hot in the past so I was a little nervous but I purchased this one anyway. So far, so good. It's surprisingly light (at least compared to my one inch ceramic tools curling iron). I usually let my hair air dry and use my curling irons to straighten my hair as I curl the ends (I'm black with a relaxer.) I have yet to do it with this one. Although I might try b/c it gets really hot. (I usually have it on around 20-25 out of 30)The only problem is that the ceramic can chip off (It happened with the first one I bought, but I returned it and got a new one that hasn't chipped so far) and it's so big that if you take your thumb off the spring grip, it can be hard to get it back on (I have huge hands too.</review_text>
After brushing with the HydraBrush, my teeth feel as clean as when I've been to the dental hygenist.This is a great product.  I am so glad that replacement brushes are available at Amazon</review_text>
Una de las mejores compras que he hecho, es facil de manejar y  deja el cabello liso y con brillo...Es fantastica</review_text>
WHat I like best is that it is non addictive. It puts you right to sleep within 20-30 minutes. It really helped me and my boyfriend regulate our sleep patterns</review_text>
Sedamine is great sleep aid. I've been dealing with no sleep problems for about 8 months and I tried nearly everything including old remedies-I thought I would go crazy if I didn't find help. Not sleeping has been awful. Since end of July I started with the Sedamine product and it started working right way. I tell anyone to try it cause it help me it help anyone.</review_text>
I have a pretty complicating sleep schedule because of my graveyard shift at our local convenient store, with school and all it's kind of hard keeping my sleep schedule straight. I've tried many sleep aids and this one worked the best for me, no grogginess which is totally awesome for the days I have class early!</review_text>
the pills really do work.  I stopped taking stacker over a year ago and i stopped my routine workouts and i gained 40 lbs in just one year!  I was so frustrated and dissapointed at myself so i started going to the gym but i was finding it hard to motivate myself to do anything while at the gym.  I just started taking stacker3 for one week and already i have dropped almost 10 lbs (of course with excersise as well)  This pill not only helps with energy but as i have read, it also works as a metabolism enhancing property! Thank you NVE for a great product.  THe only negative thing about it is that i sometimes feel dizzy and a numbness to my fingers.  (that was the reason i stopped taking it in the first place but its really not life threatening or as serious as it may sound)</review_text>
We have a "closet shower", which made it difficult to get out of the way of the water spray (not to mention having water spray out the door).  We picked up this neat little shower head, and we're much happier now.  You can avoid the water more easily (for shaving, washing body, etc.), and since it aims straight down, no more turning the shower head all the way to the side to avoid it going right out the door.  It's inexpensive, and has made our shower experience much better.  I definitely recommend it</review_text>
I have had this model for years!  And I cut my hair with it 3-4 times a month between me & my sons.  It is the best clipper set I have ever owned.  Most clippers I buy only last 1-2 years.  I have had this one I think 5-6 years!  Well worth the money</review_text>
Wow!  I'm really impressed!  I've had trouble cleaning under my bridge.  I can fish floss under there and clean it good, but it takes a lot of time.  Now I just blast it clean in minutes.  It does a good job of cleaning my back teeth.  I've never been totally satisfied with just flossing.  Now they feel perfectly clean.  I love this device!  It doesn't replace flossing.  It does a great job under the gums, but I still feel cleaner after flossing.  It's great as a between brushing "touchup".  I recommend it to anyone.  My mouth hasn't felt this clean in years.  I feel like I've come from the Dentist after a cleaning.  Thats a great feeling to have every day</review_text>
This was my first purchase of Seventh Generation products and it won't be my last one.  I was very impressed with the cleaning and it is just as good as those not so earth friendly competitors.  I feel good using their products and have also ordered their fabric softner, dishwasher liquid, dishwashing liquid, bleach, paper towels, and toilet paper.  I'm not a treehugger but do care about my environment and feel a duty to make earth a better place to be</review_text>
It's pretty good...don't see it making anything "firmer" but it works nicely as a moisturizer.  I checked the internet and apparently the person posting stuff above has been posting the same thing [about it ruining their life] all over the net.Probably an allergic reaction, you always have to test a little piece of skin before slopping something in your eyes ;</review_text>
I have over 60 mens fragrances that range from $50.00 to $320.00 and found that I get more compliments when I wear this fragrance than any other fragrance that I wear as well as having an risque appealing bottle. Great must-have for any man</review_text>
I found this product to be very unique, and helpful, in that I could quickly remove & retain the glasses around my neck.Being far-sighted, I have come to need reading glasses, and these are perfect for my needs.  I can look 'down' through them, and look 'over the frame' for distance, all while they are secured around my head and neck.I do hiking, using a GPS device, and these glasses allow me to look down at the GPS device in my hand, while also looking forward towards my path of travel.Thank you for the innovative product</review_text>
My husband was leaving more than 20 pairs of reading glasses everywhere and any where and could still never find a pair when he needed them....even to ead a menu! These glasses are the answer to anyone who wears reading glasses. I bought them in all colors for him and even bought a pair work a friend who works with him(he loves them as well and bought in more colors also). Neither of them have lost a pair in all of these months. They also have started so many conversations. Everyone who has asked about them has done the same and have bought in all colors. It takes a little adjusting and getting use to but everyone we know has never returned a pair. Only reason they have returned was to order in more colors or to order for friends and loved ones! These glasses are fantastic! Thanks for the great service</review_text>
I love the idea of the glasses always being where I can find them.The only problem is they need to also be adjustable for how wide         the band is.Every time I look up the magnets pop apart.If they fix that, I'd give them 5 stars !!</review_text>
My husband was totally delighted with the Rollator Walker.  It is so much easier to use than the typical walker that we had to wonder why anyone wouldn't want this new, much more attractive kind.  It folds up very easily when not in use and the basket comes in very handy for carrying things.  When folded up it fits in the back seat of our car, and it would probably fit in the trunk if your truck is fairly large.  We put it together in about 5 minutes and the price was great, what more can you ask</review_text>
I ordered this walker for my father a few months ago and am well-pleased.  It is much less expensive than comparable walkers.  The cushioned seat and basket are handy for long "trips" and the wheels roll smoothly even over grassy areas.  A good buy for someone looking for a quality walker.  Even ships for free</review_text>
This product rocks , if you are serious about body building this is a must have ...I've been using NO-Explode about two weeks and seen some serious enhanchments.. First of my workout lasts at least an hour longer than usual and still have energy left over . Combine this product with the right amount of protein shake you are good to go...also note that this product does not cause any stomach cramping or aching like other creatine products do and tastes great</review_text>
This product is ridiculous!!  Not in a bad way but ridiculous in the fact that my first time taking a serving I felt twice the energy, twice the bloodflow and three times as ready to hit the gym.My first thoughts, "well maybe it's because my body isn't used to it yet".  Well, four tubs later I had dropped two pants sizes (32 to a 28), gained 15lbs in pure muscle and still have the exact same effects as I did the first serving!!Not only that, I have passed this little known supplement on to friends and they have all said the same exact thing.  OMG!!  I only work out to stay in shape but with this product many people are telling me I look like I workout professionally</review_text>
This the best product out there for preventing and ridding red bumps, ingrown hairs, and the other unslightly skin/hair irritations</review_text>
these wipes are great.  i have three children and have used the pampers, huggies, and house-brand wipes.  the huggies are too thick and it seems you need more of them to get the job done. house-brand don't smell as good and tend to be a bit rough.  the pampers are thin, soft, and moist enough to get the job done-because they are thin, they can be maneuvered around in all the important places and folded / refolded for 100% useage (unlike the huggies that once they are folded they become too thick to maneuver).  definitely not too dry as other reviewers have said.  if you want something moister, go get a paper towel and wet it with water</review_text>
The shampoo doesn't lather.  But it has a nice subtle scent that lasts all day.  And it seems to be doing it's job at fighting dandruff since my hair has been itch-free since I started using it.  So I would recommend it</review_text>
my husband is a wheelchair user and loved these, said it keeps his eyes warm while driving down the stree</review_text>
I have three types of headlamps and I like this one the most.Here is why: 1) it's cheap, 2) it runs a long time on three AAA batteries, and 3) the red light is awesome.You can use the red light and still keep your "night vision". I use it to read in bed becasue it is not as visible or distracting to others as a white light.My only problem with it is that the knobs are a little confusing, even after two years of use. I often have to twist twice to get the right setting. And I'm usually good at that stuff</review_text>
Fantastic, a great product, especially considering the price.  I love the size.  I love that the height is adjustable.  It is exactly what I wanted, and I am thrilled with it.</review_text>
I love the taste of these little Chocolates. I find that I need to have one 1 hour before eating - less and they don't work. If I have  two in one day (late morning, mid-afternoon) the effect is cumalative. I can eat a very light dinner and be completely satisfied</review_text>
I absolutely love this little book light.  It is so slim and easy to store, plus I can use it for my magazines and paperbacks. I highly recommend this item.  A++</review_text>
This is exactly what I needed for my macbook computer.  It's comfortable and keeps my laptop from sliding around.  GREAT</review_text>
Although I am a writer who composes on the computer, I often do my editing on hard copy in a comfortable chair.  Until I started using the Posture-Rite Lap Desk, I could not do this comfortably.  Now I have it, it fits my lap perfectly, I use it and love it. I recommend it highly.</review_text>
I use and like most all of the Olay lines of products.  This one is great because it is not only a sunscreen but a skin treatment as well.  I can't wait for the one that has a "hint of tan" in it along with the sunscreen to be on the market. I heard about it, but apparently it is not out as of yet.</review_text>
I carry a lot of tension in my neck and upper back, and as a result get a lot of headaches.  I have been using the Real-Ease for about two months, and have found it very effective at releasing the tension in my neck and upper back and alleviating my headaches.  I have not used it as a preventative - only when I already have a headache.  If something happened to the one I have, I would definitely buy another</review_text>
Dr. Riter's Real-Ease is a simple, gentle, and healing neck support.  It is effective, easy to use, and affordable.  It helped healing post accident, and with general body pain healing and relaxation</review_text>
After just 3 weeks of using this product my fasting blood sugar has dropped to 111.  Thats over 40 points!!!!  Pretty impressive.  My Dr. started me on Metformin but it made me very sick.  This stuff works much better wiht no side effects.  I wish I had known about this years ago as I have been fighting with high fasting sugars for years.  This product is a god send.</review_text>
This is a great tool. This help people to get back on track "physically". It is hard to find effective training tools. This one is great for those who need back door training. Simple to use and Rock Hard! Up yours</review_text>
I really like this product. It's very dry and windy here and my lips have been very chapped. The Neutrogena has helped 100% when nothing else worked!! I'll definitely buy this product!</review_text>
I'm not sure how well since I have never used anything like this before, but my bath water feel a whole lot better and I do not itch for an hour afterwards. I probably should have rated a 5 star, but I really have no base for comparing. I will definitely buy this product again.</review_text>
Saved my love life, literally.It worked for me in a couple days and though its a tad pricey well worth the money, doesnt burn or sting either. If only all other stuff I used worked this good I coulda had a date to the prom. Cause I tried everything.Thanks Princereign</review_text>
I found this product to be very unique, and helpful, in that I could quickly remove & retain the glasses around my neck.Being far-sighted, I have come to need reading glasses, and these are perfect for my needs.  I can look 'down' through them, and look 'over the frame' for distance, all while they are secured around my head and neck.I do hiking, using a GPS device, and these glasses allow me to look down at the GPS device in my hand, while also looking forward towards my path of travel.Thank you for the innovative product</review_text>
I love the idea of the glasses always being where I can find them.The only problem is they need to also be adjustable for how wide         the band is.Every time I look up the magnets pop apart.If they fix that, I'd give them 5 stars !!</review_text>
I have nothing bad to say. it gets hot enough. it was cheap. it seems well made. the cover is washable. it's just what I was looking for</review_text>
I found this product after reading a review of it on hairboutique.com.  The length of my hair seemed to have reached a plateau just below my shoulders and after year seemed to have grown no longer.  I decided to try this product to see if it worked.  As hair growth is normally clocked at an 1/8 of an inch per month, I decided to monitor the results in my own little "clinical test."  This was actually pretty easy because I colour my hair so I'd easily be able to see how much growth there was each month.I ordered a box of Viviscal for which I paid $49 for (average price on the web) and the was set to take the first pill the following morning (the box recommends 2 per day).  I coloured my hair the night before so that in one month I'd be able to accurately measure how much growth there had been by looking at the growth since the colouring.Results:I didn't really notice anything until around the 2 week time frame.  I noticed my nails were growing very fast/very long.  I have weak nails that split easily and they barely seem to grow at all.  It was very noticeable because I use the computer all day and the nail growth was causing my fingers to constantly slip on the keyboard.  Never having great nails, I was pretty happy to see this.  My curiosity was also getting the better of me as I could see the roots of my hair pretty clearly which was unusual at 2 weeks after coloring.  I took the tape measure and measured almost 1/4 of an inch in hair growth.  This would mean 1/2 inch per month and 6 inches per year.  I was pretty excited because although the numbers seemed small, it was twice the rate my hair normally grows.  But I also noticed something else.  My hair was becoming unusually greasy.  Because I have very dry hair, I normally only wash it 2-3 times a week.  But every other day it seemed much more greasy than normal.  Hmmm.Well, at the 1 month time frame I measured my hair growth and it was exactly 3/4 of an inch.  Not only that but I was constantly trimming my nails at this point.  I was totally ecstatic.  But also by this point, I was washing my hair every day - it was no longer dry and brittle, it was much softer, but there was no way I could miss a day of washing it or it would be greasy.So - the conclusions I have reached from my test was this:1.  Yes, Viviscal works.  It caused my hair growth to be stimulated at over twice the speed.2.  Viviscal also makes your nails much stronger and grow much faster.3.  Viviscal makes your hair greasy, causing you to have to wash it every day - and then it's fine.It did not cause any extra hair growth anywhere else, which I thought a bit strange (though good!!!).I recommend this product</review_text>
As a reviewer of the Hitachi Magic Wand, I can say that this Accuvibe seems just as adaquate to do the job, the plus is that this can be used with or without the power cord. Perhaps just not as powerfull as the Hatachi but pretty dam comparable if not the same, the cordless battery operation is worth the trade off. As mentioned it does the job</review_text>
While some of Larabars have a thick grainy-nut texture, this particular product is very smooth and almost tastes like chocolate candy. For those of us who can't eat real candy because of allergies, this one is a winner! It almost tastes like a soft Girl Scout thin mint cookie</review_text>
Old Spice Classic is far and away the best deodorant I've ever used. It goes on clean, unlike those "powdery" white deodorants. It also has a great fragrance and longevity after application. I think a lot of that is due to the high alcohol content; if you look at the ingredients, you'll see that alcohol is listed first. In fact, the container sports a "flammable" warning. The alcohol really does work well to contain odor. Alcohol-based deodorants are pretty hard to find, so I'm thankful this product is still being made</review_text>
This shaver is the best shaver I have ever used. It gives me the closest shave. It is very comfortable to hold. It is great. My brother-in-law liked it so much he bought one</review_text>
Yo nunca habia usado una afeitadora electrica y al comprar esta hice una excelente inversion porque me deja la piel practicamente lisa, muy suave y lo mejor de todo no tengo que usar agua. Le dura la bateria y se limpia muy facilmente con el cepillito que trae. Si compras el polvo de remington que ellos recomiendan es mucho mejor porque la afeitadora se desliza con mas suavidad. Saludos Rafael desde Cabimas Venezuel</review_text>
This is the best shaver I've ever used.  It shaves closer and quicker than the many Norelcos I've used, all of which costed a lot more than the R-960.  The only improvement I'd like to see is in the battery, which does not really maintain its strength well between charges</review_text>
This is a great shaver.  If you are in the market for one, considered the Remington R-960.  I am of Afro-American descent and was very skeptical about buying a rotary we shaver.  I had always gotten excellent results using Remington shavers that were of the micro thin type to tackle the tough turf around my mug.  With its ergonomic design, it was very easy to manipulate the shaver around in tough areas.  I had considered purchasing that of another brand until I discovered that Remington makes one and now... I'm loving it</review_text>
We needed something for our baby's room so that we wouldn't have to tip-toe around the house while she was napping. We ordered this item based on the great reviews, but didn't really know what to expect. It's much like the noise produced by a small fan, but without blowing air. It has two speeds, and complete control over the volume and pitch by adjustment of the louvers. Some reviews we read said it was not loud enough. I can't imagine that being a problem as we have it on the quietest setting (louvers completely closed, and low speed) and it's perfect. On high it's PLENTY loud for a device used while sleeping. This product did the trick for us, and I would recommend it to anybody with a light-sleeping baby</review_text>
Recently got my SleepMate and it is very effective.  Somehow it blocks out most sounds outside of my bedroom, and I don't have any trouble sleeping.  I use to wake up at least 2-3 times a night, and have the hardest time getting back to sleep.  I hardly ever wake up at all now.Great product, and I'd definately recommend it to anyone in need of a good night's sleep</review_text>
I bought this as a present for my mother but tried it first to be sure it was worth the money.  It really is!  After using this the recomended 15 minuets, my feet felt just like they did when I had a professional foot massage!  I highly recomend this for anyone who enjoys having thier feet massaged</review_text>
I wasn't sure what to expect when I 1st tried this two-part microdermabrasion & Peel kit.  I use it twice a week, and what a difference it has made on my skin.  The only thing is , I wish they made a bigger bottle of the Peel.  Mariann</review_text>
A friend of mine used to meet me for lunch while boasting a beautiful & glowing face from a $50.00 facial she had just received.  This product (even after the 1st use) produced the same results & I never had to leave my home.  My skin always goes through hell during the winter months when its continually exposed to artificial heat.  My skin feels & looks like I've lost about 7 years time.  I'm very, very pleased with Olay.  I've used their Total Effects lotion for years & I did purchase the regenerist serum to apply after using the kit.  This is an excellent exfoliant & hands down, the best skin regenerating product I've ever used</review_text>
I've been using regenerist daily for 6 months. I added the peel system this past month. What a change! I'm 60. My skin has clarity I haven't seen in years. Pores close up, small lines and wrinkles really do seem to disappear. I'll stick with this from now on</review_text>
After going back and forth between Oil of Olay and Neutrogena I settled on this product mostly because of the price (plus no one complained about the granules getting into their eyes.) I'm happy with the results- my skin is softer and appears to have taken on more clarity. The orange smell is lovely and it only takes two minutes (I do it in the shower.) Of course, it's not microdermabrasian, but it is a great exfolliater for your skin</review_text>
I love this product. It just tastes great especially with milk.</review_text>
We used this for my newborn daughter up until 3 months when her digestive system finally started to mature enough to not have gas frequently.  As a previous reviewer stated, sometimes it works, sometimes not, so I combined it with the recommended dosage for Infant Gas Drops and that would do the trick.  I found Little Tummy's brand at Babies-R-Us, which is less expensive and is the same thing.Later, after 6 months and trying new foods, there has been a couple of occasions when you could tell something didn't agree with her.  I gave her the recommended dosage for her age and she'd clearly feel better</review_text>
Delivers moist heat. Great large size. You won't find anything larger anywhere.VERY relaxing as lavender is calming.Only problem is it only stay warm enough for 10 min and heat really should be applied for 20 minutes.I have placed a heating pad underneath in it the last 10 min. and lied down with head & neck in comfortable position and it did a great job.Pricey but worth it</review_text>
Received the monitor quickly.  It works well.  The automatic feature is great.</review_text>
I found this blood pressure meter easy to use and quite accurate when checked against my doctors readings.  Keeping the readings in memory made it very easy to keep my doctor inform of the results.  The size of the cuff is very important, so be sure to order the right size for your arm as the wrong size will give inaccurate results.  This is true in the doctors office also.  My blood pressure dropped several points in the doctors office, on his machine, just by changing the size of the cuff.This is an excellent monitor - I couldn't be happier with it.  It is nice to be able to use it with batteries too.</review_text>
I ordered 1 for my twin bed to try out.  Loved it, so I ordered a full and kingsize too!  I find I don't move around as much as I used to.  A more restfull sleep</review_text>
This is a very good product.   It helps prolong the life of the electric razor</review_text>
I've used this for quite some time now and really like it.  I don't have the trouble with the toilet flushing that others seem to - but I suppose if you have one of those one-gallon regulated toilets, you'd probably have some trouble with this paper.  It is thicker and tons softer, but it does a wonderful job too on things like runny noses, running cat's eyes, cleaning the bathroom sink, mirror, you name it.  It's pretty strong stuff and I highly recommend it</review_text>
I've been using Remington's Shaver Saver for 20 years. It keeps your shaver clean, lubricates well with not too much gooey oil, and works in an instant. I use a Remington MS2-100 Microscreen 2, and after a Shaver Saver treatment the shaver glides smoother over my face and shaves quicker and closer. A treatment seems to last for a while and I don't think it's necessary to use it every day. Usually 2 to 3 times a week seems to be sufficient and your shaver will continue to perfrom like new</review_text>
I bought this to go with my MS2-200BPT Shaver. I saw a review that said that it kept the shaver running well. I've been using it for about 1 month and I couldn't agree more. A quick spray on the cutters after shaving, and the next time I use it, it runs like new. I can tell the difference in the smoothness and speed of the shaver since I've started using it. As a bonus, it seems to last quite a while. Another strong product from Remington</review_text>
I have several of these glasses now.  Love them. They are strong and adjustable and so much better then wearing the granny cord around your neck.  I wish there was a berrer looking sunglass besides that goggle looking one.  Good price and good product.</review_text>
like the product very much. comfortable and convenient.  i would recommend then if: you have a small hat size, don't mind carrying around an odd shaped soft carrying bag.  with the above i don't have a problem.  the most distracting problem is your eyes sweat inside the foam enclosed, goggle like eye pieces on warm days.  i've thought about cutting vents in the foam around the eye, but have not done this as of jan,2007. i like them very innovative</review_text>
I have six children and had been feeling extremely fatigued (like I could hardly move).  I had been taking a general multi-vitamin from a local warehouse store.  I started taking the Nature's Plus Source of Life, and I felt so much better.  My energy level has increased dramatically, and I just feel good.  Great quality product</review_text>
Nearly two years of ownership and it has been a great purchase. I have no shame dorking up my drinking. Use to ensure legal driving or for ill advised contests. Also determine what at what BAC memory gets spotty (what point is there exceeding that?). Fun to call out big talkers who don't suspect you are packing a lie detector of sorts. Also useful to get people off your back who think you are too drunk to drive.Prosprecision to third decimal place. rare at this price at time of my purchaseVery repeatable with consistant deep breathSmall enough to take to bars in jacket pocket or cargo pockets. Light for its size.ConsInnaccurate if sips have been taken within 10 minutes or so. True for all breathalyzers. Drunk idiots have tough time getting it through their headsWarm up/calibration time ~45 sec. Another let down at parties but perhaps key to accuracyWould be nice if it was more pocket sizedChirps at you alarm clock style if above .08 "I know I'm drunk, shut up!</review_text>
Very nice scale, worked wonderfully for a family member of mine with poor eyesigh</review_text>
i purchused this for my daughter with vision then my vision impaired daughter used it while she was at home she loved it, so now i'm buying her one for her new ap</review_text>
We have it hanging in a closet and it has been working great!  When it changes color all I do is plug it in for about 10-12 hours and then hang it back up again!  We are very satisfied</review_text>
I purchase two of the Eva-dry EDV-500 renewable DeHumidifer and hang them inside the closet where I store my photo gears. Although in California is not so humid but little moisture do add up. This dehumidifer is so easy to use -- unwrap it then hang it there. I check them once per several day. When the silica gel change from blue to pick, I just recharge it by plug it into the electric outlet overnight, then next morning, wow, a renewed dehumidifer is ready to use again. The changing of color is very obviously. I strongly recommend this item</review_text>
The product was a gift for my mother who needs extra circulation in her feet.  She loves it and it has helped increase the circulation</review_text>
Mine is dry sensitive skin and the cream works well. I like the way this cream gives instant glow</review_text>
I love this soap, it's a little big and hard to hold during shower, but the smell totally makes up for it!  it has a very strong (but good) grapefruit smell, it's very fresh and rinses completely off</review_text>
The dispencer is easy to "squeeze" amount of moisturizer needed for one application. consistency of moisturizer is easy to apply, it's very mosturizing and on top of that protects agaist UV and aging! very convenient. But just a little bit on the high side for over counter cosmetics for my opinion</review_text>
I bought from the 3 types of Olay total Effect, and I did try them after reading the instruction, There is no magical effect apeard after 1 month but there is diffrence, The company was very good in logistic maters</review_text>
I used Aveeno moisturizer and thought I would try something new.  I have eczema on my face (around my eyes, nose and mouth) in the winter and have no signs of it after a few days.  My skin is very sensitive, and have experienced burning with other products, but not this one.  I sinks in quickly and is not greasy feeling or heavy, yet strong enough to tackle dry skin.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
Purchased 15 15HP15RB heating pads that are used by dialysis patients.They are doing great</review_text>
This is my first electric shaver and I am very pleased with the results.  Use the Trimmer to reduce the length of the hair and then use the cleancut to "make it smooth".  No knicks no cuts!!! I am pleased!</review_text>
It took a while to get this product but, it was worth the wait. The iron heats up quickly and easily. When you have arthritis like me, you appreciate the simplicities in this product. It heated up fast and safely AND it was so easy to grip the handle. It definitely styled my hair without over-processing it. Thanks</review_text>
Optimum Nutrition's 100% whey protein is hands down the best I have tried, and I have tried a lot of different shake products in the past 10 years. I used to be committed to EAS and Labrada, but I found that the shakes are too hard for me to digest compared to ON Whey Protein.I mix it with water, and sometimes soy milk. It mixes easy, doesn't taste gritty, and is pure protein. It goes down very easy and I have no trouble digesting it, plus it builds muscle when combined with a solid workout plan. Plus, the price is reasonable.</review_text>
I am a former General Nutrition Center employee and there are hundreds of "powdered" protein products that "hype" about the most important ingredient known for any person that works out. if you want a simple great tasting protein supplement that will help satisfy your daily intake without feeling sick, bloated or passing gas, then you need to trust in Optimum Nutritions 100% Whey Protein. It truly gives you the results you need as far as quality and nutrition goes.I strongly recommend 2% milk over water for even better taste, but water will still do the trick. If you buy Vanilla, i suggest mixing it with berries, bananas, strawberries, or bananas for added taste.this is by far the best protein supplement out there that is worth more for your money</review_text>
I have been using this stuff regularly for about 10 months post workout & for meal replacement to keep up protein intake. I read alot about mixing whey with coconut water & that is how I have been taking it (blended with a couple ice cubes). If you like strawberry shakes this will be really easy for you to take, I do & I actually look forward to the shake</review_text>
Tastes great, and it's good for a normal weight training person like me</review_text>
If I could give this product over five stars, I would!  I get eczema on my eyelid and went through tons of products trying to find something to soothe it when I finally got this product in one of the starter kits Burt's Bees makes and I was hooked.  I use this with their marshmallow vanishing cream and my skin feels and looks great.  I have also noticed a decrease in the dark circles I always have when I use the royal jelly cream, though that could just be relief from no more eczema problems</review_text>
All there products are great! They smell good and are good. Lathering is a more work but thats because they're natural. I use them on my babies and toddlers</review_text>
I bought this as a trial product, because the other stuff that I bought didn't work as what they advertise it. But this dusters picks up the dust instead of pushing to another place. This refills is quite cheap and it make my cleaning job much easier</review_text>
I am a busy architect and this is the 2nd pair of Clics I own.If you are active and need reading glasses they are perfect.Their only drawback is that they take two hands to put on!  I'dlook at slimming down the frames to make them less heavy and trimmer.Lastly ~ I've found these readers to be really rugged and good for outdoor use</review_text>
I started using this several months ago after seeing it chosen as the best by Consumer's Report.  Within a few weeks, I could see measurable improvement in my skin.  Sure, not all the deep wrinkles went away, but enough of the smaller ones smoothed away so my 58-year-old skin looks younger.My skin feels so much smoother and looks fresh.  I've had a lot of sun exposure from living in Australia, South Texas and Florida, so I'm thrilled to find a cream that does such a good job.  Lots cheaper too than many skin creams</review_text>
My grandmother actually gave me a small sample of regenerist. I started to use it and fell in love with it. I have suffered with acne my entire life and I have found combining this along with my salicylic acid treatment my skin has improved drastically. I have since purchased a bottle of the regenerist serum that had a sample of regenerist night. These both seem to be making my skin clear up and be much smoother for applying cosmetics, which has been a problem due to my skin texture</review_text>
Love this product, have been using Oil of Olay before it was heard of by most.This is more advanced and makes my skin look and feel more youthful</review_text>
I bought this item for my husband for Christmas.  He has hip and knee problems so sleeping comfortably sometimes can be an issue for him.  We use these pillows everyday sitting up watching TV and he uses the head and knee wedges while he sleeps.  The only downfall now is that he sleeps so good he snores!</review_text>
I am a foot reflexologist and I highly recommend this product. It is very helpful in working the reflexes on the bottom of the feet</review_text>
Kama Sutra Massage Oil in the 8oz bottle is really good stuff!Keeps the skin so smooth and the girlfriend happy LoL just make sure you warm it up alittle before squirting it on. You will live longer</review_text>
This sunscreen has the important components to give you UVA and UVB protection.  It goes on smooth for a sunscreen that uses Titanum Dioxide for  its protection agent.  My kids love that the bottle turns color when UVA rays touch it, indicating that sunscreen is necessary</review_text>
This works better than any other women's shaver I've ever used.  It does give a close shave without irritating the skin</review_text>
I was unsure if this product would be as good as the one sold at Brookstone.  It is great!  Just as good as the iJoy sold at Brookstone, but much cheaper.  I love it</review_text>
I am the kind of person that gets leg cramps or easily gets tired legs after a short walk, yet I need to work and that means that I have to be standing long hours. So when I tried your leg massagers I was ecstatic to find out the relief it gave me after a 10 minute use. I now use it every chance I get, my children use it after their soccer games and love it as well. It is one of the best purchases I have made.  It was worth the investment</review_text>
I thought this was convenient and easy to use. Seemed to give a pretty accurate reading.</review_text>
This contains 16 servings, which means it will last you half a month.  That's pretty expensive when you break the price down by serving and whne compared with a 1 month supply of the flax capsules that costs $7.  However, liquid flax oil is a lot more concentrated than the pills you buy at the store.A flax oil pill typically contains 1000mg of flaxseed oil and a suggested dosage of 2-3 times a day.  So with pills you're getting 2-3g of flax oil a day.  With liquid flax oil, you're getting 14g of flax.If you are buying this for it's purported treatment of acne, sunburn, diverticular disorders, hemorrhoids, and more serious health conerns, it's probably best to consume the liquid flax oil.  If you just want the benefits of lower cholesterol and heart disease prevention, a pill a few times a day, combined with fish oil should be all you need.It's definitely easier though to take a spoonful of this in the morning than 3 flax pills a day, and when you loook at value, you're getting 224g of flax oil in this bottle when compared with a typical 100g in a 100 pill bottle of the capsules.  It all depends on what you need it for</review_text>
Flax is a plant. The seeds in the flax plant are filled with flaxseed oil, (sometimes called linseed oil). The seeds contain fatty oils called alpha-linolenic acid (ALA) and linoleic acid. ALA is the omega-3 oil in flaxseed. Flaxseed contains both omega-3 fatty acids and omega-6 fatty acids. Flaxseed is nature's richest storehouse of omega-3 fatty acids, and contains more than twice as much omega-3 oil as fish oils, and it costs less , ounce for ounce. Flax also contains other important substances like lignans, which may protect against some types of cancer. The husks of the seeds are rich in mucilage. Both the seed oil and mucilage have many nutritional and therapeutic properties.There are many potential benefits from taking Flax seed oil:Flaxseed Oil lowers cholesterol levels, thereby improving cardiovascular health and lessening the risk of arteriosclerosis.Flaxseed also contains plant nutrients like phytoestrogens. These are natural estrogen-like substances that can lessen the discomfort of menopause.Flaxseed oil may lower high blood pressure.Flaxseed oil helps some people improve their psoriasis and eczema, as it has anti-inflammatory properties. Flaxseed may also reduce the itching, swelling, and redness associated with certain skin disorders such as acne.Flaxseed oil has a positive effect on rheumatoid arthritis due to its ability to calm inflammation.Flaxseed reduces LDL (low-density lipoprotein) cholesterol (the body's "bad cholesterol") and lowers triglyceride levels. Research shows that flaxseed oil gives much better protection against heart attacks than canola oil or olive oil.Taking flaxseed may reduce cancer risk. This is because flaxseed contains the richest sources of lignan building blocks, which play a major role in preventing cardiovascular diseases and cancer. New research indicates that the lignans in flaxseed have both short-term and long-term protective effects against colon cancer.Nature Made Flaxseed Oil is a quality source of flaxseed oil, as the company is well-known and reputable. One tip: keep your flaxseed oil away from light and heat, as both degrade the oil.The usual beneficial dose of Flaxseed Oil is 2-3 capsules once per day taken with a meal.The benefits of Flaxseed Oil are cumulative.  Commit to taking it every day without fail.  Like any herbal supplement, don't expect dramatic quick results.  The results you get will be subtle at first and then build over time.  For specific conditions such as Rhematoid arthritis, exzema, psoriasis, acne, etc,. the results should be apparent in 4-8 weeks.  Be patient!  Know that even if you don't "feel" different, you are sill protecting your body from the harmfull effects of many disease conditions.Jim "Konedog" Koeni</review_text>
Loving this Air Purifier! This was really the first one I have own so I can't compare it to any others. It is very quite, and takes alot of dust out of the air. The first time I had to replace the filter I was shocked by how much dust I could of been breathing in. Worth picking up, just wish it would of had an energy star label.</review_text>
My youngest daughter has had mild to severe asthma for 32 years and has had to use an inhaler almost on a daily basis.  I bought her this product to use in her new house as she was having severe asthma attacks from dust, mold, pollen, ect.  She has been using this product for three (3) months now and she has not had to use her inhaler a single time.  We have used several other brands and types of air cleaners in the past twenty years but none have proven as effective as this product.  Highly recommeded</review_text>
Back in the early 90s I was going through a bad acne period.  I finally visited a dermatologist, and he put me on an Accutane regimen.  I had sensitive skin and a tough beard, so regular shaving cream was too harsh (especially while taking Accutane - the solid brush-on cream I was using at the time burned the edges of my lips).  He recommended that I shave with Cetaphil.  Years later, my skin and beard are still troublesome.  Therefore, I've kept Cetaphil as a part of my shaving regimen.Cetaphil goes on well and provides a nice lubrication for my shaver.  It's not harsh or irritating, even on a freshly shaved face.  However, it's kind of cold in the morning, which is a bit counter-productive after heating my face with hot water and shower steam to soften the whiskers.  So I put the bottle on the tub floor while showering to heat it up with the runoff.  By the time I'm done, it's warm enough for application after rubbing some around my hands for a second or two.However, even though Cetaphil feels good and lubricates well, its consistency is a bit thin to use alone.  I like a good lather, so I combine Cetaphil with Kiss My Face Moisture Shave, which was recommended to me by a woman working at GNC.  They mix well together, and I get a good, non-irritating shave by using the Gillette Fusion Power razor.  For post-shave comfort and to prevent breakouts, I apply a product that contains salicylic acid, such as Clean&Clear Dual-Action Oil-Free moisturizing lotion.If you have a razor-challenging beard and skin combination like me, then make Cetaphil part of your shaving routine.  Recommended</review_text>
I have been using this for my face for over 10 years.  It is very inexpensive (especially compared to other cosmetic brands) and cleans well without irritating or drying the skin.  I also used it on my 3 kids.  It comes in handy on the changing table, especially when the wipes were not quite "wet" enough to do the job!  It is also great for any spot cleaning anywhere on the body without rinsing.  It can just be wiped off without leaving any residue.  It is very gentle, even for newborn's skin</review_text>
this product perfrorms as expected, and very easy to clean with almost not maintenance. it also has an adjust dial for the humidity, which gives you some control. love the machin</review_text>
I'm a black male and everytime I would shave normally I would get irritated skin and ingrown hairs. At first i'd feel a little itch throughout the day and by the end of the day I'd see these tiny little bumps with white heads (about 10-20 of them). That was  before. Now after I apply the product I don't have the itch nor do the tiny bumps come up anymore. It just feels like I never had any hair on my face in the first place. The only bad thing about this product is that it burns slightly but I don't really care I mean it's not like the product claims to be painless.</review_text>
I installed this unit in my basement about 6 months ago, and it has been working flawlessly ever since.Things I noticed:If the power goes out, the unit will NOT turn back on automatically (as some other units do.)If you want to use the continuous drainage (which I highly recommend) via a hose, you have to punch out a plastic disc on the side of the unit. I would have designed a screw-type plug that was replacable, but they didn't think of that. Anyway, once you punch the quarter-size disc out it's out forever.If you choose to use the continuous drainage feature, you will need to pick up a hose with an inner diameter of 15mm (.59" or just over half an inch.) I went to the local DIY center and found some clear tubing that has worked well.The unit can operate down to 2-degrees C (36-degrees F), which will be great for continuous operation in the garage to keep the tools from rusting.Has three fan settings: med, high and quiet. "Quiet" really is quiet, and could probably work just fine in a bedroom. Though, it does warm the room it's in. How much it warms it depends on the humidity setting.Four settings: The humidty level (humidstat) can be set to "continuous dehumidification" (which is the default setting), 50%, 60% and 70%. The fan will continue to run but the dehumidification processor will turn off when it reaches the selected humidity level. Cool. I mean, that's when the fan will just blow room-temp air.A full drainage tank will stop the unit and illuminate a "tank full" indicator light.The unit is not that heavy -- maybe for some, but not nearly as heavy as some people make it sound. It's 30.8 pounds.According to the instructions: You will need at least 21 cm (about 8 inches) of clearance in front, behind and side to side. Air blows out of the top of the unit, so you'll need to make sure it's clear as well.There are movable louvers on the top to direct the air straight up, 45-degrees or almost straight ahead.Power consumption: CFM-25E is 220W // CFM-40E is 330WI highly recommend this model dehumidifier</review_text>
This was bought as a gift for my Dad, who has limited mobility. It's easy for him to use, easy to handle and gives him a great shave. He really likes it</review_text>
I've used this razor for about 2 yrs.  For me and my wife, it gives me a great close shave.  I've never had a problem with skin irritation.  Just how hard are these other guys pressing the razor on their face?!  I can't imagine.  I only need the lightest pressure to get a good shave.  The shave is fast, about 2 mins.  The dual blade design (each of the three heads has two rows of blades!) is awesome, makes the shave clean and fast.  I'll probably stick with Remington rotories from now on, but will upgrade to a corded/cordless.My problems with it are:Can't use with cord if the battery dies (didn't know this when I bought it)The gears in the head strip/slip easily if a long beard/mustache hair gets in, which requires turning it off and back on again.Otherwise, it's a great solid razor</review_text>
I love the Olay Regenerist line! Moisturizes your skin and makes it smooth. You will see a big difference after the first use! I've been using this product for 2 years now and just recently started the serum and it's great.</review_text>
I have used Olay Regenerist Perfecting Cream for over a year now. It leaves the skin feeling very soft without feeling greasy and seems to smooth out the skin nicely. It does not have spf protection so for daytime I use a lighter moisturizer with spf over it before applying my foundation. At night it's all you need</review_text>
I've tried many a serum, potion, lotion, cream... every over the counter fit-it on the market and none have had the wonderful effect that this has had!  I know, Iknow... there are those out there who say the effect is fleeting, but I've yet to see it</review_text>
I got this for my husband because he had to shave too frequently and I thought they'd improve upon the Mach3.  Well they did!  This Turbo brand of Mach 3 is actually much better; his shave lasts longer, the blades last longer, and it leaves a very attractive smooth shave.  I choose this one over that Mach3 power vibrating blade because, I don't know, a sharp blade the vibrates is asking for trouble in my opinion.  Haha...He's very happy with it and likes the shave.  And speaking about money, if the shave and blades last longer than before, it's a great value!Highly suggested!!</review_text>
I have used Opti-Free Enzymatic Cleaner for years, still with the same great results. I have a feeling this type of product won't be around much longer, because my using extended-wear contacts seems to be a rarity at my optometrist's office, where everyone else is wearing the disposal lenses that are always in stock</review_text>
it is the best product of it type on the market and i wish it were more available in stores.i don't know what you mean by give your review a titl</review_text>
Purchased as a Christmas gift for a friend who uses this product, he was excited to receive this.  I was excited that I was able to purchase it at a considerable savings over department store prices.  This same product in a smaller size retails for $45-$55 locally and I was able to purchase him a larger bottle for less than $30.  This particular item by Davidoff is not always easy to find and I was glad to not only find it here but to find it at such a reasonable price</review_text>
This product is great for injury and leg elevation.  My grandmother had a hematoma on her leg and she said that her "legs don't fall asleep anymore and they feel so good."  My grandmother has had two strokes and this is just the relief that she needs.  My mother has fibromayalgia and I'm ordering two for her as well.  She "test-drove" them before giving a set to my grandmother and this will be a great holiday gift for her</review_text>
I am very fair and find it difficult to enjoy the sun because I constantly burn.  I have tried everything and have never been completely satisfied.  I went on my honeymoon to the Maldives in November and was able to stay out in the sun, go swimming and I did not have to constantly reapply.  I didn't get burned once!  Bull Frog Superblock is the best sunblock around</review_text>
Have used this product on myself for many years when particapating in ultra endurance cycling events, as well as on my family when vacationing in tropical area's where the sun will cook you quickly without adequate sun protection. Do not be fooled by thinking you will not get tanned by using  SPF 45 or better. That is a misconception...why not walk away from your experience in the sun without the discomfort of sun poisoning. Found best result's when put on indoors prior to being in the sun.</review_text>
The chair has simple pre-set programs (I basically use only the full-body massage), but also allows for designing your own massage by choosing specific movements and massage area.Of course it is not the same as a real massage and not as good as the $2,500 chairs, but offers a great way to relax your back muscles at a great value</review_text>
I am a biochemist by education and was a teaching in physiology in a university.  As such, I am very knowledgeable about chemistry and the human body in general.  I really like Neutragena products and this product is certainly very high quality.  For most people, I think it offers great protection, but not the best protection for people who need to be very conscious of sun exposure and the possibility of skin cancer.According to my dermatologist, recent studies have shown that SPF 15-30 wipes off after a few hours and doesn't offer adequate protection after that time.  This is partly due to most people not using enough.  In other words, they underestimate how much they need to apply to get that level of protection.For this reason, Neutrogena SPF 45 or 55 is better.  Also, the Neutrogena Ultra Sheer products have been updated to include a technology called Helioplex.  Most dermatologists that I know feel that this makes a difference in effectiveness and for some people this is going to be very important.I have used both this product and the higher SPF Helioplex formulations.  In practice, I have found BOTH adequate for my needs.  What I particularly like is that you don't even know you have the product on.  It has virtually no scent and it really is so sheer you can't even notice it.  Both of these products stay on a long time and are good for all day use, but my understanding is that the Helioplex formulation is even better.  Further, it feels exactly the same on the skin.  The only drawback is it's a bit more expensive.This is also a good product because it protects against both UVA and UVB rays.  Both are implicated in skin cancer and it's important to protect yourself against both.  If you are looking for an everyday sunscreen this might be the one.  However, if you want the very best protection try the Neutrogena Helioplex SPF 55.  This will give you the most peace of mind</review_text>
My daughter and I have searched for a sunscreen that both of us would like, and never found one that was completely satisfactory. She has oily skin prone to breakouts, and mine is combination. Every one we tried always left a greasy feel and look to the face, even the ones that were supposed to be oil-free.Finally, I came across a review of this product on Paula Begoun's website (www.cosmeticscop.com). The review sounded good, so I went out and bought some right away. My daughter and I both LOVE this product! It's the only sunscreen we have ever used that doesn't leave a greasy feel or look to the skin. It dries to a matte finish, and works very, very well under foundation, too. Without foundation, there is no need to use powder to kill the shine. And it feels so light on the skin, you barely know it's there!If you have oily or combination skin and have never found a sunscreen that doesn't look and feel greasy, try this one! It's the best!</review_text>
I cannot say how well this product really compares to other sunscreens in terms of sun protection. But it does have the right ingredients that most top-rated sunscreens/sunblocks use, so it should be at least on par with them.Where this product really shines (or DOESN'T shine) is for people with combination/oily skin. I have tried MANY sunscreens, and it's so hard to find a sunscreen WITHOUT moisturizers (if you have oily skin, that's already your natural moisturizers).I have even tried other NEUTROGENA sunscreens that are supposed to be OIL FREE and all that. The result on my face? After applying it, I always SHINE (which is NOT what I want).This magnificent product, however, actually gives my face a nice MATTE finish... and matte FEEL, too! It's a pretty thick cream when you first apply it (as opposed to other suncreens or other products that feel more like LOTION), but is almost immediately absorbed by the skin. In 30 seconds, there is no more greasy/creamy feeling, and in one minute, if you feel your skin, there's a nice matte feel.HOWEVER, and this is not the fault of the product, after about 3 hours (at least for me), then I feel like the matte effect has worn off, and my oily skin is again showing its oily nature.Still, as far as suncreens go, this is the best I have tried for my skin, and I highly recommend it for people with combination/oily skin.BTW, this review is for the actual product I got, which is SPF 30. As of the time I am writing this review, here in amazon they also offer an SPF 45 version, and cheaper, too! I don't know the difference, but I always go for the LOWER one (in this case, SPF 30), because I theorize -- rightly or wrongly, I don't know -- that the lesser the SPF, the lesser the strength of the ingredients, so maybe it's better for sensitive skin (?)</review_text>
I find this product to be very good for calfs & one of the best foot massagers I've ever tried. The one drawback is that it tends to slide away from you when you are using it on your feet.I would reccommend it</review_text>
It works very well.I bought it for my wives calves.She has thick ones and after working out it become more thick.Using this product, her calves become soft and getting thin.I've used it too, I can relax with it because it helps the blood circulation.</review_text>
These hair brushes were the rage when I was in junior high.  I have had one since then.  It is a great brush and lasts forever.  Worth the price</review_text>
bought it works really good, such a fun thing to have laying around, and was very pleased well worth the $50 it costed me at brookstone</review_text>
this is a wonderfull massager, i have had other ones in the past and they were'nt as good as this one. for $50 this massager is great it really was well worth the money for what it gives out to yourself. the power on it was amazing i was really shocked i dident think it would be that much in a good way though. so i was very pleased with buying this acuvibe massager and it really does work great so i hope i helped you make your chose right</review_text>
i had reasently bought this vibrator because i like trying out did kinds of vibrators to get more pleasure from and well i would have to say this one and my magic wand vibrator, well i like this one better because it is cordless so i can use it anywhere in my home even away from an outlet like in my car and no cord gets in the way. it also has a very flexable soft head that feels really very good when i use it. it has really strong motor that can make me have some exteme orgasms that fell very good. and last it looks to be made very well so it probly will last pretty long i hope so.</review_text>
This would be a perfect curling iron if heated to a slightly higher temperature.  It takes a little longer to curl my hair because of the lower temperature</review_text>
Works Great, No problems after 4 months</review_text>
This product does a surprising job for its low price.  It gives my hair so much body and softness, and is extremely easy to use.  Gets plenty hot enough</review_text>
Great for people with sensitive skin or prone to acne.  I began using neutrogena as a teenager 25 years ago.  It helped clear up teen acne & has kept my skin free of razor burn in more recent years</review_text>
I recently a box of two 12 ounce bottles of this Neutrogna produst at COSTCO for approximately $9.00.  $22.00 for the same quantity is too expensive for me to want to shop for these products at Amazon</review_text>
Shavers fall into two categories, those who prefer rotaries like the Norelco and those who prefer foil shavers.For those of you who like foil shavers, this is the one for you!I've owned the latest Braun 8985 and it was excellent, while it lasted... The charger kept breaking on me (once in the first month [11/2006], then another time 4 months later [3/2007]). It was expensive, and the refills were a pain, pricey, but they worked.After two exchanges I decided to try the norelco 8140XL (speed XL)rotaries, and while they shaved really close, they tore up my neck. The problem only got worse. Returned 3 weeks later.I just got the Panasonic and can say that it definitely shaves closer than both of the tried razors. They shave MUCH faster than the Braun and Norelcos.I'm not sure if I like the "side to side" pivoting head, only time will tell. The heads don't pivot up and down as much as the Braun, but once again, time will tell if this is necessary.One MAJOR advantage is that it cleans with soap and water... No expensive refills to hassle over.The panasonic has two noticeable downsides:1. It's louder than other shavers, but who cares? It shaves incredibly fast anyway.2. You can't plug it in and shave... You have to wait until the battery is charged and charger is disconnected to turn it on.This is my favorite razor by far.</review_text>
I have to say that I have been converted. For over 15 years now I lived with a razor. I have a pretty thick beard and it grows fast too. I am the kind of guy that gets a 5 o'clock shadow at noon. I have used every single type of razor out there from disposable to the battery operated vibrating type and from the one blade to the 5+1 blade. I have tried all the brands and ended up feeling the Gillette brand is the best type of razor, but now I find it's not the best shave. I used an electric shaver several years back, it was one of the top of the line Norelco with the incorporated gel. It gave me a pretty bad razor burn and did not get all the hairs; I ended up having to shave as normal. --TRUE STORY-- I am a Manager at my job and on my last annual review the only item I was marked bad was my personal appearance. Not that I dress bad or not wear deodorant, but that they felt I didn't shave often. (I shave at the very least every other day, usually every day). So I felt I had to so something about it. I researched electric shavers thinking I could get a quick shave during my lunch hour in my car or at least on my way to work so it would last longer. I found that Panasonic seems to be leading the pack and was moderately priced and had all the features the expensive models had. The instruction manual is explicit in saying it will take about 30 days to get used to any new shaving method and they assure you will love the Panasonic shaver once your facial hairs get used to the way it is cut. I have been using it for almost 30 days now, and I will not live without it. I have NEVER had this close of a shave before. I can actually go 2 days without getting a shadow. My fianc has found a new love for touching my face, and I seem to be getting more kisses too! During the first 2 weeks I had to get a couple of the missed hairs with my old Gillette, but today officially I was able to through my Gillette away for good. (My boss has even asked what I am doing different and when I told him, he went out and bought one too, he also loves it now. My fianc said she would leave me if I stopped using the Panasonic, it's a good thing Panasonic has been around for decades) So, I am raving about his product, but every good has its bad... what the bad? Well, it gets a couple of weeks to get used to the shave, but for the amount of time I am planning to use it and the money I am saving from buying razors every month, I can handle that. The cleaning system is very good, but it takes very long to clean (2-3 hrs) and it is noisy since the base turns the shaver on and off during the cleaning cycles. The cleaning cartage is said to last 3 months whether you use it once a day or one a week. I have not gotten to that point yet, but it is very very easy to clean in the shower with some body wash. I just end up using the base for the drying cycle, which is an option. The batter is very good. In the month I have used it, I have charged it twice but it really didn't need it as it said the charge was good. Overall... excellent product. Could there be a better shaver out there, maybe, will I ever know... at this time, I am not worried about it, I am very satisfied with this Panasonic, and don't think it can get any better. This product does not include the cleaning base. I do recommend it as even if you don't use it to clean the razor, you can use it to dry it, it will help keep your blades in the newest condition and prevent them from rusting when air drying. But, if you are looking to save money and get an excellent razor, this is it!</review_text>
Panasonic makes a great electric shaver, this is the second one for me in the last sixteen years</review_text>
I am a woman of color and this product eliminates any discoloration without irritation or disturbing my combination skin. I highly recommend this product for women who need to brighten their appearance once a week.After 5 years I continue to use this and the pumpkin exfoliating mask. The papaya is good as well</review_text>
This is the 2nd year that I have used the Neutrogena Ultra Sheer Dry-Touch Sunblock, SPF 45.  I have Normal to Oily, sensitive, acne-prone skin. I am fair and can burn easily.I think this product is well worth the money, it is quickly absorbed into the skin and has a dry feel.  It does not make your skin look greasy and has never caused me to break out.  I apply it in the morning and it pretty much lasts me a good 8 hours.  The time will vary depending on your sun tolerance, though.  It is also conveniently sized to toss in your bag and lasts quite awhile</review_text>
My kids really liked how it didn't feel like suntan lotion</review_text>
I was very happy with the prpduct and the shipping was very quick, even in the middle of the holidays. I will probably order another 3 inch memory foam from allsleep for my queen size bed</review_text>
I got this bed topper a couple weeks ago to place on my older matress.  It was pretty pungent, but it felt so good the first time I layed in it.  after a couple days it appeared to lose it's memory and start to dent and crease, but eventually it got back to full expansion.  The customer service with this item was fantastic!We'll see how long the matress keeps up its memory</review_text>
When I get a sinus infection, it stays and builds much congestion. Rx and over-the-counter has limited value. One event that led to my first (I am 69) severe asthma event, which messed up my immune system and led to my first angina events which the brought open heart surgury.NeilMed pre-mixed packets sound like the "minor leagues" compared to the above. When a thorough cleansing is needed to make the sinus areas hostile to infection, these little packets take the mess out of measuring your own salt and soda(i.e. to make a mistake is painful even with the right salt).Then there is a $15 price in local stores for 100 packets, or about the same on-line for 200. Also a quick response from the vendor.</review_text>
This Sinus Rinse works great and it's easy to use. Great price from Amazon and quick shipping</review_text>
Bought 2 of these 3 years ago on QVC for my husband and myself.  I was pregnant with my second son and going to get waxed at the nail shop, where it smelled like nail polish remover, was just too much for me at the time.  We love these shavers and they work just as well today as they did 3 years ago!  I'm not sure what the other reviewer is talking about, I get an incredibly close shave with this.  To be honest, and maybe a little too personal, I haven't waxed my upper lip since, I only use this!  There is NO stubble, NO pain and great results!  I have dark hair, and if this in anyway made me look like I shaved, I would never use it!  I am buying 2 more for back up.  I hope they never stop making these!!</review_text>
So far this dryer is working great!  Another brand didn't last 1 year so I hope this one lasts longer</review_text>
I've tried a lot of different "nutrition" and "energy" bars, and these are my favorites (along with a couple of other chocolate ZonePerfect bars like Double Chocolate and Chocolate Raspberry). Great taste, a nice texture (sort of like Nestle Crunch), and much more satisfying than candy bars.  Almost as tasty as Girl Scout "Thin Mints", but not as fat- and guilt-inducing</review_text>
I have tried a gazillion of these "diet" protein bars. This is the only one I've actually found so far that tastes good.</review_text>
My 16-year-old daughter used this on problem acne on her back and shoulders with noticeable results by the second day - existing blemishes healed, no new break-out.  She's excited.  No harsh benzoyl peroxide (active ingredient is salicylic acid).    The Body Scrub has the little exfoliating "beads" in it (not mentioned on the bottle) - so it makes skin feel smooth immediately.  And the fragrance is very light, clean (gender-neutral).Also, it's very concentrated, so it goes a long way - making it easily worth the money as far as any body wash goes (and Amazon's price is better than the in-store price).Of course, everyone is different when it comes to acne treatments - but it worked here.</review_text>
good product. does what it says. however, it could smell better. it has almost no scent. you smell clean...but it has almost no scent. other than that it feels great, lathers great, leaves your skin feeling nice. and it clears your skin up</review_text>
This give an excellent finish to a shave.  I strongly suggest using the shaving oil as well.  Apply hot water to dilate your pores, then apply the oil, then shaving cream, shave, and finally the after shave balm.  The oil and balm make for an amazing shaving experience.  Your face feels incredibly smooth afterward.  I don't use it every day because it is a little more time consuming that just applying the shaving cream alone, but I do use the products above most of the time because of the great feel after</review_text>
I knew a man who once wore this classic cologne, and always smelled so good.  I bought it for my hubby this Christmas and instantly remembered why I loved that smell so much.  It is a classic frangrance, not stinky or overpowering - but fresh.  There are other Vetiver cologne's out there, but they smell NOTHING like the Guerlain from France. It's a gorgeous smell, and I guarantee you would love it if you are looking to smell great without it being overpowering. It's smooth and mellow, fresh</review_text>
This is a good massager that can hone in on the pressure points. The knob is a little large for getting at specific reflex spots, but generally does the job</review_text>
I say the scale is pretty good and accurate but the Fat % keep changing different % in the morning and night, Like in the morning I got 30.2% and at Night it say I got 25.8%. I dont really trust the Fat % but The Pound Is very Accurate.For the Price I would rather get something cheaper</review_text>
today is 3-19-07.  this item is labeled as being purchased on 3-21-07.  will I purchase another order on that date</review_text>
The Neutrogena Norwegian Formula Foot Creme was a dream for this mother. My 7-year-old was unfortunate enough to inherit a severe callous problem that affects his hands and feet. The problem is so severe in his father that his father's hands and feet are literally split open and very painful. The 7-year-old has already started with very hard calluses and nothing seems to relieve them. Nothing, that is, until now. Just a small nightly dose seems to be helping immensely into giving my dear son back the soft feet I would expect a 7-year-old to have. I highly recommend this product to anyone who suffers from dry, cracked feet</review_text>
You couldn't have picked a better person to Test Drive this product. I have severely dried and callused heals. From the moment I put the creme on my feet, they felt smoother. The creme stays on for hours like the product says. I can't believe the difference it's made in such a short time. I'll definitely buy this product, and I'll be recommending it to my mom, whose feet are drier than mine are</review_text>
This is the best investment ever! They start you out with everything you need from the liners to the paraffin. It was so easy to set up & start enjoying. I've used it on average twice a week and my feet & hands are so wonderfully moist--even in this winter weather. My heels are no longer cracked & my cuticles are so healthy--not snagging at all. Thank you for this perfect product & so much cheaper than going to the salon! It's so relaxing (I use lavender) as I do this just before bed</review_text>
I have been having severe back pain (muscular)and subsequent headaches on a daily basis for many months.  I finally brokedown and went to see one of my colleagues who is a physiatrist.  He recommended the theracane to me.  He is a physician who is both a DC, (Doctor of Chiropractic) and a physician, DO. This physician has been doing trigger point therapy including intramuscular needling to help release the painful knots in my back. I find that I can use the theracane in between visits with noted relief.  This same doctor states that this condition is like diabetes and needs to be managed for life and thus, the theracane allows for me to maintain.  I think the theracane is an ingenious invention.  I don't really have anything negative to say, with the exception of the pain I am trying to manage.  The product arrived quickly after I ordered it and it is exactly as described.</review_text>
The Theracane is a fantastic tool for unknotting hard-to-reach muscles.  It looks clunky, but the shape is right for providing leverage (and therefore more pressure) to just the right spots.A great companion for the Theracane is "The Trigger Point Therapy Workbook, 2nd edition" by Clair Davies.  It matches sore places on the human body with the trigger points (the muscle knots) that cause them.  I solved a persistent recurring pain in my upper back by massaging a trigger point near my throat.The Unwind company is an A+ operation.  Ordering is easy, customer service is friendly, their prices are among the lowest, and shipping is super-speedy (my order shipped within two hours).  I ordered directly from their website and received free shipping.</review_text>
I didn't think I would like the fragrance, but it's absolutely wonderful.  It's not too sweet or strong.  It smells good on my daughters and me.  Give it a try.  You won't be disappointed</review_text>
We all have from time to time brought those heavy bottle of liquid detergent to the washing machine, and breaking our backs in the process. Thankfully, All Small & Mighty might be a unique solution. It is a concentrated detergent that works with the capacity of a traditional 100 ounce bottle. I like it because it really does a great job at cleaning clothes that haven't been completely spotless from all those tough messes from other methods. I really think that everyone should own this product because it saves a lot of headaches, while being true to its price. That's All!Price: B+Convience: A-Overall: B+</review_text>
maybe because I ordered a "medium".  It works fine otherwise.  I recommend it</review_text>
Very convenient reading glasses. You could hang them on your neck when not using them, and not even notice they are there. They are very sturdy, and are flexible making them almost imposible to break.Cons: Both sets I purchased I notice them to be on the narrow side. They sometimes can feel too tight to the side of your face.The glasses are also not practicable to wear for a person with long hair, as the glasses would trap your hair against your face</review_text>
This is the longest period of time that my husband has kept a pair of reading glasses. The Click readers loop around his neck and are always there when he needs them. He gets lots of comments about how neat they are</review_text>
I purchased this unit for my personal office at work. Its small and unobtrusive enough so as not to necessarily stand out. Its runs quietly and well, operating on the highest setting for several hours</review_text>
After 3 months use, I'm buying two more of these for my daughters. The unit is compact, very sturdy, virtually silent, and puts out plenty of mist even on the low setting. The small tank is light and easy to fill, even in a bathroom sink (many people really have to wrestle with those one gallon tanks) yet it easilly lasts through an 8 hour work day or nights sleep.The key feature is that it is small and quiet. That means it can be near you on a desk top or night table. Having the mist nearer to you and less in the ambient air means less will condense on cold windows (and cause mildew). It also means you can use the low setting which makes the small tank last longer and reduces any risk of vapor droplets settling to the table top. If you want to use the high setting, put the unit on top of a book shelf, dresser or file cabnit to allow a longer path for the mist to settle.This is small and light enough to take on the road to dry hotel rooms. One daughter wants one for her dorm room, which is overheated. The unit is easily moved from bedroom to den or wherever you locate during the day. You would not find this convenient with large (gallon) humidifiers.This unit is also inexpensive, at around $30 which is half the cost of many larger models (so you can get two). After using several evaporative humidifiers, I love not spending $6 - $9 a month for paper replacement wicks.Overall, I am delighted with the unit. The only criticsm is the blue LED is too bright in a dark room. This is easily dimmed by putting a piece of masking or adhesive tape over it. The light is helpful to avoid bumping the unit if you reach for the phone or a tissue in the dark of night. It also lights up the mist so you know there is still water in the chamber.Highly recommended.</review_text>
I have a severe dry eye problem and i found in internet that a humidifier may help.I bought big one for home and personal for work.It's been 2 days and it's working fine</review_text>
These wipes are awesome!  They got here real fast too!</review_text>
It arrived in 3 days and I used it for a week, and I still get some stray ingrowns once in a while but it is the only thing that worked this good this fast for me and trust me I tried everything in the book.A plus is my face is one even complexion when I had alot of dark spots which was a pleasant surprise</review_text>
You know right away your teeth feel different, much like how they feel after a dentist cleaning.The dual action (larger) head is gentler and feels more like a normal toothbrush but it certainly isn't as aggressive as the smaller one in it's ability to clean. If you can handle the smaller heads they certainly do a better job. The flossing attachment was also very effective</review_text>
After brushing with the HydraBrush, my teeth feel as clean as when I've been to the dental hygenist.This is a great product.  I am so glad that replacement brushes are available at Amazon</review_text>
Hydrabrush is an excellent power toothbrush because the brushHead has more surfaces to get at your teeth and gum line making the brushing very comfortable and refreshing afterwards. I use the soft brushHead because I used to have gingivitis and my gums were red and swollen, but since using the Hydrabrush and the 8 brushes (4 on each side) I don't have to worry about missing when I brush my teeth. Excellent product.</review_text>
I used this to get marks off my washer and dryer and then went on to clean the rest of the house!  This little "sponge" is awesome, and it is just like a sponge; it's not abrasive.  The only problem I see with it (and all cleaning products) is that you actually have to use it for it to work; lol</review_text>
For anyone on the fence about these, jump over to my side ;) My (then) 2 year old had gotten a hold of my husband's permanent black marker.We just bought a brand new refrigerator. I turned my back for a few moments, and when I looked back, she had scribbled *all over* my new fridge.I tried bleach, soap, scrubby sponges... nothing worked. My first new appliance was ruined!On a whim I bought this. (Couldn't hurt, right?)It got it off immediately! (I had to press a little bit to get it out of the grooves.) I was so excited, I started running around my house trying to find things to scrub...I know that it removes shoe scuffs with ease, markers or crayons from walls, and a multitude of other "sins" your children may commit against your home.</review_text>
This product works great for water retention. I like that it doesn't keep you running to the ladies room, works great</review_text>
